4470983
El_Palacio_de_Hierro
El Palacio de Hierro (El Palacio de Hierro S.A. de C.V.) () is an upscale chain of stores in Mexico.Historythumb|left||El Palacio de Hierro store in Mexico CityIn the 1850s, a clothing store opened in City called Las Fbricas de Francia (The Factories of France) which was owned by Victor Gassier, a Frenchman.  In 1860, Gassier teamed up with Alexander Reynaud, forming a business called Gassier & Reynaud. In 1876, Jos Tron and Jos Leautaud bought in, forming the association V. Gassier & Reynaud, Sucs. S. en C. In 1879 the business formal name was changed to J. Tron y Ca..  However, it continued to trade as Las Fbricas de Francia. From here Tron and Leautauds endeavor met with considerable success.In 1879, they began planning to build a department store in Mexico City similar to famous upscale, and high class stores  in Paris (Bon March), York City (Macys), London (Harrods), and Chicago (Fields).thumbnail|Inside of an El Palacio de Hierro storeIn 1888 they bought land to construct their new department store.  They hired the french architect George Debrie for the project and construction was to last until 1891.Tron and Leautaud chose to build a five story building.  It was, notably, the first building in City made of iron and steel.  As the first such structure in Mexico, people who passed by often asked What iron palace are they building?.In 1891, when construction finished, Tron and Leautaud decided to rename the business El Palacio de Hierro, taking advantage of the publicity they earned during construction. Nowadays, El Palacio de Hierro is part of Bal a diversified conglomerate in Mexico with interests in insurance, mining and retail.It is a comprehensive department store with product lines ranging from clothing, to housewares, furniture, jewelry, select foods, toys, spa, travel services, and electronics. Especially in the clothing area, it is a high-end retailer, carrying top Mexican domestic brands, as well as hosting many in-store boutiques from exclusive lines such as Tiffany, Cartier, Louis Vuitton, Gucci, Ferragamo, Coach, Burberry, Carolina Herrera, Bottega Veneta, and Herms.Today, Palacio has stores in City (10 stores, of which 3 are known as Outlets), Monterrey (1 store), and Puebla (1 store), 1 in Guadalajara (the newest). The company has terrain in the city of Quertaro as a possible future location. Plans for a new store in City are currently under planning and construction, making this the first Palacio outside Mexico.External links*Official SitePalacio de Hierro
4479476
Howe_Caverns
thumb|250px|Outside view of the caverns.Howe Caverns is a cave in Howes Cave, County, New York.GeologyGeologists believe that the formation of the cave, which lies  below ground, began several million years ago. Composed mainly of limestone deposited hundreds of millions of years ago when the Ocean stretched far inland, the cave contains a lake called the of Venus, as well as many speleothems.Discovery and developmentthumb|250px|Inside the cavernsthumb|250px|Another inside view of the cavernsHowe Caverns takes its name from a farmer named Howe who discovered it on May 22, 1842. Noticing that his cows frequently gathered near some bushes at the bottom of a hill on hot summer days, Howe decided to investigate. Behind the bushes he found a hole with a strong, cool breeze emanating from it. Howe proceeded to dig out and explore the cave with his friend and neighbor, Henry Wetsel, on whose land the cave entrance was located.Howe opened the cave to eight-hour public tours in 1843, and, as business grew, a hotel was built over the entrance.When Howe encountered financial difficulties, he sold off parts of his property until a limestone quarry bought the remainder. The quarrys purchase included the hillside which opened to the caves natural entrance. The cave was then closed to the public until an organization was formed in 1927 to reopen it. The organization spent the next two years undertaking development work to create another route into the cave. After completion of the work &ndash; including elevators, brick walkways, lighting and handrails &ndash; the cave was reopened to visitors on Memorial Day 1929. The site includes a hotel and a restaurant.The tour now lasts about 80 minutes and shows the majority of the cave. Visitors begin at the elevators and continue to the end of the Lake of Venus, which marks the end of Howe Caverns property. Beyond this point lie about  of unconditioned and destroyed caverns which lead to the quarry and the natural entrance. After a boat ride, visitors turn around and walk back the way they came, with two additional stops.Cavern officials have detailed plans to open up the natural entrance of the cave to public tours in the future. Until recently, the natural entrance was not owned by Howe caverns but now it owns the entire cave. Plans are being put in place to continue the boat ride and have the tour exit out of the natural cave entrance.In addition, there is also a two hour Adventure tour that simulates natural cave exploration with the assistance of a guide in a section of the cave that had not previously been open to the public.  There is no artificial lighting on this part of the cavern.  Visitors are equipped with a suit appropriate for the muddy and cold journey.  This tour usually ends at the lake of mystery as visitors would have to crawl through a passage filled with water inches away from the ceiling.Weddings are also performed deep in the cave.Proposed expansionMore recently, officials at the caverns had announced plans to expand the attractions offered by the caverns. Proposed additions included a large RV park and a dinosaur theme park. The necessary approval was acquired, but the project remains in the planning stage, with no start or completion date available.Cave House Museum of Mining & GeologyThe Cave House Museum of Mining & Geology is located next to the caverns in a former hotel.  The museum features exhibits relating to the caves geology and formation, rock and mineral specimens, the history of the caves discovery and tourism, wildlife found in the cave, and the areas cement industry.External links* Howe Caverns official site* Cave House Museum of Mining & Geology* BSA Scavenger Hunt Info
4484806
De_re_metallica
De re metallica (Latin for On the Nature of Metals (Minerals)) is a book cataloguing the state of the art of mining, refining, and smelting metals, published in 1556. The author was Bauer, whose pen name was the Latinized Agricola. The book remained the authoritative text on mining for 180 years after its publication.Agricola had spent nine years in the Bohemian town of Joachimsthal, now in the Republic. (Joachimsthal is famous for its silver mines and the origin of the word Thaler and, ultimately, dollar.) After Joachimsthal, he spent the rest of his life in Chemnitz, a prominent mining town in Saxony. Both Joachimsthal and Chemnitz are in the Erzgebirge, or Ore Mountains.Summarywater-powered mine hoist used for raising oreThe book consists of a preface and twelve chapters, labelled books I to XII, without titles. It also has numerous woodcuts that provide annotated diagrams illustrating equipment and processes described in the text. PrefaceAgricola addresses the book to prominent German aristocrats, the most important of whom were Elector of Saxony and his brother Augustus, who were his main patrons. He then describes the works of ancient and contemporary writers on mining and metallurgy, the chief ancient source being the Elder. Agricola describes several books contemporary to him, the chief being a booklet by Calbus of Freiberg in German. The works of alchemists are then described. Agricola does not reject the idea of alchemy, but notes that alchemical writings are obscure and that we do not read of any of the masters who became rich. He then describes fraudulent alchemists, who deserve the death penalty. Agricola completes his introduction by explaining that, since no other author has described the art of metals completely, he has written this work, setting forth his scheme for twelve books. Finally, he again directly addresses his audience of German princes, explaining the wealth that can be gained from this art.Book I: Arguments for and against this artThis book consists of the arguments used against the art and Agricolas counter arguments. He explains that mining and prospecting are not just a matter of luck and hard work; there is specialized knowledge that must be learned. A miner should have knowledge of philosophy, medicine, astronomy, surveying, arithmetic, architecture, drawing and law, though few are masters of the whole craft and most are specialists. This section is full of classical references and shows Agricolas classical education to its fullest. The arguments range from philosophical objections to gold and silver as being intrinsically worthless, to the danger of mining to its workers and its destruction of the areas in which it is carried out. He argues that without metals, no other activity such as architecture or agriculture are possible. The dangers to miners are dismissed; most deaths and injuries are caused by carelessness and other occupations are hazardous too. Clearing woods for fuel is advantageous as the land can be farmed. Mines tend to be in mountains and gloomy valleys with little economic value. The loss of food from the forests destroyed can be replaced by purchase from profits, and metals have been placed underground by God and man is right to extract and use them. Finally, Agricola argues that mining is an honorable and profitable occupation.Book II: The miner and a discourse on the finding of veinsThis book describes the miner and the finding of veins. Agricola assumes that his audience is the mine owner, or an investor in mines. He advises owners to live at the mine and to appoint good deputies. It is recommended to buy shares in mines that have not started to produce as well as existing mines to balance the risks. The next section of this book recommends areas where miners should search. These are generally mountains with wood available for fuel and a good supply of water. A navigable river can be used to bring fuel, but only gold or gemstones can be mined if no fuel is available. The roads must be good and the area healthy. Agricola describes searching streams for metals and gems that have been washed from the veins. He also suggests looking for exposed veins and also describes the effects of metals on the overlying vegetation. He recommends trenching to investigate veins beneath the surface. He then describes dowsing with a forked twig although he rejects the method himself. Finally he comments on the practice of naming veins or shafts.Book III: Veins and stringers and seams in the rocksThis book is a description of the various types of veins that can be found. There are 30 illustrations of different forms of these veins, forming the majority of Book III.  Agricola also describes a compass to determine the direction of veins and mentions that some writers claim that veins lying in certain directions are richer, although he provides counter-examples. He also mentions the theory that the sun draws the metals in veins to the surface, although he himself doubts this. Finally he explains that gold is not generated in the beds of streams and rivers and east-west streams are not more productive than others inherently. Gold occurs in streams because it is torn from veins by the water.Book IV: Delimiting veins and the functions of mining officialsThis book describes how an official, the Bergmeister, is in charge of mining. He marks out the land into areas called meers when a vein is discovered. The rest of the book covers the laws of mining. There is a section on how the mine can be divided into shares. The roles of various other officials in regulating mines and taxing the production are stated. The shifts of the miners are fixed. The chief trades in the mine are listed and are regulated by both the Bergmeister and their foremen.Book V: The digging of ore and the surveyors artThis book covers underground mining and surveying. When a vein below ground is to be exploited a shaft is begun and a wooden shed with a windlass is placed above it. The tunnel dug at the bottom follows the vein and is just big enough for a man. The entire vein should be removed. Sometimes the tunnel eventually connects with a tunnel mouth in a hill side. Stringers and cross veins should be explored with cross tunnels or shafts when they occur. Agricola next describes that gold, silver, copper and mercury can be found as native metals, the others very rarely. Gold and silver ores are described in detail. Agricola then states that it is rarely worthwhile digging for other metals unless the ores are rich. Gems are found in some mines, but rarely have their own veins, lodestone is found in iron mines and emery in silver mines. Various minerals and colours of earths can be used to give indications of the presence of metal ores. The actual mineworking varies with the hardness of the rock, the softest is worked with a pick and requires shoring with wood, the hardest is usually broken with fire. Iron wedges, hammers and crowbars are used to break other rocks. Noxious gases and the ingress of water are described. Methods for lining tunnels and shafts with timber are described. The book concludes with a long treatise on surveying, showing the instruments required and techniques for determining the course of veins and tunnels. Surveyors allow veins to be followed, but also prevent mines removing ore from other claims and stop mine workings from breaking into other workings.thumb|left|Prospecting, a woodcut from the bookBook VI: The miners tools and machinesThis book is extensively illustrated and describes the tools and machinery associated with mining. Handtools and different sorts of buckets, wheelbarrows and trucks on wooded plankways are described. Packs for horses and sledges are used to carry loads above ground. Agricola then provides details of various kinds of machines for lifting weights. Some of these are man-powered and some powered by up to four horses or by waterwheels. Horizontal drive shafts along tunnels allow lifting in shafts not directly connected to the surface. If this is not possible treadmills will be installed underground. Instead of lifting weights similar machines use chains of buckets to lift water. Agricola also describes several designs of piston force pumps which are either man or animal powered or powered by waterwheels. Because these pumps can only lift water about 24 feet batteries of pumps are required for the deepest mines. Water pipe designs are also covered in this section. Designs of wind scoop for ventilating shafts or forced air using fans or bellows are also described. Finally ladders and lifts using wicker cages are used to get miners up and down shafts.Book VII: On the assaying of oreThis book deals with assaying techniques. Various designs of furnaces are detailed. Then cupellation, crucibles, scorifiers and muffles are described. The correct method of preparation of the cupels is covered in detail with beech ashes being preferred. Various other additives and formulae are described, but Agricola does not judge between them. Triangular crucibles and scorifiers are made of fatty clay with a temper of ground up crucibles or bricks. Agricola then describes in detail which substances should be added as fluxes as well as lead for smelting or assaying. The choice is made by which colour the ore burns out which gives an indication of the metals present. The lead should be silver-free or be assayed separately. The prepared ore is wrapped in paper, placed on a scorifier and then placed under a muffle covered in burning charcoal in the furnace. The cupel should be heated at the same time. The scorifier is removed and the metal transferred to the cupel. Alteratively the ore can be smelted in a triangular crucible, and then have lead mixed with it when it is added to the cupel.  The cupel is placed in the furnace and copper is separated into the lead which forms lithage in the cupel leaving the noble metal. Gold and silver are parted using an aqua which is probably nitric acid. Agricola describes precautions for ensuring the amount of lead is correct and also describes the amalgamation of gold with mercury. Assay techniques for base metals such as tin are described as well as techniques for alloys such as silver tin. The use of a touchstone to assay gold and silver is discussed. Finally detailed arithmetical examples show the calculations needed to give the yield from the assay.Book VIII: Roasting, crushing and washing oreIn this book Agricola provides a detailed account of beneficiation of different ores. He describes the processes involved in ore sorting, roasting and crushing. The use of water for washing ores is discussed in great detail, e.g. the use of launders and washing tables. Several different types of machinery for crushing ore and washing it are illustrated and different techniques for different metals and different regions are described. Book IX: Methods of smelting oresThis book describes smelting, which Agricola describes as perfecting the metal by fire. The design of furnaces is first explained.These are very similar for smelting different metals, constructed of brick or soft stone with a brick front and mechanically driven bellows at the rear. At the front is a pit called the fore-hearth to receive the metal. The furnace is charged with beneficiated ore and crushed charcoal and lit. In some gold and silver smelting a lot of slag is produced because of the relative poverty of the ore and the tap hole has to be opened at various times to remove different slag materials. When the furnace is ready, the forehearth is filled with molten lead into which the furnace is tapped. In other furnaces the smelting can be continuous, and lead is placed into the furnace if there is none in the ore. The slag is skimmed off the top of the metal as it is tapped. The lead containing the gold is separated by cupellation, the metal rich slags are re-smelted. Other smelting processes are similar, but lead is not added. Agricola also describes making crucible steel and distilling mercury and bismuth in this book.Book X: Separating silver from gold and lead from gold or silverAgricola describes parting silver from gold in this book by using acids. He also describes heating with antimony sulphide (stibium), which would give silver sulphide and a mixture of gold and antimony. The gold and silver can then be recovered with cupellation. Gold can also be parted using salts or using mercury. Large scale cupellation using a cupellation hearth is also covered in this bookBook XI: Separating silver from copperThis book describes separating silver from copper or iron. This is achieved by adding large amounts of lead at a temperature just above the melting point of lead. The lead will liquate out with the silver. This process will need to be repeated several times. The lead and silver can be separated by cupellation.Book XII: Manufacturing salt, soda, alum, vitriol, sulphur, bitumen, and glassThis describes the preparation of what Agricola calls juices: salt, soda, nitre, alum, vitriol, saltpetre, sulphur and bitumen. Finally glass making is covered. Agricola seems less secure about this process. He is not clear about making glass from the raw ingredients but clearer about remelting glass to make objects.Publication historyAlthough Agricola died in 1555, the publication was delayed until the completion of the extensive and detailed woodcuts. In 1912, the first English translation of De Re Metallica was privately published in London by subscription. The translators were Hoover, a mining engineer (and later of the United States), and his wife, Henry Hoover, a geologist and Latinist. The translation is notable not only for its clarity of language, but for the extensive footnotes, which detail the classical references to mining and metals, such as the Historia of the Elder, the history of law in England, France, and the German states; safety in mines, including historical safety; and known minerals at the time that Agricola wrote De Re Metallica.Subsequent translations into other languages, including German, owe much to the Hoover translations, as their footnotes detail their difficulties with Agricolas invention of several hundred Latin expressions to cover Mediaeval German mining and milling terms unknown to classical Latin.See also*la pirotechnia*Historia*the Elder*literature*TheophrastusExternal links*Original text of De Re Metallica (Latin version)*English version first edition by Herbert Hoover/Lou Henry Hooverre metallica libri XIIre metallicare metallicaRe MetallicaRe MetallicaRe Metallicazh:
4493950
Southern_Rhodesian_general_election,_1924
The Southern Rhodesia general election of April 29, 1924 was the first election to the Legislative Assembly of Rhodesia following the grant of responsible government to the colony. It saw a comprehensive victory for the Rhodesia Party, which had been formed by the supporters of responsible government, who won 26 out of the 30 seats.FranchiseThe Letters Patent granting the colony the right to self-government in 1923 made no change to the pre-existing franchise. The law provided that voters must have been resident in Southern Rhodesia for at least six months, and have the ability to complete the claim form for the electoral register in their own handwriting if the registrar required, and to write from dictation 50 words in the English language. In addition, voters had to meet one of three criteria for their financial means: either occupy property worth 150 in their Electoral District, or own a registered mining claim within the colony (for which residence was not required), or receive annual salary of 100 in the colony.Electoral procedureNo change was made to the basic electoral procedure which continued to be the single non-transferable vote, or First past the post system, cast by means of the secret ballot.Electoral districtsThe Letters Patent created a legislative assembly with 30 members, and for simplicity the 15 electoral districts set the previous year for the Legislative Council were used for the new assembly, but with each district returning two members. Voters were therefore entitled to two votes.Political partiesSince the previous election, and the grant of responsible government, the Government Association had organised itself under the leadership of Sir Charles Coghlan into the Party and been appointed as the new government. In addition the Labour Party, which had been formed some years before, entered into the election. However a substantial number of candidates fought as Independents on their own record. In general these candidates represented small farmers, small businesses and mining interests.CampaignThe Labour Party had supported the Responsible Government Association in its campaign for a separate government for the colony, and in opposition to union with South Africa, and members of both parties hoped to reach agreement on an allocation of seats between them so that they did not oppose each other. Negotiations were unsuccessful and where candidates of the parties were fighting for seats, the fight between them became bitter. The independent candidates were also in opposition to the establishment party and many stressed the need for a strong opposition in the new Assembly.Summary resultElectorate: 21,936 (20,060 in contested seats)Turnout: 59.8%ResultsNote: As the Midlands result was a tie between Boggie and Austen, the election was determined by a drawing of lots, which was supervised by a Judge of the High Court, on May 15, 1924.Changes during the AssemblyMazoeSir Francis Newton resigned on August 26, 1924 on appointment as High Commissioner of the United Kingdom to Southern Rhodesia, precipitating a byelection in his electoral district which was held on September 26, 1924. Salisbury SouthGeorge Elcombe resigned his seat on January 10, 1927 and a byelection was held on March 8, 1927.Bulawayo NorthSir Charles Coghlan died on August 28, 1927 and a byelection was held on November 18, 1927.MidlandsWilliam James Boggie died on February 8, 1928 and a byelection was held on April 18, 1928.DefectionsThere were a number of changes within the assembly. Robert Dunipace Gilchrist crossed the floor to sit as an opposition Independent in 1925. He was followed in May 1927 by Francis Leslie Hadfield and Max Danziger. In June 1927, the Progressive Party was formed by Harry Bertin, Robert Alexander Fletcher, Robert Dunipace Gilchrist, George Edward Gilfillan, Francis Leslie Hadfield, Frank William Frederick Johnson, John Louis Martin, Frederic Philip Mennell and Sir Ernest William Sanders Montagu. This party campaigned for a pro-white immigration policy, the development of Matabeleland, and establishing African reserves. It was opposed to monopolies, and sought reform and depoliticisation of the Civil Service.References* Source Book of Parliamentary Elections and Referenda in Southern Rhodesia 1898-1962 ed. by F.M.G. Willson (Department of Government, University College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, Salisbury 1963)* Holders of Administrative and Ministerial Office 1894-1964 by F.M.G. Willson and G.C. Passmore, assisted by Margaret T. Mitchell (Source Book No. 3, Department of Government, University College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, Salisbury 1966)
4502508
Mountaineer_Power_Plant
The Mountaineer Power Plant is a major coal-fired power plant outside New Haven, Virginia, USA. Owned by Electric Power (AEP), it has one of the tallest chimneys in the world at . This chimney was built as part of the plant in 1980 and is not in use now. It has been replaced by a slightly shorter and wider chimney for the precipitator and scrubber units.The AEP Mountaineer Plant is what is known as a 1300 megawatt plant.  The actual total capacity of the plants two turbines is around 1480 MW, and the plant averages around 1420 MW.  1300 MW is the net power that actually leaves the plant, whereas the difference between the turbine output and the 1300 MW is required to run the plant itself.  It is a closed-loop plant in that it recycles the water used, however it requires approximately  per hour of make up water to be drawn from the River to replace the water that is lost in water vapor through the tower and the precipitator/scrubber chimney.The plant burns an average of 9,000 tons (8,200 metric tons) of coal per day, and some of that coal now comes via barge on the Ohio River to an elaborate coal unloading and storage facility.The other portion of coal comes from Big River Mining. An underground mine right across the street from the plant. It is mined, cleaned, processed, and shipped by a belt line across the street to the power plant. This single boiler, dual turbine plant produces enough energy to power a city approximately the size of Ohio.The location of the plant is routinely given as New Haven, West Virginia, yet sits just outside the town limits.  The plant actually sits on land that was originally known as Graham Station.  The next-door Phillip Sporn AEP plant and the Mountaineer Plant seem to cover most of the land of the former Graham Station, thus Graham Station is seldom used as a locale.Clean coal projectThere were plans to outfit the plant with technology that uses chilled ammonia to trap dioxide. The greenhouse gas would then be turned into a liquid and injected into the ground. It would have been the first such project that will both capture and store carbon from an existing power plant.() A successful pilot project was built using the new technology which removed 100,000 to 300,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide of the 8.5 million tons emitted annually by the Mountaineer plant. According to New York Times, AEP and the maker of the technology, Alstom, spent $100 million on the initiative. However, the political climate had changed by July, 2011 and the project was abandoned due to diminishing federal and state support for coal technology.()ReferencesExternal links* Chimney Diagram* AEP Mountaineer Plant, New Haven WV by rmcgervey, on Flickr* AEP Mountaineer Plant, New Haven WV by rmcgervey, on FlickrMountaineerja:kullkraftverk
4514633
United_States_National_Mine_Health_and_Safety_Academy
thumb|The National Mine Health and Safety AcademyThe United States National Mine Health and Safety Academy (MSHA) is a federal academy responsible for training the mine safety and health inspectors and technical support personnel of the Mine Safety and Health Administration. The Academy is located in West Virginia, on an  site near the County Airport. The Academy complex consists of nine buildings: The Residence Hall, Administration Building, Classroom Building, Mine Machinery Laboratory Building, Publication Distribution Center, Gymnasium, Maintenance and Equipment Building, Mine Emergency Operations Building, Mine Rescue Station and Mine Simulation Laboratory.  Students are exposed to a variety of different disciplines in nine different laboratories: roof control, ground control, mine emergencies and rescue, ventilation, electrical systems, machinery, industrial hygiene, computer systems and underground mine simulation.  HistoryIn a five-year period from 1906-1911, 13,228 miners were killed in U.S. coal mines. As a result, the Bureau of Mines was established by Congress on July 1, 1910, to make diligent investigation of the methods of mining, especially in relation to the safety of miners and the appliances best adapted to prevent accidents.In succeeding years, Congress passed other legislation designed to promote health and safety in the mines, including the 1966 Federal Metal and Nonmetallic Mine Safety Act (P.L. 89-577) and the Federal Coal Mine Health and Safety Act of 1969 (P.L. 91-173). The most recent regulatory legislation combined the coal and metal and nonmetal industries under one law--the Federal Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977. This act directed that The National Mine Health and Safety Academy shall be...responsible for the training of mine safety and health inspectors, mining personnel, or other persons as the Secretaries of Labor and Interior shall designate. In performing this function, the Academy shall have the authority to enter into cooperative educational and training agreements with educational institutions, State governments, labor organizations, and mine operators and related industries. It is through the training provisions of this legislation that the National Mine Health and Safety Academy functions.  In response to the mandates of the Coal Mine Health and Safety Act of 1969, on September 7, 1971, the Academy began inspector training in temporary facilities in Beckley, West Virginia. On August 17, 1976, the permanent facility, situated on  of land donated by the Raleigh County Airport Authority, opened its doors with an official dedication.  George Zabetakis was the first superintendent of the Academy.On July 25, 1979, Public Law 96-38 transferred the activities and functions of the National Mine Health and Safety Academy from the Department of the Interior to the Department of Labor.  External links*National Mine Health and Safety Academy Homepage
4517597
African_immigration_to_Puerto_Rico
The history of African people in Puerto Rico begins with the immigration of African free men who accompanied the invading Spanish Conquistadors. The Spaniards enslaved the Tanos (the native inhabitants of the island), and many of them died as a result of Spaniards oppressive colonization efforts. This presented a problem for Spains royal government, which relied on slavery to staff their mining and fort-building operations. Spains solution: import enslaved west-Africans.  As a result, the vast majority of the African peoples who immigrated to Rico did so as a result of the trade from many different societies of the African continent.When the gold mines in Puerto Rico were declared depleted, the Spanish Crown no longer held Puerto Rico as a high colonial priority, and the island became a garrison for naval vessels. Africans from British and French possessions in the Caribbean were encouraged to emigrate to Puerto Rico, thereby providing a population base to support the Puerto Rican garrison. The Spanish decree of 1789 allowed the slaves to earn or buy their freedom, however this did little to help their situation. Throughout the years there were many slave revolts in the island. Slaves, who were promised their freedom, joined the short lived uprisng against Spanish colonial rule in what is known as the de Lares. On on March 22, 1873, slavery was abolished in Puerto Rico. Their contributions to music, art, language, and heritage have become instrumental to Puerto Rican culture.First Africans in Puerto Ricothumb|250px|left|Slave transport in Africa, depicted in a 19th-century engravingWhen Ponce de Len and the Spaniards arrived on the island of Borinken (Puerto Rico), they were greeted by the Cacique Ageyban, the supreme leader of the peaceful Tano tribes on the island. Ageyban helped to maintain the peace between the Tanos and the Spaniards.According to historian Alegria, the first free African man set foot on the island in 1509Juan Garrido, a conquistador in Ponce de Lens entourage. Garrido was born on the West African coast, the son of an African king. In 1508,  he joined Juan Ponce de Leon to explore Puerto Rico and prospect for gold, and in 1511, he fought under Ponce de Leon  to repress the Caribs and the Tanos who had joined forces in Puerto Rico in a great revolt against the Spaniards.(Aimery Caron. The First West African on St. Croix? University of the Virgin Islands, Retrieved May 9, 2008) Garrido went on to join Cortes in the Spanish conquest of Mexico.(Africana: The Encyclopedia of the African; By Henry Louis Gates; Page 815; Published 1999 by Basic Civitas Books; ISBN 0-465-00071-1)Another free African man who accompanied de Len was Pedro Mejas. Mejas married a Tano woman chief (a cacica) by the name of Yuisa. Yuisa was baptized Luisa (hence the name of the town of Loza) so that she could marry Mejas.(The First West African on St. Croix?, Retrieved July 20, 2007)(The peace between the Spaniards and the Tanos was short-lived. The Spaniards took advantage of the Tanos good faith and enslaved them, forcing them to work in the gold mines and in the construction of forts. Many Tanos died as a result either  of the cruel treatment that they had received or of smallpox which became epidemic on the island. Other Tanos committed suicide or left the island after the failed Tano revolt of 1511.(Boriucas Illustres, Retrieved July 20, 2007)right|thumb|160px|Shackles used on slaves in Puerto RicoFriar de las Casas, who had accompanied Ponce de Len, was outraged at the treatment by the Spaniards of the Tanos and, in 1512, protested  in front of the council of Burgos at the Spanish Courts. He fought for the freedom of the natives and was able to secure their rights. The Spanish colonists, fearing the loss of their labor force, also protested before the courts. They complained that they needed  manpower to work in the mines, the fortifications and the thriving sugar industry. As an alternative, Las Casas suggested the importation and use of black slaves. In 1517, the Spanish Crown permitted its subjects to import twelve slaves each, thereby beginning the slave trade in their colonies.(Bartolom de las Casas. Oregon State University, Retrieved July 20, 2007)According to historian Luis M. Diaz, the largest contingent of African slaves came from the Gold Coast, Nigeria, and Dahomey, and the region known as the area of Guineas, the Coast. However, the vast majority were Yorubas and Igbos, ethnic groups from Nigeria, and  Bantus from the Guineas. The number of slaves in Puerto Rico rose from 1,500 in 1530 to 15,000 by 1555. The slaves were stamped with a hot iron on the forehead, a branding which meant that they were brought to the country legally and  prevented their kidnapping.(African Aspects of the Puerto Rican Personality by (the late) Dr. Robert A. Martinez, Baruch College. (Archived from the original on July 20, 2007))African slaves were sent to work in the gold mines to replace the lost Tano manpower, or to work in the fields in the islands ginger and sugar industry. They were allowed to live with their families in a bohio (hut) on the masters land, and were given a patch of land where they could plant and grow vegetables and fruits. Africans had little or no opportunity for advancement, and faced discrimination from the Spaniards. African slaves were educated by their owners and soon learned to speak their language, educating their own children in the new language as well.  They enriched the Rican Spanish language by adding African words of their own. The Spaniards considered the Africans superior to the Tanos, since the Tanos were unwilling to assimilate into the Spanish invaders popular culture. The African slaves, in contrast, had no choice but to convert to Christianity; they were baptized by the Church and assumed the surnames of their owners. Many African slaves were subject to harsh treatment, at times including rape. The majority of the Conquistadors and farmers who settled the island had arrived without women, and many of them intermarried with the Africans or Tanos. This mixture formed the basis  of the early Puerto Rican population.(African Aspects of the Puerto Rican Personality, Retrieved July 20, 2007)In 1527, the first major slave rebellion occurred in Puerto Rico as dozen of slaves fought against the colonist in a brief revolt.() The few slaves who escaped retreated to the mountains where they resided as maroons with surviving Tanos. By 1873, over twenty slave revolts had been carried out, including some of great political importance such as the Ponce and Vega Baja conspiracies.(Esclavitud en Puerto Rico(Spanish) Retrieved on 2008-12-04)By 1570, the gold mines were declared depleted of the precious metal. After gold mining came to an end on the island, the Spanish Crown bypassed Puerto Rico by moving the western shipping routes to the north. The island became primarily a garrison for those ships that would pass on their way to or from  richer colonies. A  Spanish edict of 1664 offered freedom and land to African people from non-Spanish colonies, such as Jamaica and St. Dominique (Haiti), who immigrated to Puerto Rico and provided a population base to support the Puerto Rican garrison and its forts. Those freeman who settled the western and southern parts of the island soon adopted the ways and customs of the Spaniards. Some joined the local militia which fought against the British in their many attempts to invade the island. The escaped African slaves kept their former masters surnames; the free Africans who had emigrated from the West Indies had European surnames from those colonists, too.  Such surnames tended to be either British or French. Even by the end of the 20th Century, it was common for Puerto Ricans of African ancestry to have non-Spanish surnames.(Royal Decree of Graces of 1789right|150px|thumb|The Royal Decree of Graces of 1789 which set the rules pertaining to the Slaves in Puerto Rico and the CaribbeanAfter 1784, the method of hot branding the slaves forehead was suspended( and they were permitted to obtain their freedom under the following circumstances:* A slave could be freed in a church or outside of it, before a judge, by testament or letter in the presence of his master.* A slave could be freed against his masters will by denouncing a forced rape, by denouncing a counterfeiter, by discovering disloyalty against the king, and by denouncing murder against his master.* Any slave who received part of his masters estate in his masters will automatically became free.* If a slave were left as guardian to his masters children he also became free.* If slave parents in Hispanic America had ten children, the whole family went free.((Spanish) Marley, David. Reales asientos y licencias para la introduccin de esclavos negros  la Amrica Espaola (16761789) Editorial Abeja, 1985, Retrieved July 20, 2007)left|120px|thumb|Uniform used by the members of the Moreno Fijo RegimentIn 1789, the Spanish Crown issued the Royal Decree of Graces of 1789, which set new rules pertaining to the commercialization of slaves and added restrictions to the granting of freeman status. The decree granted its subjects the right to purchase slaves and to participate in the flourishing business of slave trading in the Caribbean. Later that year a new slave code, also known as El Cdigo Negro (The Black code), was introduced.((Spanish) El Codigo Negro (The Black Code). 1898 Sociedad de Amigos de la Historia de Puerto Rico. Retrieved July 20, 2007)In accordance to  El Cdigo Negro the slave could buy his freedom, in the event that his master was willing to sell, by paying the price sought. Slaves were allowed to earn money during their spare time by working as shoemakers, by cleaning clothes, or by selling the produce  they were allowed to grow in the small patch of land given to them by their masters. Slaves were able to pay for their freedom  by installments. They could make payments in installments for a new born child, not yet baptized, at a cost of half the going price for a baptized child.(El Codigo Negro (The Black Code), Retrieved July 20, 2007) Many of these freeman started settlements in the areas which became known as Cangrejos (Santurce), Carolina, Canvanas, Loza, Loza Aldea, and Luquillo and some became slave owners themselves.(The native-born Puerto Ricans (criollos) who wanted to serve in the regular Spanish army petitioned the Spanish Crown to this effect. In 1741, the Spanish government established the Regimiento Fijo de Puerto Rico. Many of the former slaves, now freeman, either joined the Fijo or the local civil militia. Puerto Ricans of African ancestry played an instrumental role in the defeat of Sir Abercromby  in the British invasion of  Puerto Rico in 1797.((Spanish) La invasin britnica a Puerto Rico de 1797. 1898 Sociedad de Amigos de la Historia de Puerto Rico, Retrieved June 25, 2008)19th centuryNotable Puerto Rican Freeman130px|right|thumb|Rafael CorderoRafael Cordero (17901868), was a freeman born in Juan, Puerto Rico. He became known as The Father of Public Education in Puerto Rico. Cordero was a self-educated Puerto Rican who provided free schooling to children regardless of their race. Among the distinguished alumni who attended Corderos school were future abolitionists Baldorioty de Castro, Tapia y Rivera, and Julin Acosta. Cordero proved that racial and economic integration could be possible and accepted in Puerto Rico. In 2004, the Roman Catholic Church, upon the request of San Juan Archbishop Gonzlez Nieves, began the process of Corderos beatification.((Spanish) Negron Hernandez, Luis. Rafael Cordero. PREB, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Campeche (17511809), was another Puerto Rican of African ancestry who contributed greatly to the islands culture. Campeches father Toms Campeche, was a freed slave born in Puerto Rico, and Mara Jordn Marqus, his mother, came from the Islands. Because of this mixed descent, he was identified as a mulatto, a common term during his time. Campeche is the first known Puerto Rican artist and is considered by many as one of its best. He distinguished himself with his paintings related to religious themes and of governors and other important personalities.(El Nuevo Dia, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Capt. Henriquez (c. 168017??), was a former pirate who became Puerto Ricos first black military hero when he organized an expeditionary force which fought and defeated the British in the island of Vieques. Capt. Henriques was received as a national hero when he returned the island of Vieques back to the Spanish Empire and to the governorship of Puerto Rico. He was awarded La Medalla de Oro de la Real Efigie and the Spanish Crown named him Captain of the Seas awarding him a of marque and reprisal which granted him the privileges of a privateer.( Miguel Henriquez, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Royal Decree of Graces of 1815The Decree of Graces of 1815 was a legal order approved by the Spanish Crown in the early half of the 19th century to encourage Spaniards and later Europeans of non-Spanish origin to settle and populate the colonies of Cuba and Rico. The decree encouraged slave labor to revive agriculture and attract new settlers. The new agricultural class now immigrating from other countries of Europe sought slave labor in large numbers and cruelty became the order of the day. It is for this reason that a series of slave uprisings occurred on the island, from the early 1820s until 1868 in what is known as the de Lares.(  Archivo General de Puerto Rico: Documentos, Retrieved July 20, 2007) The 1834 Royal census of Puerto Rico established that 11% of the population were slaves, 35% were colored freemen and 54% were white.(The History of Puerto Rico by R.A. Van Middeldyk, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Rose Clemente, a black Puerto Rican columnist, wrote Until 1846, Blacks on the island had to carry a notebook (Libreta system) to move around the island, like the passbook system in apartheid South Africa.(Clemente, Rosa. Who is Black? A Puerto Rican woman claims her place in the African Diaspora. The Final Cut)Abolitionistsleft|300px|thumb|Former slaves in Puerto Rico, 1898During the mid-19th century, a committee of abolitionists was formed in Puerto Rico that included many prominent Puerto Ricans. Dr. Emeterio Betances (18271898), whose parents were wealthy landowners, believed in the abolition of slavery, and together with fellow Puerto Rican abolitionist Ruiz Belvis (18291867) founded a clandestine organization called The Secret Abolitionist Society. The objective of the society was to free slave children by the sacrament of baptism. The event, which was also known as aguas de libertad (waters of liberty), was carried out at the Seora de la Candelaria Cathedral in Mayagez. When the child was baptized, Betances would give money to the parents which they in turn used to buy the childs freedom from his master.(Dvila del Valle. Oscar G., Presencia del ideario masnico en el proyecto revolucionario antillano de Ramn Emeterio Betances, available at the Grande Loja Carbonria do Brasils website, http://www.triplov.com/carbonaria/, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Julin Acosta (18271891) was a member of a Puerto Rican commission, which included Ramn Emeterio Betances, Segundo Ruiz Belvis, and Mariano Quiones (18301908). The commission participated in the Overseas Information Committee which met in Madrid, Spain. There, Acosta presented the argument for the abolition of in Puerto Rico.((Spanish) Jose Julian Acosta ZonaI. Retrieved July 20, 2007) On November 19, 1872, Baldorioty de Castro (18221889) together with Padial (18321879), Vizcarrondo (18301889) and the Spanish Minister of Overseas Affairs, Segismundo Moret (18331913), presented a proposal for the abolition of slavery. On March 22, 1873, the Spanish government approved the proposal which became known as the Law.(Romn Baldorioty de Castro - Library of Congress, Retrieved July 20, 2007) This edict granted freedom to slaves over 60 years of age, those belonging to the state, and children born to slaves after September 17, 1868. Most importantly for genealogy purposes, the Moret Law established the Central Slave Registrar which in 1872 began gathering the following data on the islands slave population: name, country of origin, present residence, names of parents, sex, marital status, trade, age, physical description, and masters name.(Text of the Moret Law (in Spanish) from the Internet Archive, Retrieved July 20, 2007)The Spanish government had lost most of its possessions in the Americas by 1850. After the successful slave rebellion against the French in St Dominique (Haiti) in 1803, the Spanish Crown became fearful that the Criollos (native born) of Puerto Rico and Cuba, her last two remaining possessions, may follow suit. Therefore, the Spanish government issued the Decree of Graces of 1815, attracting European immigrants from non-Spanish countries to populate the island believing that these new immigrants would be more loyal to Spain. However, they did not expect the new immigrants to racially intermarry as they did and identify themselves completely with their new homeland.((Spanish) Real Cdula de 1789 para el comercio de Negros. Proyecto Ensayo Hispnico. Retrieved July 20, 2007) On May 31, 1848, the Governor of Puerto Rico Juan Prim, in fear of an independence or slavery revolt imposed draconian laws, El Bando contra La Raza Africana, to control the behavior of all Black Puerto Ricans, slave or free.(Esclavitud en Puerto Rico, Retrieved July 20, 2007) On September 23, 1868, slaves, who were promised their freedom, participated in the short failed revolt against Spain which became known in the history books as Grito de Lares or The Cry of Lares. Many of the participants were imprisoned or executed.(El Grito de Lares. NY Latino Journal, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Abolition of Slaveryright|thumb|160px|Indemnity bond paid as compensation to former owners of freed slavesOn March 22, 1873, slavery was abolished in Puerto Rico. Slave owners were to free their slaves in exchange of a monetary compensation. The majority of the freed slaves continued to work for their former masters with the difference that they were now freeman and received what was considered a just pay for their labor.(Abolition of Slavery in Puerto Rico, Retrieved July 20, 2007)The freed slaves were able to fully integrate themselves into Puerto Ricos society. It cannot be denied that racism has existed in Puerto Rico.  However, racism in Puerto Rico did not exist to the extent of other places in the New World, possibly because of the following factors:* In the 8th century, nearly all of Spain was conquered (711718), by the Muslim Moors who had crossed over from North Africa. The first blacks were brought to Spain during Arab domination by North African merchants. By the middle of the 13th century all of the Iberian peninsula had been reconquered. A section of the city of Seville, which once was a Moorish stronghold, was inhabited by thousands of blacks. Blacks became freeman after converting to Christianity and lived fully integrated in Spanish society. Black women were highly sought after by Spanish males. Spains exposure to people of color over the centuries accounted for the positive racial attitudes that were to prevail in the New World. Therefore, it was no surprise that the first conquistadors who arrived to the island, intermarried with the native Tanos and later with the African immigrants.(African Aspects of the Puerto Rican Personality by (the late) Dr. Robert A. Martinez, Baruch College, Retrieved July 20, 2007)* The Catholic Church played an instrumental role in the human dignity and social integration of the black man in Puerto Rico. The church insisted that every slave be baptized and converted to the Catholic faith. In accordance to the churchs doctrine, master and slave were equal before the eyes of God and therefore brothers in Christ with a common moral and religious character. Cruel and unusual punishment of slaves was considered a violation of the fifth commandment.(* When the gold mines were declared depleted in 1570 and mining came to an end in Puerto Rico, the vast majority of the white Spanish settlers left the island to seek their fortunes in the richer colonies such as Mexico and the island became a Spanish garrison. The majority of those who stayed behind were either black or mulattos (of mixed race). By the time Spain reestablished her commercial ties with Puerto Rico, the island had a large multiracial population, that is up until the 1850s, when the Spanish Crown put the Royal Decree of Graces of 1815 into effect which whitened the islands population by offering attractive incentives to non-Hispanic Europeans. The  new arrivals continued to intermarry with the native islanders.(The racism that did exist and which Black Puerto Ricans were subject to was exposed by two Puerto Rican writers; Diaz Alfaro (19161999) and Pals Matos (18981959) who was credited with creating the poetry genre known as Afro-Antillano.(Juli, Edgardo Rodrguez (19 April 1998) Utopia y Nostalgia en Pales Matos La Jornada Semanal Universidad de Mxico, an analysis of Luis Pals Matos, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Spanish-American WarAfter the War of 1898, Puerto Rico was ceded to the United States by way of the Treaty of Paris of 1898. The United States took over control of the islands institutions and political participation by the natives was restricted. One Puerto Rican politician of African descent who distinguished himself during this period was Celso Barbosa (18571921). On July 4, 1899, he founded the pro-statehood Puerto Rican Republican Party and became known as the Father of the Statehood for Puerto Rico movement. Another distinguished Puerto Rican of African descent, who in this case was an advocate of Puerto Ricos independence was Alfonso Schomburg (18741938). He is considered by some to be the Father of Black History in the United States and he coined the phrase Afroborincano meaning African-Puerto Rican.(History Notes: Arthur Alfonso Afroborinqueno Schomburg, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Discriminationright|150px|thumb|Lieutenant Pedro Albizu Campos (U.S. Army)After the States Congress approved the Jones Act of 1917, every Puerto Rican became a citizen of the United States. As citizens Puerto Ricans were eligible for the military draft and as such many were drafted into the armed forces of the United States, which at that time was segregated. Puerto Ricans of African descent were subject to the discrimination which was rampant in the U.S.(Jones-Shafroth Act - The Library of Congress, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Black Puerto Ricans residing in the mainland United States were assigned to all-black units. Rafael Hernndez (18921965) and his brother Jesus along with 16 more Puerto Ricans were recruited by Jazz bandleader Reese Europe to join the States Armys Orchestra Europe. They were assigned to the 369th Infantry Regiment, an African-American regiment which gained fame during World War I and was nicknamed The Harlem Hell Fighters by the Germans.(- The Great Slsa Timeline)(James Reese Europe. All About Jazz.  Retrieved August 8, 2007)The United States also implemented the policy of military segregated units in Puerto Rico. Albizu Campos (18911965), who later became the leader of the Rican Nationalist Party, held the rank of lieutenant. He founded the Home Guard unit of Ponce and was later assigned to the 375th Infantry Regiment, an all black Puerto Rican regiment, which was stationed in Puerto Rico and never saw combat action.(Militias)  According to Campos, the discrimination which he witnessed in the Armed Forces, influenced his political beliefs.(Hunter, Stephen.American Gunfight. Simon and Schuster, 2005 ISBN 0743281950, Retrieved February 14, 2009)Puerto Ricans of African descent were not only subject to the racial discrimination that was common in the military and in everyday life in the U.S., but were also discriminated against in field of sports as well. Puerto Ricans who were dark-skinned and wanted to play League Baseball in the United States, were not allowed to do so because of the so-called codification of baseballs color line of 1892, barring not only African-American players, but any player from any country who was dark-skinned.() This, however did not keep Puerto Ricans of African descent from participating in the sport. In 1928, Emilio Millito Navarro traveled to New York City and became the first Puerto Rican to play baseball in the Leagues when he joined the Stars.(Negro League Museum, Retrieved July 8, 2008)  He was later followed by others such as Coimbre who also played for the Cuban Stars. The persistence of these men paved the way for the likes of Clemente and Cepeda who played in the Major Leagues after the colorline was broken by Robinson of the Dodgers in 1947 and eventually were inducted into the Hall of Fame.Black Puerto Ricans also participated in other sports as international contestants. In 1917, Chen became the first Puerto Rican boxer to gain international recognition when he fought against (Panama) Joe Gan at the Palace Casino in New York.(Pioneros Puertorriqueos en Nueva York; by Joaquin Colon Lopez; pages: 229, 230; Publisher: Arte Publico Press (November 2001); ISBN 1-55885-335-9; ISBN 978-1-55885-335-5) In the 1948 Summer Olympics )the XIV Olympics), celebrated in London, Evangelista Venegas made Puerto Rican sports history by becoming Puerto Ricos first Olympic medal winner when he beat Belgiums representative, Callenboat, on points for a unanimous decision. He won the bronze medal in boxing in the Bantamweight division, falling short of the silver medal to Zuddas.(Puerto Rico Herald) The event was also historical because it was the first time that the island participated as a nation in an international sporting event. It was common for impoverished Puerto Rican to seek boxing as a way to earn an income and it would not be long before a Puerto Rican of African descent would become a world champion. On March 30, 1965, Jos Chegui Torres defeated Pastrano by technical knockout and won the Boxing Council and Boxing Association light heavyweight championships. He became the third Puerto Rican and the first one of African descent to win a professional world championship.()Among those who exposed the racism and discrimination which Puerto Ricans, especially Black Puerto Ricans were subject to, in the United States was Coln. Coln, who is considered by many as the Father of the Nuyorican movement, told about his experiences in New York as a Black Puerto Rican in his book Lo que el pueblo me dice--: crnicas de la colonia puertorriquea en Nueva York (What the people tell me---: Chronicles of the Puerto Rican colony in New York).(Biography of Jesus Colon. Biographical Dictionary of Hispanic Literature in the United States. New York: Greenwood Press, 1989)African influence in Puerto Rican cultureThe descendants of the former African slaves became instrumental in the development of Puerto Ricos political, economic and cultural structure. They overcame many obstacles and have made their presence felt with their contributions to the islands entertainment, sports, literature and scientific institutions. Their contributions and heritage can still be felt today in Puerto Ricos art, music, cuisine, and religious beliefs in everyday life. In Puerto Rico, March 22 is known as Abolition Day and it is a holiday celebrated by those who live in the island.(Encyclopedia of Days, Retrieved August 8, 2007)LanguageSome African slaves spoke Bozal Spanish, a mixture of Portuguese, Spanish, and the language spoken in the Congo. The African influence in the Spanish spoken in the island can be traced to the many words from African languages that have become a permanent part of Rican Spanish.(Arizona language studies, Retrieved July 20, 2007)MusicFile:Baile De Loiza Aldea.gif|left|thumb|160px|Baile De Loiza Aldea by Broccoli PortoPuerto Rican musical instruments such barriles, drums with stretched animal skin, and Puerto Rican music-dance forms such as Bomba or Plena are likewise rooted in Africa. Bomba represents the strong African influence in Puerto Rico. Bomba is a music, rhythm and dance that was brought by West African slaves to the island of Puerto Rico.(Music of Puerto Rico, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Plena is another form of folkloric music of Puerto Rico of African origin. Plena was brought to Ponce by blacks who immigrated north from the English-speaking islands south of Puerto Rico. Plena is a rhythm that is clearly African and very similar to Calypso, Soca and Dance hall music from Trinidad and Jamaica.(Rhythms of Puerto Rico by Jorge Ginorio (Archived of the original on July 20, 2007))Bomba and Plena were played during the festival of Santiago (St. James), since slaves were not allowed to worship their own gods.  Bomba and Plena evolved into countless styles based on the kind of dance intended to be used. These included ler, yub, cuny, bab and beln. The slaves celebrated baptisms, weddings, and births with the bailes de bomba. Slaveowners, for fear of a rebellion, allowed the dances on Sundays. The women dancers would mimic and poke fun at the slave owners. Masks were and still are worn to ward off evil spirits and pirates. One of the most popular masked characters is the Vejigante (vey-hee-GANT-eh). The Vejigante is a mischievous character and the main character in the Carnivals of Puerto Rico.(Hips on fire, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Until 1953, Bomba and Plena were virtually unknown outside of Puerto Rico until Puerto Rican musicians Cortijo (19281982), Rivera (19311987) and the El Conjunto Monterrey orchestra introduced Bomba and Plena to the rest of the world. What Rafael Cortijo did with his orchestra was to modernize the Puerto Rican folkloric rhythms with the use of piano, bass, saxophones, trumpets, and other percussion instruments such as timbales, bongos, and replacing the typical barriles (skin covered barrels) with congas.(Childrens workshop, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Cepeda (19101996), also known as The Patriarch of Bomba and Plena, was the patriarch of the Cepeda Family. The family is one of the most famous exponents of Puerto Rican folk music, with generations of musicians working to preserve the African heritage in Puerto Rican music. The family is well known for their performances of the bomba and plena folkloric music and are considered by many to be the keepers of those traditional genres.( Don Rafael Cepeda Atiles, Retrieved July 20, 2007)del Villard (19281990), was a member of the Afro-Borcua Ballet and participated in the following Afro-Puerto Rican productions, Palesiana y Aquelarre and Palesianisima.(Puerto Rican Popular Culture) In 1968, she founded the Afro-Boricua El Coqui Theater, which was recognized by the Panamerican Association of the New World Festival as the most important authority of Black Puerto Rican culture.  The Theater group were given a contract which permitted them to present their act in other countries and in various universities in the United States.(34to Festival de Bomba y Plena retorna a Piones) In 1981, she became the first and only director of the office of the Afro-Puerto Rican affairs of the of Puerto Rican Culture. She was known to be an outspoken activist who fought for the equal rights of the Black Puerto Rican artist.(Cuisinethumb|left|160px|Plantain araitas & tostones rellenosAccording to Nydia Rios de Colon, a contributor to the Smithsonian Folklife Cookbook who offers culinary seminars through the Puerto Rican Cultural Institute, she stated in Arts Publications the following:Puerto Rican cuisine also has a strong African influence. The melange of flavors that make up the typical Puerto Rican cuisine counts with the African touch. Pasteles, small bundles of meat stuffed into a dough made of grated green banana (sometimes combined with pumpkin, potatoes, plantains, or yauta) and wrapped in plantain leaves, were devised by African women on the island and based upon food products that originated in Africa.The salmorejo, a local land crab creation, resembles Southern cooking in the United States with its spicing. The mofongo, one of the islands best-known dishes, is a ball of fried mashed plantain stuffed with pork crackling, crab, lobster, shrimp, or a combination of all of them. Puerto Ricos cuisine embraces its African roots, weaving them into its Indian and Spanish influences.(Puerto Rico, Retrieved July 20, 2007)(Pasteles not tasteless: the flavor of Afro-Puerto Rico - wrapped plantain-dough stuffed meat pastries: includes recipes and notes on food tours in Puerto Rico)Religionthumb|160px|Santera artifactsIn 1478, the Monarchs of Spain, II of Aragon and I of Castile, established an ecclesiastical tribunal known as the Inquisition. It was intended to maintain Catholic orthodoxy in their kingdoms.(Homza, Lu Ann (2006). The Spanish Inquisition, 1478&ndash;1614; Page xxv, Hackett Publishing, ISBN 0-87220-795-1.)The Inquisition maintained no rota or religious court in Puerto Rico. However, heretics were written up and if necessary remanded to regional Inquisitional tribunals in Spain or elsewhere in the western hemisphere. As a result Africans were not allowed to practice their native religious beliefs and therefore no single organized African religion survived intact from the times of slavery to the present in Puerto Rico. However, there is a plethora of spiritual beliefs that can be identified as being definitively African.  Santera, more organized in Cuba, and Palo Mayombe, a Tano-Kongo syncretic mix, are also practiced in Puerto Rico, the latter having arrived there at a much earlier time.Palo Mayombe, or Congolese traditions, existed for several centuries before Santera came into existence (19th Century).  While many like to believe that this originally came out of Cuba, the reality is that it was only organized in Cuba.  Yoruba lived in many other places in the Caribbean and Latin America, and so, they took with them their traditions which were allowed to exist in many different forms and guises in other places like Puerto Rico or Trinidad where Christianity was dominant.  Even though they were converted to Christianity, the captured Africans did not abandon their African religious practices altogether. Santera is a religion created between the diverse images drawn from the Catholic Church and the representational deities of the African Yoruba ethnic group of Nigeria.(Santeria, The Orisha Tradition of Voudou: Divination, Dance & Initiation, Retrieved July 20, 2007 )  This religious system formed in Cuba, and had sister traditions that emerged in their own peculiar ways on many of the smaller islands.In Santera there are many deities who respond to one top or head God. These deities, which are said to have descended from heaven to help and console their followers, are known as Orishas. According to Santera the Orishas are the ones who chooses the person whom it will watch over.(At the Crossroads - A first hand account of a Santera divinatory reading, Retrieved July 20, 2007)Unlike other religions where the a worshiper is closely identified with his sect (such as Christianity) the worshiper is not always a Santero. Santeros are the priests and the only official practitioners (Santeros are not to be confused with Puerto Ricos craftsmen who carve and create religious statues from wood and are also called Santeros). A person becomes a Santero if he passes certain tests and has been chosen by the Orishas.(Notable Puerto Ricans of African ancestryThe following is a list of Puerto Ricans of African descent born in the island who have reached notability in their respective fields, either in Puerto Rico, the United States, and/or internationally:*Dr. Barbosa, Jose Celso - was a medical Physician, sociologist, and political leader of Puerto Rico.(Jose Celso Barbosa Alcala Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Dr. Barbosa, Pilar - was an educator, historian and political activist.(Remarks at a Ceremony Honoring Hispanic Excellence in Education September 14, 1984 Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Benitez, Wilfred - boxer who won world championships in three separate weight divisions, and was the youngest world champion in boxing history.(Ian Palmers Tigerboxing.com article on Benitez Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Campeche, Jose - (Mulatto) the first known Puerto Rican artist and considered by many as one of the best rococo artists in the Americas.(El Nuevo Dia Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Campos, Juan Morel - composer, was considered by many to be responsible for taking the genre of danza to its highest level.(Campos composition, Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Dr. Campos, Pedro Albizu - lawyer, an advocate of Rican independence from the United States, and leader and president of the Rican Nationalist Party from 1930 until his death.(Garcia, Marvin, Dr. Pedro Albizu Campos, Louis University, Retrieved Feb. 15, 2009)*Dr. Canales, Jos Ferrer - educator, writer and a pro-independence political activist.(Jose Ferrer Canales Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Capo, Bobby - internationally known singer and songwriter.(Bobby Capo Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Cepeda, Orlando Peruchin - baseball player, inducted into the National Baseball Hall of Fame by the Veterans Committee.(2001 Ernie Banks Positive Image Lifetime Achievement Award. B.A.D. Retrieved Feb. 15, 2009)*Cepeda, Rafael - folk musician and composer, was the patriarch of the Cepeda family, known internationally as the exponents of Puerto Rican-African folk music.( Don Rafael Cepeda Atiles Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Chen, Nero - was the first Puerto Rican professional boxer to gain international recognition.(*Clemente, Roberto - baseball player, first Latin American to be selected and the only current Hall of Famer for whom the mandatory five year waiting period was waived since the wait was instituted in 1954.()*Colon, Jesus - writer and politician known as the Father of the Movement.(Biography of Jesus Colon Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Cordero, Rafael - known as The Father of Education in Puerto Rico, was a self-educated Puerto Rican of African ancestry who provided free schooling to children regardless of their race.(En busca del Maestro Rafael Cordero/In search of The Master Rafael Cordero; By Jack Delano; Publisher: La Editorial Universidad de Puerto Rico; 1 edition (May 1994); ISBN 0-8477-0080-1; ISBN 978-0-8477-0080-6)*Correria, Maritza - the first Puerto Rican of African descent to be on the USA Olympic Swimming Team. She also became the first Black United States swimmer to set an American and World swimming record.(http://prettytough.com/maritza-correia-first-african-american-olympic-swimmer/)*Cruz, Jose Cheo - baseball player, honored by the Astros, when the team retired his number, #25.()*Curet Alonso, Tite - composer, composer of over 2,000 salsa songs.(Biography, Photos, Lyrics (SalsaClasica.com) Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Delgado, Carlos - baseball player, a Major League Baseball first baseman.()*Del Villard, Sylvia - was an actress, dancer, choreographer and Afro-Puerto Rican activist.(N.Y. Encyclopedia of Famous Puerto Ricans Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Feliciano, Jose Cheo - composer and singer of salsa and bolero music.(AmericanSalsa.com Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Fernndez, Ruth - singer and actress, the first Latina singer of romantic music to sing in the Scandinavian countries and the first Latina to record with a North American band.(Ruth Fernandez Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Flores, Pedro - composer, one Puerto Ricos best known composers of Ballads and Boleros.(Peer Music biography Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Hernandez, Juano - actor, the first Puerto Ricans of African descent to become a major star in the United States and one of the first new style black screen actors, who neither sang nor danced but played straight dramatic roles.(Starpulse Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Hernndez, Rafael - musician and composer, considered by many to be the greatest composer of Puerto Rican music.(Rafael hernandez Puerto Ricos Soul Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Kolthoff, Erick - Associate Justice of the Court of Puerto Rico*Navarro, Emilio Millito - baseball player, the first Puerto Rican to play baseball in the Negro Leagues.(Negro League Players Association Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Pellot, Victor - baseball player, the second black Puerto Rican to play in Major League Baseball and the first Puerto Rican to play in the American League.()*Ramos Antonini, Ernesto - was the President of the House of Representatives of Puerto Rico and co-founder of the Partido Popular Democrtico de Puerto Rico (Popular Democratic Party of Puerto Rico).(Luis J. Ramos Antonini)*Richardson, Carmen Belen - actress and a comedian considered to be a pioneer of Puerto Rican television.( Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Rosa Nales, Pedro - News anchor/ Reporter -  journalist he has received over 200 awards.( )*Santos-Febres, Mayra - writer, poet, essayist, screenwriter, and college professor who has garnered recognitions in Puerto Rico and abroad.(Interview with the Author Retrieved Feb. 14, 2009)*Schomburg, Arturo Alfonso - historian, writer and activist in the United States who researched and raised awareness of the great contributions that Afro-Latin Americans and Americans have made to society.(Robert Knight, Arthur Alfonso Afroborinqueno Schomburg, History Notes, Global African Community, accessed 2 Feb 2009)*Trinidad, Felix - professional boxer, considered as one of the best boxers in that archipelagos history.()*Venegas, Juan Evangelista - boxer, was the first Puerto Rican to win an Olympic medal.(La Olimpiadas)*Warrington, Otilio Bizcocho - comedian and actor, best known for his roles of Bizcocho and Cuca Gomez.(Puerto Rico Popular Culture)*Williams, Bernie - former Major League Baseball outfielder and a professional jazz musician.()See also*of Puerto Ricans*American - Central and South America*Hispanic and Latino Americans - United States of America*of topics related to Black and African peopleReferencesFurther reading* Figueroa, Luis A. Sugar, slavery and freedom in nineteenth century Puerto Rico* Scarano, Francisco A. Sugar and Slavery in Puerto Rico: The Plantation Economy of Ponce, 18001850* Balletto, Barbara Insight Guide Puerto Rico* Ortiz, Yvonne A Taste of Puerto Rico: Traditional and New Dishes from the Puerto Rican Community* de Wagenheim, Olga J. Puerto Rico: An Interpretive History from Precolumbia Times to 1900* Schmidt-Nowara, Christopher Empire and Antislavery: Spain, Cuba and Puerto Rico, 18331874* Soler, Luis M. D. Historia de la esclavitud negra en Puerto RicoExternal links* Sugar and Slavery in Puerto Ricoca:Afroporto-riquenys
4524927
Swillington
Swillington is a small village and parish near Leeds, Yorkshire, England, in the of Leeds borough. It is located east of the Aire and surrounded by streams including Fleakingley Beck. As of 2001, Swillington had a population of about 3,530.(Office for National Statistics: Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts: Leeds Retrieved 2009-09-09)Swillington used to be a mining village until the pit closed, which caused major upsets in the community. Where Primrose Hill pit once stood is now a housing estate with streets taken from the collieries name (Primrose Hill Drive, Primrose Hill Green etc). Most residents commute to the nearby cities of Leeds and Wakefield or the towns of Rothwell and Castleford to work. left|thumb|234px|The Old Church School in SwillingtonSwillington has had quite a strong community spirit in the past which probably dates back to the mining days. However, there has been an influx of people from outside of the village in recent years which has detracted this. The village school, the sporting clubs and the drinking establishments are now the vital links keeping the community together. The village facilities include news agents called the boozeexpress, king and another take away on Alstly lane, St. Marys Church, a Office, one pub called The Swillington, a doctors surgery, two Social Clubs, (The Miners Welfare and the Labour Club), a fish and chip shop, a Horse riding centre, a garden centre, a gun shop, a cafe (baugette me not), sun tanning rooms,a garage, a community centre and a parade of shops. The major roads through the village are Wakefield Road (the A642), Swillington Lane and Astley Lane. There are also recreational grounds surviving from the mining days which are used by local people to play sports such as Football, Cricket, Rugby League and Lawn Bowls. Unfortunately the grandstand of the football pitch has not been maintained in recent times and is currently seriously dilapidated.right|thumb|St.Marys Church in SwillingtonThe Swillington as it is called is not legally a pub because the historical land owners in the area (the Lowther family) decreed that no pub could ever be built on their lands after they had sold them. Consequently The Swillington is a hotel, although its main function is as a licensed bar. Swillington Hall, the seat of the Lowthers was demolished in 1952.Leventhorpe Vineyard is near the village, and has been recommended by Stein.(Our trends in the north - Telegraph) It was until recently the most northerly commercial vineyard in Britain. (There is now one further north, near Malton.) It was established in 1986 by George Bowden.(BBC Inside Out - Weird Weather)Another well recommended local business is Swillington Organic Farm, a fully Association certified farm(Soil Association) on the former Lowther estate which has been frequented by celebrity chefs and has produce that was voted the Best Meat In Yorkshire in 2007.(Yorkshire Post Winners)The local school, Swillington School is a medium sized school with around 270 pupils. Swillington does not have its own school so pupils normally go to either High School (which is a specialist language college) or Community College (which is a specialist performing arts college).YEDL, the local electricity distribution company, has its overhead line school at Swillington where it trains its apprentice linesmen and qualified linesmen in the correct techniques required to work on the electricity network throughout its license area.There are several walks which can be taken in the area including the Country Way which passes through the village. Nearby villages and towns include Austhorpe,  Garforth, Kippax, Castleford, Preston, Preston, Bywater, Oulton, Woodlesford, Rothwell, Colton, common and Methley.  Etymology The name Swillington is derived from Old English swin pig + lah wood + tun farm. The name was recorded as Svilentone in 1147. Historically Swillingtons full title was Swillington-in-Elmet, which refers to the village being part of the former Celtic kingdom of Elmet. However as with many other places the -in-Elmet has been lost in modern times with only a few exceptions such as Barwick-in-Elmet and Sherburn-in-Elmet surviving. Nowadays Elmet only exists as a political constituency. Many local people, mainly of the younger generations have taken to abbreviating Swillington to Swilly. Sport The village boasts four local football teams, Swillington Saints Welfare First and Reserves (Saturday) and Swillington Welfare(Sunday), as well as a bowls team, several snooker teams and Swillington Storm RLFC, a league team.Saints Welfare AFC first team plays in the Yorkshire League Division One. The reserve team plays in the Selby District Football League Division Two and in recent seasons has triumphed in the Scania (North East) Cup in 2005 and finished runners-up in the Hardy Cup in 2009. The third team plays in the Red Triangle Football League.Swillington Welfare plays in Division One of the Leeds Combination Association Football League.Location grid References  External links *Garforth and Swillington Community Website*LS26 Community website* The Ancient Parish of Swillington at GENUKInl:Swillington
4534732
Saleem_Ali
Dr. Prof. Saleem H. Ali (born, 1973) is a American scholar who is Professor of Environmental Studies at the of Vermonts Rubenstein School of Natural Resources, and the director of the for Environmental Diplomacy and Security. He is known for his work on environmental conflict resolution, particularly in the extractive industries and was profiled in magazine in September, 2009 as The Alchemist. Dr. Alis latest book is titled Treasures of the Earth: Need Greed and a Sustainable Future (Yale University Press, October, 2009). In May 2010, he was also chosen by Geographic as an emerging explorer with a profile appearing in the June 2010 issue of Geographic Magazine. In March 2011, he was also selected by the Economic Forum as a Young Global Leader.Research WorkDr. Alis research focuses on the causes and consequences of environmental conflicts and how ecological factors can promote peace. He is also on the adjunct faculty of Universitys  Institute for International Studies and on the visiting faculty for the Nations University for Peace (Rica), where he teaches a course on Indigenous Environment and Development Conflicts. Much of his empirical research has focused on environmental conflicts in the mineral sector. In September 2007, he was chosen as one of eight revolutionary minds by magazine.  Dr. Ali is also a regular commentator for Public Radio and a columnist for Pakistans Express Tribune newspaper and a former columnist for  the Daily Times and has contributed op-ed pieces also for notable international newspapers such as International Herald Tribune and the Boston Globe.Dr. Ali is also a member of the World Commission on Protected areas and the IUCN Taskforce on Transboundary Conservation. He has also been involved in promoting environmental education in madrasahs and using techniques from environmental planning to study the rise of these institutions in his ethnic homeland of Pakistan, under a grant from the States Institute of Peace. In much of his research efforts, Dr. Ali involves a multi-media component, often involving his students in making video documentaries of their empirical work. From 2005 to 2008, he received  two grants from the & Co. Foundation to investigate the environmental and social impact of gemstone and gold mining. Two video documentaries were also produced through this effort and are available for viewing online. He is also completing a report on oil and gas pipelines as a source of cooperation that was researched while based at the Institution research center in Doha, Qatar in 2009.Prior to embarking on an academic career, Dr. Ali worked as an environmental health and safety professional at General Electric. He also served as a consultant for the Environmental Protection Agency, Fish and Wildlife Service, and Canada.  Yet others of his projects included a mining impact prospectus for the Nation and research assistance to Survival.A professional mediator, he has also conducted workshops on consensus-building for private and public interests.  In addition to that, he has been involved in conducting peer reviews of research publications for the World Bank, the Institute for Sustainable Development, the Woodrow Wilson Center, University Press, the Natural Resources Forum, and several scholarly journals.EducationHis past research appointments and internships include field work at the Centre for Rainforest Studies in Queensland, a Baker Foundation Research Fellowship at Business School, and a parliamentary internship at the House of Commons. He has taught courses on environmental planning, conflict resolution, industrial ecology, research methods and technical writing. Professor Ali earned a doctorate in environmental planning from the Institute of Technology, a masters degree (M.E.S.) in environmental law and policy from University, and a bachelors degree in chemistry from University.References*the environment, and indigenous development conflicts, Saleem H. Ali, University of Arizona Press, 2003, ISBN 978-0-8165-2312-2*Parks: Conservation and Conflict Resolution, Saleem H. Ali ed. MIT Press, 2007, ISBN 978-0-262-51198-8*Matters: Indigenous People, The Extractive Industries and Corporate Social Responsibility, Ciaran OFaircheallaigh and Saleem Ali eds. Greenleaf Publications, 2008, ISBN 978-1-906093-16-7*and Education: Conflict and Conformity in Pakistans Madrassahs, Saleem H. Ali, Oxford University Press, 2009, ISBN 978-0-19-547672-9*of the Earth: Need, Greed and a Sustainable Future, Saleem H. Ali, Yale University Press, 2009, ISBN 978-0-300-14161-0External Research Project Links*National Geographic Profile of Saleem H. Ali*Forbes Profile of Saleem H. Ali*Saleem Alis web site at UVM with links to online articles*Brookings Institution profile* Links to list of regular Daily Times articles authored by Dr. Ali*Tropical Gold: Reversal of Fortune in Fiji -- research site and documentary* Gems and the Environment*Madrassa Research in Pakistan*Vermont Mining*Siachen Peace Park project*Environmental Conflict Resolution Research Library
4544137
Makaziwe_Mandela
 parents                    Mandela Evelyn NtokoMakaziwe Mandela (born 1953), known as Maki, is the daughter of former African president Mandela and his first wife Ntoko Mase. She was named after her older sister, born in 1947, who died aged just nine months. Of the four children born to Ntoko and Mandela, Makaziwe is the only one still living.She received her secondary education at Kamhlaba UWC of Southern Africa before going to the of Fort Hare in South Africa. In 1993 she earned a PhD in anthropology at the of Massachusetts, in Amherst, Massachusetts, USA.()She has held senior posts at the of the Witwatersrand and the Bank of Southern Africa, and now heads the Industrial Development Group (IDG), with interests in mining and petroleum.()On November 7 2010, the US embassy in Pretoria announced that the US had sent South Africa an extradition request for Isaac Kwame Amuah, husband of Makaziwe Mandela.  He is wanted for rape in Hartford, Connecticut.()References(
4554207
Institution_of_Mining_and_Metallurgy
Institution of Mining and Metallurgy (IMM) was a British research institution, founded in 1892. In 2002, it merged with The Institute of Materials (IOM) to form the The of Materials, Minerals and Mining (IOM3 or IMMM)
4565378
Australian_contribution_to_the_1991_Gulf_War
Sydney in the Persian Gulf in 1991. Note radar absorbent matting fitted to the side of the ship.Australia was a member of the international coalition which contributed military forces to the 1991 War,  also known as Desert Storm. While the Australian forces did not see combat, they did play a significant role in enforcing the sanctions put in place against Iraq following the invasion of Kuwait, as well as other small support contributions to Operation Desert Storm.OverviewAustralias contribution to the 1991 Gulf War centred around a Naval Task Group which formed part of the multi-national fleet in the Gulf and of Oman, under Operation Damask. In addition, medical teams were deployed aboard a US ship and a naval clearance diving team took part in de-mining Kuwaits port facilities at the end of the war. Following the end of the war Australia deployed a medical unit on Habitat to northern Iraq as part of Provide Comfort. Royal Australian Navy warships were periodically deployed to the Persian Gulf to enforce sanctions against Iraq until the Invasion of Iraq. While there were proposals to deploy other units (including an apparent US request for RF-111 reconnaissance aircraft) these proposals came to nothing and no Army or Australian Air Force combat units were deployed. While some publications suggest that the Australian Special Air Service Regiment (SASR) took part in the war, this is not correct (though the SASR was brought to a higher state of readiness and a very small number of personnel on exchange to the British SAS saw action).Royal Australian NavyOperation Damask I (6 September 1990  3 December 1990)Task Group 627.4* HMAS Adelaide**1 S-70B-2 Seahawk, SITU  and 1 Squirrel, 723 Squadron*HMAS Darwin**1 S-70B-2 Seahawk, SITU and 1 AS-350BA Squirrel, 723 Squadron*HMAS Success (6 September 1990  25 January 1991)**Detachment, 111 Battery (Light), 16th Air Defence Regiment**1 AS-350BA Squirrel, 723 SquadronOperation Damask II (3 December 1990  28 May 1991)Task Group 627.4*HMAS Brisbane (until 26 March 1991)*HMAS Sydney (until 26 March 1991)**1 S-70B-2 Seahawk, SITU, 1 AS-350BA Squirrel, 723 Squadron*HMAS Westralia (26 January 1991  June 1991)**Detachment, 111 Battery (Light), 16th Air Defence RegimentOperation Damask III (13 June 1991  4 September 1991)*HMAS Darwin**1 S-70B-2 Seahawk, 816 Squadron and 1 AS-350BA Squirrel, 723 SquadronOther Deployments*Logistic Support Element (Muscat, Oman)**Logistic Support Detachment Bahrain**Logistic Support Detachment DubaiTask Group Medical Support Elements  (served aboard USS Comfort)*TGMSE 1 (13 September 1990  4 January 1991)*TGMSE 2 (31 December 1990  15 March 1991)*TGMSE 3 (13 January 1991  15 March 1991)Clearance Diving Team 3  operated in the theatre from 27 January 1991 to 10 May 1991. It was involved in mine clearing operations in Kuwait from 5 March to 19 April 1991.Royal Australian Air ForceRAAF C-130 aircraft from No. 36 and No. 37 Squadrons provided a shuttle service between Australia and the Persian Gulf. 707 aircraft from No. 33 Squadron and VIP aircraft from No. 34 Squadron also flew to the Middle East. A small team of RAAF photo-interpreters was posted to Saudi Arabia. Intelligence analysts from the RAAF and Intelligence Organisation were also posted to Saudi Arabia.Australian ArmyThe only formed Australian Army units to participate in the Persian Gulf War were anti-aircraft missile teams from the Air Defence Regiment, Royal Australian Artillery who, equipped with 70 missiles, provided point defence to HMAS Success and HMAS Westralia.  A small number of Australians (mainly Army officers) on exchange to US and British units saw action in the Persian Gulf with those units.Operation Provide Comfort/Operation Habitat (16 May 1991  30 June 1991)The Australian Army and Air Force provided personnel to Habitat, the Australian contribution to Provide Comfort, the delivery of humanitarian aid to Kurds living in the UN-declared exclusion zone in northern Iraq. http://www.defence.gov.au/raaf/history/airforce_history/gulfwar.htm*Australian Medical Unit (Gir-I-Pit , Northern Iraq)**Headquarters and Administrative Support Group**Four Medical Teams**Dental Team**Preventative Medical Section**Engineer SectionReferences*Australian War Memorial. Gulf War 19901991*Commander J.P. Hodgman (editor) (1991). Australias Navy 199192. Australian Department of Defence. Canberra.*Tony Holmes. Tiger Squadron in Australian Aviation. July 2005/No. 218. Phantom Media. Canberra.*David Horner (1992). The Gulf Commitment. The Australian Defence Forces First War.  Melbourne University Press. Melbourne.*David Horner (1995). The Gunners. A History of Australian Artillery. Allen & Unwin. Sydney.* *Peter Londey (2004). Other Peoples Wars. A History of Australian Peacekeeping. Allen & Unwin. Sydney.*Department of Veterans Affairs (2003). Australian Gulf War Veterans Health Study 2003. (specifically, Chapter 2. Australian involvement in the Gulf War)* Royal Australian Air Force  Gulf War and Operation Habitatde lAustralie  la guerre du golfe de 1991
4577825
Economic_history_of_Mexico
HiPre-Spanish ageAustin MoonMan Berry Is KR3WSpanish agehistory of SpainIndependenceFaced with political disruptions, civil wars, unstable currency, and the constant threat of banditry in the countryside, most wealthy Mexicans invested their assets the only stable productive enterprises that remained viable: large agricultural estates. Later generations accused these entrepreneurs of preferring the symbolic wealth of tangible, secure, and unproductive property to the riskier and more difficult but innovative and potentially more profitable work of investing in industry, but the fact is that agriculture was the only marginally safe investment in times of such uncertainty.The seeds of economic modernization were laid under the restored Republic (186776). President Jurez (185772) sought to attract foreign capital to finance Mexicos economic modernization. His government revised the tax and tariff structure to revitalize the mining industry, and it improved the transportation and communications infrastructure to allow fuller exploitation of the countrys natural resources. The government let contracts for construction of a new rail line northward to the States, and in 1873 it finally completed the commercially vital Mexico City-Veracruz railroad, begun in 1837 but disrupted by civil war and the French invasion from 1850 to 1868. Protected by high tariffs, Mexicos industry doubled its production of processed items between 1854 and 1877. Overall, manufacturing grew, though only modestly.During the Porfiriato (18761911), Mexico underwent rapid but highly unequal growth. The economic advisors of President Diaz reversed the countrys decades-long opposition to foreign investment, and by playing off British, French, and U.S. investors and governments against one another, was able to maintain a modicum of national independence. Taking order and progress as its watchwords, the Porfirian dictatorship established political stability and at least an image of social peace and the rule of law. The apparent stability of the Porfiriato brought increased capital investment to finance national development and modernization. Rural banditry was suppressed, at least relative to earlier decades; local customs duties that had hindered domestic trade were abolished; foreign investment in mining boomed; and communications and transportation facilities were modernized as the Mexican railroad system, now owned almost exclusively by foreign investors, expanded from 1,000 kilometers to 19,000 kilometers of track between 1876 and 1910.The economic growth of the Porfirian era was heavily concentrated in the north of the countrythe region with the greatest concentration of mineral resources and, coincidentally, the region closest to the recently acquired Southwestern states of the United States. U.S. entrepreneurs invested heavily in mining, mineral refining operations, and the railroad system that connected northern Mexico with the U.S. As the railroad system improved, and as the population grew in the western U.S., long-distance commercial agriculture became viable, and both U.S. and Mexican entrepreneurs began investing heavily in modernized large-scale agricultural estates along the railroad lines of the north.The technocratic economic advisors of the Porfirio Diaz dictatorship, as well as the foreign investors they invited into the country, were quite satisfied with the advances that the Mexican economy made between 1876 and 1910. Under the surface, however, popular discontent was reaching the boiling point. The economic-political elite scarcely noticed the countrys widespread dissatisfaction with the political stagnation of the Porfiriato, the increased demands for worker productivity during a time of stagnating or decreasing wages and deteriorating work conditions, the cruel repression of workers unions by the police and army, and the highly unequal distribution of wealth. When a political opposition to the Porfirian dictatorship developed in 1910, it quickly gave way to a popular insurrection against the economic foundations of the countrys entrenched inequality. Economic Woes and The Great Depression During the ten-year Mexican Revolution, Mexicos social and economic problems erupted(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/bgn/35749.htm)  To help curb these problems, the Mexican Constitution of 1917 was drafted.( The formation of the Revolutionary Party in 1929 officially ended Mexicos social struggles and Mexican politics was now conducted in peace.(  However, the economy would soon suffer as the Great Depression emerged.Mexicos economic state The Depression brought Mexico a sharp drop in national income and internal demand after 1929, challenging the countrys ability to fulfill its constitutional mandate to promote social equity. Still, Mexico did not feel the effects of the Great Depression as directly as some other countries did.The railroads were nationalized in 1929 and 1930, the nationalization of the petroleum industry in 1938, and the acceleration of land reform, first under President Portes Gil (192830) and then under President Crdenas (193440) in the late 1930s. To foster industrial expansion, the administration of vila Camacho (194046) in 1941 reorganized the National Finance Bank (Nacional Financiera--Nafinsa), which had originally been created in 1934 as an bank. During Camachos term, Mexicos economy officially recovered from the depression and had become more properous than it had ever been.(http://www.emayzine.com/lectures/MEX9.html)  With the beginning of Camachos term in 1940, a nearly 30-year period known as the Mexican miracle had officially begun.(During the 1930s, agricultural production also rose steadily, and urban employment expanded in response to rising domestic demand. The government offered tax incentives for production directed toward the home market. industrialization began to make a slow advance during the 1930s, although it was not yet official government policy. The Mexican Miracle Mexicos inward-looking development strategy produced sustained economic growth of 3 to 4 percent and modest 3 percent inflation annually from the 1940s until the 1970s. This growth was sustained by the governments increasing commitment to primary education for the general population from the late 1920s through the 1940s. The enrollment rates of the countrys youth increased threefold during this period;(Easterlin, R. Why Isnt the Whole World Developed?, Appendix Table 1. The Journal of Economic History Vol. 41 No. 1, 1981) consequently when this generation was employed by the 1940s their economic output was more productive. Additionally, the government fostered the development of consumer goods industries directed toward domestic markets by imposing high protective tariffs and other barriers to imports. The share of imports subject to licensing requirements rose from 28 percent in 1956 to an average of more than 60 percent during the 1960s and about 70 percent in the 1970s. Industry accounted for 22 percent of total output in 1950, 24 percent in 1960, and 29 percent in 1970. The share of total output arising from agriculture and other primary activities declined during the same period, while services stayed constant. The government promoted industrial expansion through public investment in agricultural, energy, and transportation infrastructure. Cities grew rapidly during these years, reflecting the shift of employment from agriculture to industry and services. The urban population increased at a high rate after 1940 (see Urban Society, ch. 2). Growth of the urban labor force exceeded even the growth rate of industrial employment, with surplus workers taking low-paying service jobs.In the years following War II, President Alemn Valdss (194652) full-scale import-substitution program stimulated output by boosting internal demand. The government raised import controls on consumer goods but relaxed them on capital goods, which it purchased with international reserves accumulated during the war. The government spent heavily on infrastructure. By 1950 Mexicos road network had expanded to 21,000 kilometers, of which some 13,600 were paved.Mexicos strong economic performance continued into the 1960s, when GDP growth averaged about 7 percent overall and about 3 percent per capita. Consumer price inflation averaged only 3 percent annually. Manufacturing remained the countrys dominant growth sector, expanding 7 percent annually and attracting considerable foreign investment. Mining grew at an annual rate of nearly 4 percent, trade at 6 percent, and agriculture at 3 percent. By 1970 Mexico had diversified its export base and become largely self-sufficient in food crops, steel, and most goods. Although its imports remained high, most were goods used to expand domestic production. Deterioration in the 1970s Although the Mexican economy maintained its rapid growth during most of the 1970s, it was progressively undermined by fiscal mismanagement and by  a poor export industrial sector and a resulting sharp deterioration of the investment climate. The GDP grew more than 6 percent annually during the administration of President Echeverra lvarez (197076), and at about a 6 percent rate during that of his successor, Lpez Portillo y Pacheco (197682). But economic activity fluctuated wildly during the decade, with spurts of rapid growth followed by sharp depressions in 1976 and 1982.Fiscal profligacy combined with the oil shock to exacerbate inflation and upset the balance of payments. Moreover, President Echeverras leftist rhetoric and actionssuch as abetting illegal land seizures by peasantseroded investor confidence and alienated the private sector. The of payments disequilibrium became unmanageable as capital flight intensified, forcing the government in 1976 to devalue the peso by 58 percent. The action ended Mexicos twenty-year exchange rate.Although significant oil discoveries in 1976 allowed a temporary recovery, the windfall from petroleum sales also allowed continuation of Echeverras destructive fiscal policies. In the mid-1970s, Mexico went from being a net importer of oil and petroleum products to a significant exporter. Oil and petrochemicals became the economys most dynamic growth sector. Rising oil income allowed the government to continue its expansionary fiscal policy, partially financed by higher foreign borrowing. Between 1978 and 1981, the economy grew more than 8 percent annually, as the government spent heavily on energy, transportation, and basic industries. Manufacturing output expanded modestly during these years, growing by 8.2 percent in 1978, 9.3 percent in 1979, and 8.2 percent in 1980.This renewed growth rested on shaky foundations. Mexicos external indebtedness mounted, and the peso became increasingly overvalued, hurting non-oil exports in the late 1970s and forcing a second peso devaluation in 1980. Production of basic food crops stagnated and the population increase was skyrocketing, forcing Mexico in the early 1980s to become a net importer of foodstuffs. The portion of import categories subject to controls rose from 20 percent of the total in 1977 to 24 percent in 1979. The government raised tariffs concurrently to shield domestic producers from foreign competition, further hampering the modernization and competitiveness of Mexican industry. 1982 crisis and recovery The macroeconomic policies of the 1970s left Mexicos economy highly vulnerable to external conditions. These turned sharply against Mexico in the early 1980s, and caused the worst recession since the 1930s. By mid-1981, Mexico was beset by falling oil prices, higher world interest rates, rising inflation, a chronically overvalued peso, and a deteriorating balance of payments that spurred massive flight. This disequilibrium, along with the virtual disappearance of Mexicos reserves--by the end of 1982 they were insufficient to cover three weeks importsforced the government to devalue the peso three times during 1982. The devaluation further fueled inflation and prevented short-term recovery. The devaluations depressed real wages and increased the private sectors burden in servicing its dollar-denominated debt. Interest payments on long-term debt alone were equal to 28 percent of export revenue. Cut off from additional credit, the government declared an involuntary moratorium on debt payments in August 1982, and the following month it announced the nationalization of Mexicos private banking system.By late 1982, incoming President de la Madrid had to reduce public spending drastically, stimulate exports, and foster economic growth to balance the national accounts. Recovery was extremely slow to materialize, however. The economy stagnated throughout the 1980s as a result of continuing negative terms of trade, high domestic interest rates, and scarce credit. Widespread fears that the government might fail to achieve fiscal balance and have to expand the money supply and raise taxes deterred private investment and encouraged massive capital flight that further increased inflationary pressures. The resulting reduction in domestic savings impeded growth, as did the governments rapid and drastic reductions in public investment and its raising of real domestic interest rates to deter capital flight.Mexicos GDP grew at an average rate of just 0.1 percent per year between 1983 and 1988, while inflation on an average of 100%. Public consumption grew at an average annual rate of less than 2 percent, and private consumption not at all. Total investment fell at an average annual rate of 4 percent and public investment at an 11 percent pace. Throughout the 1980s, the productive sectors of the economy contributed a decreasing share to GDP, while the services sectors expanded their share, reflecting the rapid growth of the informal economy and the change from good jobs to bad ones (services jobs). De la Madrids stabilization strategy imposed high social costs: real income per capita fell 5 percent each year between 1983 and 1988. High levels of unemployment and underemployment, especially in rural areas, stimulated migration to City and to the United States.By 1988 (de la Madrids final year as President) inflation was at last under control, fiscal and monetary discipline attained, relative price adjustment achieved, structural reform in trade and public-sector management underway, and the economy was bound for recovery. But these positive developments were inadequate to attract foreign investment and return capital in sufficient quantities for sustained recovery. A shift in development strategy became necessary, predicated on the need to generate a net inflow.In April 1989, President Salinas de Gortari announced his governments national development plan for 1989-94, which called for annual GDP growth of 6 percent and an inflation rate similar to those of Mexicos main trading partners. Salinas planned to achieve this sustained growth by boosting the investment share of GDP and by encouraging private investment through denationalization of state enterprises and deregulation of the economy. His first priority was to reduce Mexicos external debt; in mid-1989 the government reached agreement with its commercial bank creditors to reduce its medium- and long-term debt. The following year, Salinas took his next step toward higher capital inflows by lowering domestic borrowing costs, reprivatizing the banking system, and broaching the idea of a free-trade agreement with the United States. These announcements were soon followed by increased levels of capital repatriation and foreign investment.Due to the financial crisis that took place in 1982, the total public investment on infrastructure plummeted from 12.5% of GDP to 3.5% in 1989. After rising impressively during the early years of Salinas presidency, the growth rate of real GDP began to slow during the early 1990s. During 1993 the economy grew by a negligible amount, but growth rebounded to almost 4 percent during 1994, as fiscal and monetary policy were relaxed and foreign investment was bolstered by United States ratification of the American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA). In 1994 the commerce and services sectors accounted for 22 percent of Mexicos total GDP. Manufacturing followed at 20 percent; transport and communications at 10 percent; agriculture, forestry, and fishing at 8 percent; construction at 5 percent; mining at 2 percent; and electricity, gas, and water at 2 percent (services 80%, industry and mining 12%, agriculture 8%). Some two-thirds of GDP in 1994 (67 percent) was spent on private consumption, 11 percent on public consumption, and 22 percent on fixed investment. During 1994 private consumption rose by 4 percent, public consumption by 2 percent, public investment by 9 percent, and private investment by 8 percent. 1994 crisis and recovery The collapse of the new peso in December 1994 and the ensuing economic crisis caused the economy to contract by an estimated 7 percent during 1995. Investment and consumption both fell sharply, the latter by some 10 percent. Agriculture, livestock, and fishing contracted by 4 percent; mining by 1 percent; manufacturing by 6 percent; construction by 22 percent; and transport, storage, and communications by 2 percent. The only sector to register positive growth was utilities, which expanded by 3 percent.By 1996 Mexican government and independent analysts saw signs that the country had begun to emerge from its economic recession. The economy contracted by a modest 1 percent during the first quarter of 1996. The Mexican government reported strong growth of 7 percent for the second quarter, and the Union Bank of Switzerland forecast economic growth of 4 percent for all of 1996.decReferenceseconmica de Mxico (1940-2006)
4587781
Itakpe
Itakpe is a town in State, Nigeria.IndustryThe Hills in and around the town of Itakpe contain very pure deposits of ore. The National Iron Ore Mining Company is located here. It supplies the steel works of Ajaokuta and Aladja, as well as producing ore for export.() Transport Itakpe is served by gauge railway, however this system is not connected to the gauge railway system that predominates elsewhere in the country. See also * stations in Nigeria* ore in Africa References 
4595342
1880_United_States_Census
File:1880 census Edison.gif|thumb|400px|Edison in the 1880 US censusThe United States Census of 1880 was the tenth States Census conducted by the Census Bureau during June 1880.(1880 Census: Instructions to Enumerators from IPUMS, a website of the Population Center at the of Minnesota)  It was the first time that women were permitted to be enumerators.(From Inkwell To Internet: 1880 from the U.S. Census Bureau) The Superintendent of the Census was Amasa Walker.()Data collectedFive schedules were authorized by the 1880 census act, four of which were filled out by the enumerators:(1880 Census of Population and Housing from the U.S. Census Bureau)*Schedule 1 (Population), which was similar to that used for the previous census, with a few exceptions.(Scanned images of Schedule 1 (both low-resolution and high-resolution) are available from Historical Forms and Questions: 1880 at the U.S. Census Bureau website)*Schedule 2 (Mortality), which used the same inquiries as in 1870, and added inquiries to record status, birth place of parents, length of residence in the United States or territory, and name of place where the disease was contracted, if other than place of death.*Schedule 3 (Agriculture), which greatly expanded inquiries concerning various crops (including acreage for principal crop), and included questions on farm tenure, weeks of hired labor, annual cost for fence building and repair, fertilizer purchases, and the number of livestock.*Schedule 5 (Manufacturing), which expanded to include information on the greatest number of hands employed at any time during the year, the number of hours in the ordinary work day from May to November and November to May, the average daily wages paid to skilled mechanics and laborers, months of full-and part-time operation, and machinery used.Schedule 4 (Social statistics) was the responsibility of experts and special agents, rather than the enumerators.(  The majority of the data came from correspondence with officials of institutions providing care and treatment of certain members of the population. Experts and special agents also were employed to collect data on valuation, taxation, and indebtedness; religion; libraries; colleges, academies, and schools; newspapers and periodicals, and wages.(Special agents were also charged with collecting data on specific industries throughout the country, and included the manufactures of iron and steel; cotton, woolen, and worsted goods; silk and silk goods; chemical products and salt; coke and glass; shipbuilding; and all aspects of fisheries and mining, including the production of coal and petroleum.(Full documentation for the 1880 population census, including census forms and enumerator instructions, is available from  the Public Use Microdata Series.Data availabilityMicrodata from the 1880 population census are freely available through the Public Use Microdata Series. data for small areas, together with compatible cartographic boundary files, can be downloaded from the Historical Geographic Information System.ResultsThe 1880 census determined the resident population of the States to be 50,189,209, an increase of 30.2 percent over the 39,818,449 persons enumerated during the 1870 Census.(Resident Population of the United States from a State of Wyoming website)  The center of United States population for 1880 was in County, Kentucky.The results from the census were used to determine the apportionment for the 48th, 49th, 50th, 51st, and 52nd sessions of the States Congress.The 1880 census took so long (seven years) that the Census Bureau contracted Hollerith to design and build a machine to be used for the next census.(Tabulating machineshttp://www.officemuseum.com/data_processing_machines.htm from a Early Office Museum website http://www.officemuseum.com/)The 1880 census also led to the discovery of the paradox.See also*history of the United StatesReferencesExternal links*1880 Census of Population and Housing Reports  1880Statelor Unite ale Americii din 1880  (1880)
4604431
Colleen_Bawn
For the Boucicault play, please see Colleen BawnColleen Bawn is a village in the province of South, Zimbabwe. It is located about 153 km south-east of Bulawayo on the main Bulawayo-Beitbridge road. According to the 1982 Population Census, the village had a population of 1,427. The village grew up around the Colleen Bawn gold mine which named after by the prospector who pegged the claim in 1895 after an Irish girl with whom he had been acquainted. A mine was opened in 1905 but after the Second World War, Limestone became the focal mining in the area. The limestone is mined by Portland Cement, who operate a cement factory on the site and have been responsible for recent growth in the village.Colleen Bawn is supplied with water from Geelong Weir on the River, fed by releases of water from Dam on the tributary River.
4616844
Dollar_Diplomacy
Dollar Diplomacy is the term used to describe the effort of the States  particularly under President Howard Taft  to further its aims in America and Asia through use of its economic power by guaranteeing loans made to foreign countries.(The Americans History by Winthrop D. Jordan, Miriam Greenblatt , and John S. Bowes) The term was originally coined by President Roosevelt.  It was also used in Liberia, where American loans were given in 1913.  It was then known as a dollar diplomacy because of the money that made it possible to pay soldiers without having to fight; most would agree it was a considerably meager wage.  The term is also used historically by Latin Americans to show their disapproval of the role that the U.S. government and U.S. corporations have played in using economic, diplomatic and military power to open up foreign markets.Dollar Diplomacy in the AmericasThe outgoing President Roosevelt laid the foundation for this approach in 1904 with his Corollary to the Doctrine (under which United States Marines were frequently sent to America) maintaining that if any nation in the Western Hemisphere appeared politically and financially so unstable as to be vulnerable to European control, the United States had the right and obligation to intervene. Taft continued and expanded the policy, starting in Central America, where he justified it as a means of protecting the Canal. In 1909, he attempted unsuccessfully to establish control over Honduras by buying up its debt to British bankers.Dollar Diplomacy was not always peaceful. In Nicaragua, U.S. intervention involved participating in the overthrow of one government and the military support of another. When a revolt broke out in Nicaragua in 1912, the Taft administration quickly sided with the insurgents (who had been instigated by U.S. mining interests) and sent U.S. troops into the country to seize the customs houses. As soon as the U.S. consolidated control over the country, Secretary of State C. Knox encouraged U.S. bankers to move into the country and offer substantial loans to the new regime, thus increasing U.S. financial leverage over the country. Within two years, however, the new pro-U.S. regime faced a revolt of its own; and, once again, the administration landed U.S. troops in Nicaragua, this time to protect the tottering, corrupt U.S. regime. U.S. troops remained there for over a decade.Another dangerous new trouble spot was the revolution-riddled Caribbeannow largely dominated by U.S. interests. Hoping to head off trouble, Washington urged U.S. bankers to pump dollars into the financial vacuum in Honduras and Haiti to keep out foreign funds. The United States would not permit foreign nations to intervene, and consequently felt obligated to prevent economic and political instability. The State Department persuaded four U.S. banks to refinance Haitis national debt, setting the stage for further intervention in the future.Complete overviewFrom 1909 to 1913, President William Howard Taft and Secretary of State Philander C. Knox followed a foreign policy characterized as dollar diplomacy. Taft shared the view held by Knox (a corporate lawyer who had founded the giant conglomerate U.S. Steel) that the goal of diplomacy should be to create stability abroad, and through this stability promote American commercial interests.  Knox felt that not only was the goal of diplomacy to improve financial opportunities, but also to use private capital to further U.S. interests overseas. Dollar diplomacy was evident in extensive U.S. interventions in Cuba and Central America, especially in measures undertaken to safeguard American financial interests and from the United States government in the region. In China, Knox secured the entry of an American banking conglomerate, headed by J.P. Morgan, into a European-financed consortium financing the construction of a railway from Huguang to Canton. In spite of successes, dollar diplomacy failed to counteract economic instability and the tide of revolution in places like Mexico, the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and China.Dollar Diplomacy, known as a policy aimed at furthering the interests of the United States abroad by encouraging the investment of U.S. capital in foreign countries, was initiated by President William Taft. The United States felt obligated, through the Dollar Diplomacy, to uphold economic and political stability. Tafts Dollar Diplomacy not only allowed the United States to gain financially from countries, but also resisted other foreign countries from reaping any sort of financial gain. Consequently, when the United States benefited from other countries, other world powers could not reap those same benefits. Taft maintained an activist approach to foreign policy. On one hand, he was the initiator of what became known as Dollar Diplomacy, in which the United States used its military might to promote American business interests abroad. Taft defended his Dollar Diplomacy as an extension of the Monroe Doctrine. Taft was a major supporter of arbitration as the most viable method of settling international disputes (MultiEducator, Inc.). Quickly becoming a world power, America sought to further her influence abroad. President Taft realized that by instituting Dollar Diplomacy, it would be pernicious to the financial gain of other countries. Thus the United States would benefit greatly.Notes and references* Dollar Diplomacy. Encyclopdia Britannica. 2007. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. 17 Sept. 2007 .* Dollar Diplomacy, 1909-1913 U.S. Department of State. 11 Mar. 2008 .diplomatiyasdiplomacieDolerdiplomaziadolarowado Dlardiplomasisi
4631355
Philip_Collier
 footnotes       Philip Collier (21 April 187318 October 1948) was of Western Australia for nine years, the longest ever term for an Labor Party premier.Philip Collier was born at Woodstock near Melbourne, Victoria on 21 April 1873. The son of a farmer of the same name, he was educated locally but left school at the age of 16. He spent some time mining at Victoria and then in South Wales, and was later construction foreman of the Greater Melbourne Sewage Company at Northcote. On 27 June 1900, he married Ellen Heagney, with whom he would have two sons and two daughters.Collier began to take an interest in the labor movement, joining the Labour Party and becoming founding secretary of the Northcote branch of the Political Labor Council.  He was campaign director for at least three Labour candidates in State and Federal election, including Anstey.In 1904 Collier moved to Australia. He worked in the mines of the Perseverance Goldmining Company for around a year, becoming a member of the Boulder branch of the Amalgamated Workers Association, and vice-president of the Goldfields Trades and Labour Council.On 27 October 1905, Collier was elected to the Australian Legislative Assembly for the seat of Boulder. He would retain the seat until his death nearly 43 years later. He was appointed Minister for Mines and Minister for Railways in the Ministry on 7 October 1911, exchanging the Railways portfolio for Water Supplies on 23 November 1914.  He retained these portfolios until the defeat of the Scaddan government on 17 July 1916. In April the following year, Scaddan resigned from the Australian Labor Party in support of Hughess pro-conscriptionist stance, and on 9 May Collier was elected to take his place as Leader of the Labor Party and therefore Leader of the Opposition.Collier retained the leadership of the Labor party throughout the Liberal and nationalist governments of Frank Wilson, Lefroy, Colebatch and James Mitchell. During this time Collier joined with Curtin and J. J. Simons in leading an anti-conscription campaign. His public comments got him in trouble with censors a number of times, and on one occasion he was fined under the War Precautions Act for making statements likely to discourage recruiting.On 17 April 1924, the Labor party had a landslide election victory, and Collier became Premier, Treasurer and Minister for Forests. The Labor party was defeated by Mitchell in the election of 23 April 1930, whereupon Collier resumed as Leader of the Opposition. He won another term as Premier in the election of 24 April 1933. Simultaneously with the election,  a referendum had been held in which the people of Western Australia had overwhelmingly voted in favour of secession from the Commonwealth of Australia. Although the Labour party opposed secession, Collier nonetheless agreed to act on the result of the referendum by petitioning the British government for secession.  The British governments refusal to act can be partly attributed to the fact that any action taken would have been in opposition to the new Governments wishes.Collier resigned as premier and leader of the Labor party on 19 August 1936, handing over to Willcock. His 19 year term as parliamentary leader of the Australian Labor Party remains the longest ever, as does his 9 year term as Labor premier. Courtney (1956) describes him as the only person Labour sic produced in State politics who could fairly claim to have approached statesmanship. Mitchell and Collier are together credited with achieving an unusual degree of friendship and cooperation between parties during the 1920s and 1930s, which was most clearly demonstrated by Collier recommending Mitchells appointment as Lieutenant-Governor in 1933.Although no longer serving as a minister, Collier remained in parliament for a further twelve years, and was of the House from March 1939.  He died at Mount Lawley on 18 October 1948, and was buried in Cemetery.References***Further readingThe following sources were not used in the writing of this article:* Collier
4637958
Rssing_Uranium_Mine
The Rssing Uranium Mine in Namibia is one of the largest pit uranium mines in the world and is located in the Desert near the town of Arandis, which is 70 kilometres from the coastal town of Swakopmund. Namibias only deepwater harbour, Bay, is 30 kilometres south of Swakopmund. Discovered in 1928, the Rssing mine started operations in 1976 and, in 2005, produced 3,711 tonnes of oxide, becoming the fifth-largest uranium mine with 8 per cent of global output. Namibia is the worlds fourth-largest exporter of uranium.(Rssing (from infomine.com, status Friday 30 September 2005))In the apartheid era, the Rssing uranium mine was the focus for international criticism and protests by anti-apartheid and anti-nuclear groups, mainly in Europe.(Opposition Outside Namibia (from the The Gulliver Rssing Uranium Ltd Dossier)) Recent reports that Rssings uranium might be diverted to Iran, which owns 15% of the shares in the mine, have been denied by the mines management.()Mine operationsExtractionRssing is a low-grade ore body of huge extent. Producing 1,000 tonnes of uranium oxide requires processing of 3 million tonnes of ore, and in 2005 19.5 million tonnes of rock were mined and transported from the open pit to the processing plant. Of those, 12 million tonnes were uranium ore, which in turn required 226,276 tonnes of acid for processing into yellowcake, a powdered uranium concentrate which is the basis for nuclear reactor fuel.(There are some fears that salt and uranium from the mine is endangering the farming industry in the River area. Rssing is working with the Namibian farmers on this issue.(Uranium in groundwater not serious: Roessing - The Namibian, Friday 24 June 2005)()OwnershipShares in the mine are owned 69% by the Tinto Group, 15% by the of Iran (purchased in 1976), 10% by IDC of Africa, 3% by the Government of Namibia (with 51% of voting rights), and 3% by local individual shareholders.() Although Rssings part-ownership by Iran was the cause of controversy in the 1970s and 1980s, the Namibian Government - in power since 1990 - has denied supplying Iran with Namibian uranium, which could be used for weapons.(Iran did not buy uranium from Namibia, govt - Namibian, 1 February 2005)EmploymentAbout 800 people were employed at the mine in 2005, of whom 96% are Namibians. Of these, 160 worked in the open pit, 186 in the processing plant, 267 engineering and 200 administrative personnel.( Most of the workers live in the mining settlement of Arandis or in nearby Swakopmund. Critics have argued that the mine has a history of racial discrimination against its black employees (a common feature of apartheid-era companies), including harsh disciplinary measures, abominable housing conditions at Arandis, and low wages. Even with substantial improvements in the 90s after Namibias independence, blacks and their unions still claim being disadvantaged.(Rossing conditions (from the The Gulliver Rossing Uranium Ltd Dossier))For 2006 and 2007 the mine management has announced investment of about US$112 million, mostly on mining equipment such as haul trucks and shovels, as well as on updating the processing plant. The main target is to increase uranium oxide production to the mines full planned capacity of 4,000 tonnes. Expansion plans are expected to extend the mines life to at least 2016. The possibility of underground mining has been explored in the past, and stated to have the possibility of extending the life of the mine for several further decades.(Origins and development (from the The Gulliver Rossing Uranium Ltd Dossier)) See also * market* mining* ore depositsReferencesExternal links*Rossing Mine (company website)*Rossing Mine (from infomine.com, includes links to detailed info, satellite images, property map)*The Gulliver File: Rossing Uranium Ltd Dossier (from SEA-US, an Australian anti-nuclear initiative (strong negative bias), last revised 1997)de:Rssing-Mine
4647297
Majdanpek
Majdanpek (Cyrillic: , Romanian: Maidan) is a town and municipality in District of Serbia. According to 2002 census, the municipality of Majdanpek had a population of 23,703 people, while the town of Majdanpek had a population of 10,071. HistoryEneolithic excavations exist in Pecina, Praurija, Rog and Roman site of Kamenjar.The town is famous as a copper mine district, since the early 17th century. The origin of the name is based on words majdan (related to Turkish madn, mine) and river Pek - mine on river Pek. Throughout its history, mining development was held by many foreign owners (Czechs, Belgians, Austrians), and was extensively exploited. The town was industrialized in the mid-20th century, by the industrial program supported by SFR Yugoslavias Government of that time, and the personal influence of J.B.Tito (marshal and lifetime prime minister since the end of WWII until 1980). Through the late 20th century, the town was in a period of industrial progress and one of the most developed areas in copper mining and metallurgy. The fall of industrial production was a consequence of Slobodan Miloevis rule and his pions in the town during the 1990s. Now, Majdanpek is struggling to renew industrial production.TourismOne of the best tourist attractions in Majdanpek is Rajkova Pecina (Rajkova_cave),one of the most beautiful caves in Serbia.(http://www.serbiatravelers.org/en/destinations/48-eastern-serbia/480-rajkova-cave/)(http://www.paundurlic.com/priroda/pecina.htm)MunicipalityMajdanpek municipality includes the town of Majdanpek, the town of Milanovac, and the following villages:*Boljetin*Vlaole*Golubinje*Lug*Jasikovo*Klokoevac*Leskovo*Miro*Mosna*Glava*Topolnica*CrnajkaDemographicsIn 2002, the population of the Majdanpek municipality was composed of:* Serbs  19,339 (81.59%) * Romanians (Vlachs)(http://www.romaniuitati.eu/content/view/104/45/)(http://www.timoc.org/54_Bor_12092005/BROSURA.pdf)  2,817 (11.89%)* Others.According to the 2002 census, most of the settlements in the Majdanpek municipality have Serb ethnic majority. The settlement with Romanian ethnic majority is Vlaole. Ethnically mixed settlement with relative Romanian majority is Jasikovo. The number of people of Romanians (Vlachs) origin that live in this area is possibly larger since many of them declare themselves as Serbs.MediaInformation and news from this area can be found at website of Televizija Majdanpek(RTV Majdanpek)See also*of Serbia*Radio television BorReferencesRadio television Borbs:Majdanpekbg:cs:Majdanpekde:Majdanpekfr:Majdanpekhr:Majdanpekit:Majdanpeknl:Majdanpekpnb:pl:Majdanpekpt:MajdanpekSerbiasr:sh:Majdanpeksv:Majdanpek
4656286
Ohlone/ChynowethAlmaden_(VTA)
Ohlone/ChynowethAlmaden is a light rail route operated by Clara Valley Transportation Authority (VTA). It is located in southern Jose, California and only has three stops. It is unknown whether VTA has any plans for further extension of this line; service into the Valley is provided by VTA bus route 13, which also entirely duplicates the light rail service. Ohlone/ChynowethAlmaden is also commonly referred as the Almaden Shuttle.On VTA maps, this line is colored orange, but VTA personnel does not call it the Orange Line, much less refer to it as the Line 900 on official documents. The systems other two lines are the Alum RockSanta Teresa line and the Mountain ViewWinchester line. Twice per day, a train from the Alum RockSanta Teresa line will throughrun from the VTA yards north of Gish station to serve the Almaden Shuttle. The train arrives from the yards early in the morning and leaves for the yards again after the last Almaden Shuttle run of the evening.Ridership on the Almaden Shuttle is notoriously poor. The Almaden Shuttle was proposed for cancellation in 2003 and 2004 as part of massive agency-wide service cuts as a result of the dot-com bust, especially considering that for many Almaden Valley residents who choose transit, VTAs number 13 bus duplicates the Almaden Shuttles service (providing service to downtown San Jose via the Alum RockSanta Teresa line with only one transfer.(agendas minutes/2003/08)(news 2004) If the Almaden Shuttle was canceled, it would have been the first federally funded light rail line to ever cease service, a decision that would have repercussions throughout the country.(Narprail) Ultimately, a decision was made to keep the shuttle and reduce service on parallel bus routes instead.Construction historyThe entire Ohlone/ChynowethAlmaden was constructed at the same time as the original Guadelup line; both lines opened for revenue service in 1991.Once the line begins to parallel Winfield Boulevard, the Almaden line runs on the right of way of an abandoned branch of the Pacific Railroad.  This branch (known as the Lick Branch) once served the quicksilver mining area of New Almaden, located south of San Jose.  In later years, it ended at the current site of the Almaden Light Rail Station and served a lumber yard.  The freight railroad was abandoned in 1981.VTA closed all three stations on this line for renovation in April 2008 to provide level boarding at all doors.(VTA brochures publications)Station stopsNote: * - Oakridge Mall is adjacent to this stationStation facilitiesAll stations along this line have bike stations, and two of the stations, namely Ohlone/Chynoweth and Almaden, also have park-and-ride lots. References (External links*VTA Route Information
4666040
Dannemora,_Sweden
website                Dannemora is an old mining town and a locality situated in Municipality, County, Sweden with 238 inhabitants in 2005.(Dannemora mineImage:Dannemora 1800.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Dannemora mine around 1800Dannemora is the location of an important ore mine, the mine, which formed the basis of the iron industry in Uppland. It provided the raw material for about 20 forges that produced iron for export. In England, iron produced from Dannemora ore, was known as iron, after the port town of regrund. It was considered the best raw material for producing steel by the process.In 1878 a narrow gauge (891 mm) railway was opened to the port in Hargshamn, and ore started to be exported directly. The mine was closed down in 1992. With world market demand rising, the feasibility of reopening the mine is being investigated (as of May 2008).See also* Uppland* rbyhus* Bergslagen* Dannemora town, NYReferencesExternal links* Data on the mine* Picture of the workingsnl:Dannemorano:Dannemorasv:Dannemora
4676437
The_Ship_Who_Sang
The Ship Who Sang (1969) is a fiction novel by McCaffrey, a fix-up of five stories published 1961 to 1969.( Alternatively, The Ship Who Sang is the earliest of the stories, which became the first chapter of the book.(The Ship Who Sang (story). The Internet Speculative Fiction Database.) Finally, the entire Brain & Brawn Ship series (or Brainship or Ship series), written by McCaffrey and others, is sometimes called the Ship Who Sang series by bibliographers, merchants, or fans.(The Ship Who Sang (series). The Internet Speculative Fiction Database.)(Partnership (The Ship Who ...). Amazon. Confirmed 2011-07-27.)(Anne McCaffrey. The Internet Speculative Fiction Database.)(Footer to Dragonsong/Dragonsinger by Anne McCaffrey (for discussion 2005-03-23). Denver Science Fiction & Fantasy Book Club. Confirmed 2011-07-27.)The protagonist of the 1969 novel and all the early stories is a cyborg, Helva, a human being and a spaceship, or brainship. The five older stories are revised under their original titles as the first five chapters of the book and the sixth chapter is entirely new.(The Ship Who Sang (novel). The Speculative Fiction Database.) The fourth and longest story, Dramatic Mission (Analog, Jun 1969), was a finalist for both the Award and the Award in the Best Novella category,(Dramatic Mission. The Internet Speculative Fiction Database.) defined by count 17,500 to 40,000.(McCaffrey dedicated the book to the memory of the Colonel, my father, George Herbert McCaffrey /citizen soldier patriot for whom the first ship sang.endpapers In 1994 she named it as the book she is most proud of.(An Interview with Anne McCaffrey (1994-05). By Richard Karsmakers. Gouda, NL: karsmakers.net. Retrieved 2011-07-21.) Recently she named the first story her best story and her personal favorite work.(Interview with Anne McCaffrey (2000-05-08). Science Fiction and Fantasy World (SFFWorld.com). Confirmed 2011-07-12.)(An Interview With Anne McCaffrey (2004). By Lynne Jamneck. Writing-World.com. Retrieved 2011-07-21.)(Anne McCaffrey: Heirs to Pern (2004-11). Locus Online excerpts from an interview published in Locus: The Magazine Of The Science Fiction & Fantasy Field, Nov 2004. Confirmed 2011-07-27.)During the 1990s McCaffrey made The Ship Who Sang the first book of a series by writing four novels in collaboration with four co-authors, two of whom each later completed one alone. By 1997 there were seven novels, one old and six recent.( They share a fictional premise but feature different cyborg characters.Fictional PremiseThe Brain & Brawn Ship series is set in the future of our universe and in McCaffreys Federated Sentient Planets. The parents of babies with severe physical disabilities but fully developed and exceptionally talented brains may allow them to become shell people rather than to be euthanised. Taking that option, physical growth is stunted, the body is encapsulated in a titanium life-support shell with capacity for computer connections, and the person is raised for one of a number of curious professions. As such, their offspring would suffer no pain, live a comfortable existence in a metal shell for several centuries, performing unusual service for Central Worlds.(Anne McCaffrey, The Ship Who Sang (1969), New York: Ballantine, paperback edition, 25th printing, Dec 1993. Pages 12.)After medication and surgery, general education, and special training, shell children come of age with heavy debts which they must work off in order to become free agents. They are employed as the brains of spacecraft (brainships), hospitals, industrial plants, mining planets, and so on, even cities  in the books, primarily spaceships and cities. A brainship is able to operate independently but is usually employed in partnership with one normal person called a brawn who travels inside the ship much as a pilot would. A brawn is specially trained to be a companion and helper, the mobile half of such a partnership. The nickname is relative: the training is long and intense and the brawns must be brainy people in fact. Commonly the brain and brawn are paired at will and, for a fee, a brainship may terminate an assigned partnership.McCaffrey explained the origin of the brainship premise to SFFworld in a 2004 interview. I remember reading a story about a woman searching for her sons brain, it had been used for an autopilot on an ore ship and she wanted to find it and give it surcease. And I thought what if severely disabled people were given a chance to become starships? So thats how The Ship Who Sang was born.(The short storyAnne McCaffrey (born 1926) had published two stories when she attended her first Writers Workshop in 1959. Afterward she worked on The Ship Who Sang, which was published in The Magazine of Fantasy and Science Fiction (Apr 1961) and included by editor Merril in the anthology, 7th Annual of the Years Best S-F (1962).(The story closes with brainship Helva singing Taps at the funeral service for her brawn Jennan. Decades later, son Todd McCaffrey called it almost an elegy to her father.(Todd McCaffrey, Dragonholder: The life and dreams (so far) of Anne McCaffrey by her son (1999). New York: Ballantine. ISBN 0-345-42217-1. Page 1314.) About that time, she called it her own favorite story, possibly because I put much of myself into it: myself and the troubles I had in accepting my fathers death 1954 and a troubled marriage.( She has also called it the best story I ever wrote, one that still makes her cry.( She chose it to read aloud as Guest of Honor at the annual science fiction convention Eurocon 2007.(Anne McCaffrey reading at Eurocon 2007. YouTube. Uploaded 2007-09-27 with the caption Clip of Anne McCaffrey reading The Ship Who Sang at Eurocon 2007 in Copenhagen september 23th 2007. Confirmed 2011-08-31.) Helvas scored well on encephalographic tests and her parents chose the shell option. She would be a brainship, an elite of her kind.Brainships were, of course, long past the experimental stages in her time. Supposedly, the well-oriented brain would not have changed places with the most perfect body in the universe.(CriticismIn a 2010 essay, The Future Imperfect, disability rights advocate Sarah Einstein criticizes the Brain & Brawn Ship series, representing science fiction in general, for its use of disability.(The Future Imperfect (2010-06). Sarah Einstein. Redstone Science Fiction. Retrieved 2011-07-27.) Regarding one novel in the series, Ship Who Searched (1992) by McCaffrey and Lackey, Einstein observes that in fact we have:many more technological wonders than McCaffrey had imagined. The protagonists in the story would have been much helped, for instance, by a secure communications channel and a GPS system, both of which I have in my battered old car. But most of all, the heroine of this book would have been helped by a future shaped by the actions of todays disability activists. Because, at its heart, this series of books tells the story of the enslavement of extremely promising children who have the bad luck to be bornor in this one case alone, becomedisabled.(The essay serves as a call for reader-submitted stories that incorporate its values. Einstein concludes,:This is not the sort of future disability advocates envision. No, we see a future without stairs. ... How will science help us build fully inclusive communities?:There is too little science fiction written that envisions a fully accessible, universally designed future. And so we are asking you, gentle readers, to do just that.(The editors later posted some clarifying notes by Einstein with the contest details. Evidently a winning essay was published in Redstone Science Fiction, September 2010.(Contest: Towards an Accessible Future (2010-06). Redstone Science Fiction. Retrieved 2011-07-27.)The Early Stories: HelvaThe 1960s stories feature one shell person, Helva, who becomes brainship XH-834.*The Ship Who Sang, Magazine of Fantasy and Science Fiction, Apr 1961*The Ship Who Mourned, Analog, Mar 1966*The Ship Who Killed, Magazine, Oct 1966*Dramatic Mission, Analog, Jun 1969*The Ship Who Dissembled (chapter title), published as The Ship Who Disappeared, If, Mar 1969All but the novella Dramatic Mission are novelettes, short fiction in 7500 to 17,500 words. They were incorporated in The Ship Who Sang novel (1969) as the first five chapters with a new closing chapter or short story, The Partnered Ship.((Both Hugo and Nebula awards define the novella category by word count 17,500 to 40,000. Novels are longer, novelettes shorter. The new sixth chapter is catalogued as a short story, or fiction in fewer than 7500 words. See The Ship Who Sang (novel) at the Speculative Fiction Database.)McCaffrey wrote two more Helva novelettes:(*Honeymoon, original to her collection Off the Unicorn (1977)*The Ship That Returned, original to Horizons: All New Tales from the Greatest Worlds of Science Fiction, ed. Robert Silverberg (1999)Brain & Brawn Ship seriesThe Ship series comprises the Helva stories and six novels published in the 1990s by Books. The Helva stories are the only ones  by Anne McCaffrey as sole author. More than twenty years after the first book, she returned to the premise in her first collaboration with Margaret Ball.(Co-authored by Anne McCaffrey:* PartnerShip (1992) with Margaret Ball. ISBN 0-671-72109-7* Ship Who Searched (1992) with Lackey. ISBN 0-671-72129-1* The City Who Fought (1993) with Stirling. ISBN 0-671-87599-X* The Ship Who Won (1994) with Lynn Nye. ISBN 0-671-87657-0Separately authored:* The Ship Errant (1996) by Jody Lynn Nye. ISBN 0-671-87854-9* The Ship Avenged (1997) by S.M. Stirling. ISBN 0-671-87861-1These six novels were also issued in omnibus editions of two each.((Brain Ships (2003. McCaffrey, Ball & Lackey): The Ship Who Searched and Partnership. ISBN 0-7434-7166-0The Ship Who Saved the Worlds (2003, McCaffrey & Nye): The Ship Who Won and The Ship Errant. ISBN 0-7434-7171-7The City and the Ship (2004, McCaffrey & Stirling): The City Who Fought and The Ship Avenged. ISBN 0-7434-7189-X)NotesReferencesFurther reading*Haraway, Donna. A Cyborg Manifesto: Science, Technology, and Socialist-Feminism in the Late Twentieth Century, in Simians, Cyborgs and Women: The Reinvention of Nature. New York: Routledge, 1991: 149-181.*Hayles, N. Katherine. The Life Cycle of Cyborgs: Writing the Posthuman. In Cybersexualities: A Reader on Feminist Theory, Cyborgs and Cyberspace, edited by Jenny Wolmark, 157-173. Edinburgh: Edinburgh University Press, 1999.External links*
4686992
Economy_of_Bristol
Bristol is a city in south west England.  Its economy has long connections with the sea and its ports.  In the 20th century aeronautics played an important role in the economy, and the city still plays a role in the manufacture of aircraft. Bristol is also a tourist destination, and has significant media, information technology and financial services sectors.(Bristol City Council, Bristol Economy Key Sectors.)StatisticsIn 1998 Bristols GDP was 6.224 billion GBP, and the combined GDP of South Gloucestershire, North Somerset and B&NES was 6.98 billion.  The GDP per head was 15,472, making the citys level of affluence above the UK average at 123%.(Office for National Statistics, 2001. Regional Trends, no. 36. (PDF)) includes hunting and forestry includes energy and construction includes financial intermediation services indirectly measured Components may not sum to totals due to roundingEmployment trendsIn 2000 Bristols unemployment rate was 5.9%, compared to 4.8% for the south west, 5.8% for England, and 6.0% for the United Kingdom.(  In 2005 this was down to 5.2%, compared to 3.6% for the South West and 4.8% for the United Kingdom.(Nomis, 2005. Bristol labour market. (PDF).)In 2000, employment in the former County of Avon area was categorised into the following sectors:(Westec, 2000. Industrial sector of (main) job or self-employment in urban and rural areas (Avon). (PDF).)AeronauticsIn the 20th century, Bristols manufacturing activities expanded to include aircraft production at Filton, six miles (10 km) north of the city centre, by the Aeroplane Company, and aero-engine manufacture by Aero Engines (later Rolls-Royce) at Patchway. The aeroplane company became famous for the War I Bristol Fighter, and Second World War Blenheim and Beaufighter aircraft. In the 1950s it became one of the countrys major manufacturers of civil aircraft, with the Bristol Freighter and Britannia and the huge Brabazon airliner.In the 1960s Filton played a key role in the Anglo-French Concorde supersonic airliner project. Concorde components were manufactured in British and French factories and shipped to the two final assembly plants by road, sea and air. The French assembly lines were in Toulouse in southern France with the British lines in Filton. The very large three-bay hangar built for the Brabazon was available for Concorde production.Image:Concorde on Bristol.jpg|thumb|The last ever flight of any Concorde, 26 November 2003. The aircraft is seen a few minutes before landing on the Filton runway from which she first flew in 1969The French manufactured the centre fuselage and centre wing and the British the nose, rear fuselage, fin and wingtips. The largest proportion of the British share of the work was the powerplant, the Rolls-Royce/Snecma 593. The engines manufacture was split between Aircraft Corporation, Rolls-Royce (Filton) and SNECMA at Villaroche near Paris.The British Concorde prototype G-BSST made its 22 minute maiden flight from Filton to RAF Fairford on 9 April 1969, the French prototype F-WTSS had flown from Toulouse five weeks earlier. Most of the employees of BAC and Rolls Royce, plus a huge crowd, watched from around the airfield. Fairford was chosen as the test airfield for Concorde because the runway at Filton was rejected for test flying, its length was inadequate and there were problems with the slope, and the first 1000 feet (300 m) of the runway at its eastern (A38) end could not be used. However, from the end of 1977, all test flying on the second production aircraft G-BBDG was done from Filton, following the closure of the BAC Fairford test base.In 2003 the two airlines using Concorde (Airways and France) and the company supplying spares and support (Airbus) made the decision to cease flying the aircraft and to retire them to locations (mostly museums) around the world. For the location of all the aircraft see Concorde.On 26 November 2003, Concorde 216 (G-BOAF) made the final ever Concorde flight, returning to Filton airfield to be kept there permanently as the centrepiece of a projected air museum. This museum will include the existing Bristol Aero Collection which is currently kept in a hangar at Kemble Airfield, forty miles (60 km) from Filton. This collection includes a Britannia aircraft.The major aeronautical companies in Bristol now are BAE Systems, Airbus and Rolls-Royce, both based at Filton.Another important aeronautical company in the city is Balloons, a manufacturer of air balloons. Annually, in August, the city is host to the International Balloon Fiesta, one of Europes largest hot air balloon events.Bristol CarsThe Bristol Aeroplane Company diversified into car manufacturing in the 1940s, building luxury hand-built cars at their factory in Filton, under the name Cars. The car manufacturer became independent from the Bristol Aeroplane Company in 1960. The company ceased manufacturing in March 2011 when it called in the receivers.()PortThe Bristol Port Company operates the surviving commercial docks of the of Bristol at Portbury and Avonmouth.  Since privatisation in 1991 trade has increased to 12 million tonnes per annum, with a revenue exceeding 75 million,() making it the fifteenth largest port in the UK, tenth largest in England.( ) The main trades are forest products, cars, containers, bulk (coal, grain, animal feeds, aggregates), liquids (petroleum, aviation fuel, molasses, fruit juice), metals, and fresh produce. Plans are in place to massively increase capacity by building a new deepsea container terminal capable of handling ships up to 12,000 TEU.()()TobaccoAs one of the largest ports in the UK, Bristol became very important in the tobacco trade.  It is still the headquarters of Tobacco Group, the worlds fourth largest international tobacco company.  Imperials group headquarters is in Upton Road, Southville and its international cigar factory is on the Winterstoke Road.Coal miningDuring the 19th century coal mining was important in parts of Bristol providing the energy for manufacturing industry. The coal field is part of a large area which stretched from the coalfield into Gloucestershire. All pits have now closed.References
4689566
Estate_of_Rodriquez_v._Drummond_Co.
Estate of Rodriquez v. Drummond Co.(Estate of Rodriquez v. Drummond Co., 256 F. Supp. 2d 1250 (N.D. Ala. 2003)) was a lawsuit filed in the States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama by relatives of dead relatives that were employees of Company.Sintraminergetica has sued Company for allegedly conspiring with paramilitary groups to exterminate the union.  This suit was brought after years of claims of abuses ranging from forcing potential employees to undergo detector tests to reveal their political affiliation as a condition of employment, to the assassination of union leaders, their displacement from the mining zones, and accusations made against them of being guerilla supporters.  On March 12, 2001, Valmore Locarno Rodriguez and Victor Hugo Orcasita Amaya, the President and Vice President of the union local, were taken from a company bus en route from the mine to their homes.  Locarno was assassinated with two shots in the head in front of his coworkers. Over the protests of the workers, Orcasita was taken away in a truck.  The next day his body was found, with obvious signs of torture.  On October 5 of the same year, under similar circumstances, Gustavo Soler, the unions new president, was taken from a bus, taken away in a pick-up, tortured, and killed.  His body was found on October 7 by people from the area.The court ruled that Sintraminergetica has standing to bring suit against Drummond and the Colombian managers of the company under the Tort Statute.  The crimes that claimed to be committed violated ILO pacts and agreements, and were also against humanity and crimes, according to U.S. and International Law.On June 21, 2007 the News reported that the US district judge presiding over the case in Birmingham dismissed the wrongful death charges against Drummond. The company is still being tried for a war crimes claim filed under the U.S. Alien Tort Statute.On July 26, 2007 jurors in the case found Drummond not liable for the deaths of the three union representative and rejected the claims by Sintraminergetica that the company aided in the deaths.(Jury rejects claims that Drummond to blame in Colombia killings al.com)Drummond Company claims it has brought many jobs to the country and a level of stability to mostly poor coregimiento of La Loma, Cesar which has suffered civil unrest and corruption scandals. The company established a village for the mine workers and their families to live. The Drummond family established a school in the town for the mine workers children.ReferencesExternal links* Website in reference to the case.
4698672
Algernon_Moreing
Algernon Henry Moreing (30 September 1889 &ndash; 22 October 1974) was a British politician who served as of Parliament for Buckrose 1918-22, and Camborne 1922-23 and 1924-29.Moreing was educated at School and College, Cambridge. He became a partner of the mining engineers firm, Messrs Berwick, Moreing & Co.Moreing was first elected to Parliament in 1918 for Buckrose in Yorkshire, switching to Camborne in Cornwall in 1922. He was a Liberal who supported the Coalition government led by Lloyd George. At the 1923 election, following Liberal unification, he stood as the official Liberal candidate. However, he lost his seat to an Independent Liberal candidate, Jones. After the election he supported Winston Churchills efforts to revive the Conservative/Liberal coalition. He fought the 1924 election as a Constitutionalist and regained his seat from Jones. After the election he took the Conservative whip. In 1929, standing as a Conservative, he lost it once again in to Jones. Moreings brother, Moreing, was also a mining engineer and Member of Parliament. References * External links *
4711736
Penn_Central_Transportation_Co._v._New_York_City
Penn Central Transportation Co. v. New York City,  was a landmark United States Supreme Court decision on compensation for takings. Events Leading Up to the CaseThe New York City Landmarks LawThe New York City Landmarks Law was signed into effect by Mayor F. Wagner, Jr., in 1965. This law was passed after New York citizens grew concerned over the loss of culturally significant structures such as the Pennsylvania Station, demolished in 1963. The Landmarks Laws purpose is to protect structures that are significant to the city and still retain their ability to be properly used. This law is enforced by the York City Landmarks Preservation Commission.(About LPC)Railroad DeclineUse of railroad systems saw its peak in the 1920s, and began to falter in the mid to late 1930s.  War II revitalized use of the railway systems in the early 1940s and brought the industry back to prior success.  While this period saw nearly half of Americans using the railroad systems, by the late 40s there was once again a steep decline in railroad use.  This put many of the railroad companies out of business and left others to find new ways to increase revenue. (www.politeia.co.uk/Portals/0/Final_Green.pdf)(Brief History of the U.S. Passenger Rail Industry)Early Proposals to Replace Grand Central TerminalIn 1954 York Central Railroad began to look at proposed plans to replace the Central Terminal.  Early designs by Zeckendorf and M. Pei included an ambitious 80-story,  tower that would be over  taller than the State Building. (New York Architecture Images- Grand Central Terminal)  None of the early designs ever made it past the sketch phase and for the time being all plans to replace Grand Central Terminal were abandoned.The Pan Am BuildingIn 1958 Erwin S. Wolfson created proposals to replace Grand Central Terminals six-story office building just north of the Terminal.  Erwin S. Wolfson developed the project in the early 1960s with the assistance of the architects Roth and Sons, Gropius and Belluschi.(Tishman Speyer)  The Am Building was completed in 1963 and bought Grand Central Terminal more time away from proposed reconstructions.  New York Central Railroad Merger with Pennsylvania RailroadDespite increased office space, New York Central Railroad found itself facing bankruptcy in 1967 due to continued decline in railway use.  Railroad found itself in a similar position after the offices built following the demolition of Pennsylvania Station were no longer bringing the company sufficient income.  In 1968 New York Central Railroad merged with Pennsylvania Railroad to create the Central Railroad company.  The newly formed Penn Central began to look into updating the uses of the Grand Central Terminal in order to increase revenue and save the company from financial straits. (Penn Central Railroad Historical Society)Plans to Replace Grand Central TerminalIn mid 1968 Penn Central Railroad unveiled two designs by Breuer one of which would potentially be built atop Grand Central Terminal.  The first design (Breuer I) was a 55-story tall office building to be constructed on top of Grand Central.  This building was to be cantilevered above the existing structure allowing Grand Central to maintain its facade.  The second design (Breuer II) called for the demolition of one of the sides of Grand Central in order to create a unified facade for a new 53-story office building.  Both designs were submitted to the York City Landmarks Preservation Commission after the structures met city zoning laws. (Grand Central Station, New York, United States of America (Reed & Stern, Warren & Wetmore)- American Architecture)NYC Landmarks Preservation Commissions RejectionsUpon reviewing the submitted designs for Grand Central Terminal the Landmarks Preservation Commission rejected the plans on September 20th, 1968.  Penn Central then filed for a of Appropriateness for both proposals but was again denied.  The Landmarks Preservation Commission summarized their reason for rejecting both plans:Breuer I  Breuer IIThe Landmarks Preservation Commission did offer Penn Central the Transfer of Development Rights (TDRs) which would allow them to sell the air space above Grand Central Terminal to other Developers for their own use.  Penn Central felt this was not enough to be considered compensation for the loss of their land use. ()The Supreme Court CasePenn Central Files Suit with New York Court of AppealsAfter the New York City Landmark Preservation Commission rejected Penn Centrals proposals for new use of the Grand Central Terminal, Penn Central filed a suit with the York Court of Appeals against the city.  In the suit they claimed the citys enactment of the Landmark Preservation Law was a taking under the Fifth Amendment and Fourteenth Amendment.  Because Penn Central felt the City had taken their land and air rights away, they were looking to receive compensation for the Citys actions.  The New York Court of Appeals ruled that Penn Central was not due just compensation on the grounds that the city had not taken the use of the property out of the hands of Penn Central.  It was determined that Penn Central could maintain previous use of the site without any damaging effects.  Penn Central appealed the ruling, which led to the Supreme Court Case.The Supreme Court DecisionOn April 17, 1978 the case was argued in front of the States Supreme Court.  As previously mentioned, Penn Central stated that the Fifth and Fourteenth Amendment should uphold their rights and allow for the citys actions to be considered a regulatory taking.  If it was ruled that these actions were indeed a taking, then Penn Central would be entitled to just compensation for their loss.  The city further bolstered their argument stating that Penn Central had shown no proof that they could not continue to use the current property to their benefit.  On June 26, 1978 the Supreme Court, like the New York Court of Appeals, found that the citys restrictions on land use for Grand Central Terminal was not a taking and therefore did not require just compensation.   Cited Cases and Reasoning in the Decision*The Court stated that there was no set formula in dealing with the Fifth Amendment and affirmed that cases involving the rights of said Amendment varied depending on the situation.**v. United States, 438 U.S. 104, 124 (1960)**States v. Central Eureka Mining Co., 357 U.S. 155, 168  (1958)*While Penn Station cited several cases in which air right restrictions led to compensation, the Court did not consider the citations applicable to the case because Grand Central Terminal was a landmark site.**v. Hempstead, 369 U.S. 590 (1962)**v. Fox, 274 U.S. 603 (1927)*In the debate of the air space above Grand Central Terminal being taken from the city, the Court cited several cases in which the land owners were indeed due just compensation.**States v. Causby, 328 U.S. 256  (1946)***In this case a farmer was no longer able to use his land as a chicken farm due to air traffic that was developed just over the farm.  Because this  destroyed the farmers present use, it was ruled a taking.**Co. v. United States, 260 U.S. 327  (1922)***The United States military installed a firing range within earshot of a land owner.  This new found noise disruption was found to be a taking.**With these citations in mind, the Court pointed out that in the present case, no current use of the land was being damaged as a result of the restrictions.*Penn Central cited Euclid v. Ambler Realty Co. showing how blocking the industrial usage of the land cost Realty Co. dearly.  The Supreme Court found the case irrelevant, stating that the restrictions imposed on zoning and land use are the same across the entire city, and not varying as in the case of Euclid.**of Euclid, Ohio v. Ambler Realty Co., 272 U.S. 365  (1926)**v. Fox, 274 U.S. 603, 608  (1927)**v. Swasey, 214 U.S. 91  (1909)The case is perhaps best summarized in Section II-C of the Opinion of the Court.The dissent says that regulations in the nature of zoning are acceptable because they produce a net gain for society over a broad swath of affected properties and property owners.  Instead, the dissent argues in this case that there is a big net transfer from the station owners to the people of the city who are meant to benefit.  The dissent says its not fair to have the entire burden of preserving Grand Central fall on its owners.  That cost is the opportunity cost of not developing the airspace over the terminal.See also*of United States Supreme Court cases, volume 438*Central Terminal*Central*Preservation Council, Inc. v. Tahoe Regional Planning Agency (2002) References  Bibliography **Schlichting, Kurt C. Grand Central Terminal: Railroads, Engineering, and Architecture in New York City. Baltimore, MD: JHU P, 2001.*PENN CENTRAL TRANSP. CO. V. NEW YORK CITY. No. 438 U.S. 104. US Supreme Court. 26 June 1978.*Grand Central Station. Archiseek. 2007. The American Institute of Architects. 12 May 2008 .*Duerksen, Christopher J. A Handbook on Historic Preservation Law. Baltimore, MD: Conservation Foundation, 1983. 351-376.*Davis, Christina R. About LPC. New York City Landmarks Preservation Commission. 2008. Government of New York City. 11 May 2008 .*Grand Central Terminal. New York Architecture Images. 10 May 2008 .*Kayden, Jerold S. Celebrating Penn Central. Planning Magazine June 2003.*Miller, Julia H. A Laypersons Guide to Historic Preservation Law. Washington D.C.: National Trust, 2000. 22-27.*Penn Central History. Penn Central Railroad Historical Society 4 Apr. 2008. TainWeb.Com. 15 May 2008 .*Schlichting, Kurt C. Grand Central Terminal: Railroads, Engineering, and Architecture in New York City. Baltimore, MD: JHU P, 2001.*The MetLife Building. Tishman Speyer. 2008. 12 May 2008 .*Weiss, Lois. Air Rights Case Headed for Supreme Ct. Review - Transferable Development Rights for Grand Central Terminal, New York, New York. Real Estate Weekly 4 May 1994.*Boyd, Lydia, and Lynn Pritcher. Brief History of the U.S. Passenger Rail Industry. Duke University Libraries: Digital Collection. 25 Jan. 2008. Duke University. 10 May 2008 .*Dukeminier, Jesse, James E. Krier, Gregory S. Alexander, & Michael H. Schill.Property 6th ed. Aspen Publishers. New York: 2006.
4721808
Rothschild_banking_family_of_France
The Rothschild banking family of France was founded in 1812 in Paris by James Mayer Rothschild (17921868). James was sent there from his home in Frankfurt, Germany by his father, Amschel Rothschild (17441812). Wanting his sons to succeed on their own and to expand the family business across Europe, Mayer Amschel Rothschild had his eldest son remain in Frankfurt, while his four other sons were sent to different European cities to establish a financial institution to invest in business and provide banking services. Endogamy within the family was an essential part of the Rothschild strategy in order to ensure control of their wealth remained in family hands.Involvement in finance and industryThrough their collaborative efforts, the Rothschilds rose to prominence in a variety of banking endeavors including loans, bonds and trading in bullion. Their financing afforded investment opportunities and during the 19th century they became major stakeholders in large-scale mining and transport ventures that were fundamental to the rapidly expanding industrial economies of Europe. In partnership with M Rothschild & Sons of England they owned de Fer du Nord railway in France that ran from their du Nord station in Paris to the Channel. In addition, the Rothschilds in France became leaders in the wine growing industry. By the later part of the 19th century oil was fast becoming an important commodity and the French bank was heavily involved in oil exploration in the Baku area of present-day Azerbaijan through their company, the Caspian and Black Sea Oil Industry and Trade Society established in 1883. Their investment proved to be a lucrative one and by the turn of the century, the various oil companies in Azerbaijan were producing more oil than any country in the world. In 1898 the Rothschilds established the Mazut Transportation Society that developed a fleet of oil tankers operating in the Sea. In 1911, the Dutch Shell company purchased the Azerbaijan oil fields from the Rothschild family.The Revolution in 1789 brought positive changes for French Jews, resulting in their full emancipation in 1791. In 1806, Napoleon I ordered the convening of a Grand Sanhedrin in Paris and in 1808 he organized the Consistoire central des Isralites de France, the administrative agency for all French Jews. The consistorial system made Judaism a recognized religion and placed it under government control. This Consistoire has been a functioning body ever since, except under the Nazi occupation of France during War II. By tradition, the Central Consistoire has had a member of the Rothschild family as its President.Jacob Mayer Rothschild, the youngest son, settled in Paris in 1812 where his name Jacob was translated to James. In 1817, he formally created the bank, de Rothschild Frres whose partners were brothers Amschel of Germany, James of France, Carl of Naples, Nathan of England and Salomon of Austria. Highly successful as lenders and investors, the Paris operation also became bankers for I of Belgium. In 1822 the influential James and his four brothers were awarded the hereditary title of Baron by Emperor Francis I of Austria. Following the Revolution of 1830 that saw Louis-Philippe come to power in France, James de Rothschild put together the loan package to stabilize the finances of the new government and a second loan in 1834. In recognition of his services to the nation, King Louis-Philippe elevated James to a Grand Officer of the of Honor. In his book, The House of Rothschild (vol. 2) : The Worlds Banker: 1849-1999, Ferguson wrote that according to the records, in 1815 the capital of the Paris banking house James Mayer de Rothschild founded amounted to 55,000; by 1852 the figure was 3,541,700 and just ten years after his death, 16,914,000. There is a theory that before Louis-Phillipe came to power the Rothschilds were fronting for the House of Orleans. A major portion of the business has consisted of selling French government bonds to French investors through London to protect their anonymity. There was a general perception on the part of the French that otherwise their government might unilaterally reset terms.No French fortune was more likely to face the problem than the younger branch of the royal family. The theory follows that when the Orleanists came to power they became less provident but by then the Rothschilds had numerous other clients.The de Rothschild Frres banking business was passed down to ensuing generations. Run by his sons Gustave and Alphonse, during the War the bank put together a syndicate that raised the five billion francs the country was obliged to pay Prussia under the terms of the 1871 armistice. James Mayer de Rothschild had stipulated that the three branches of the family descended from him always be represented. For the next two generations that was the case but in 1939, Alphonse de Rothschild and cousin Robert Philippe, incompatible with their other cousin de Rothschild, bought out his share. Maurice went on to be enormously successful and, having inherited a fortune from the childless de Rothschild of the Naples branch of the family, he moved to Geneva, Switzerland and perpetuated the new Swiss branch of the family.In 1873 de Rothschild Frres in France and M Rothschild & Sons of London joined with other investors to acquire the Spanish governments money-losing Rio Tinto copper mines. The new owners restructured the company and turned it into a profitable business. By 1905, the Rothschild interest in Rio Tinto amounted to more than 30 percent. In 1887, the French and English Rothschild banking houses lent money to, and invested in, the Beers diamond mines in Africa, becoming its largest shareholders.Changes in the heads of government, war, and other such events affected the familys fortunes both for their benefit and to their detriment. However, the interests of all Rothschild banking families across Europe were adversely impacted in a very major way by three historical events: 1) the of 1848, 2) the Great Depression of the 1930s and 3) Nazism of the late 30s through War II. For the French branch, the 1981 nationalization by the newly elected socialist government of Mitterrand was an equally significant disaster(http://www.rothschildarchive.org/ib/?doc/ib/articles/guidePintro)(http://www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org/jsource/biography/GuyRothschild.html).In 1953, future of France, Pompidou, joined de Rothschild Frres and from 1956-1962 he served as General manager. In 1962, the Rothschilds created Imtal (now named Imerys), an umbrella company for their considerable mining ventures. Headed by de Rothschild, Imtal looked outward, investing in Britain and the States, a move that put him on the December 20, 1963 cover of Time. In the 1960s, government reform of banking regulations ended the legal distinction between banques daffaires and deposit banks and in 1967 de Rothschild Frres became Banque Rothschild, a limited-liability company.A part of the success of the bank that James Rothschild built was through the funding of loans to European governments. This sector of banking began to decline during the latter part of the 19th century following the introduction of new methods for government financing. By 1980, the Paris business employed about 2,000 people and had an annual turnover of 26 billion francs ($5 billion in the currency rates of 1980).(RPT-French banker Guy de Rothschild dies aged 98 Reuters, Thu 14 Jun 2007 12:26 pm EDT) But then the Paris business suffered a near death blow in 1981 when the Socialist government of Mitterrand nationalized and renamed it Europenne de Banque. In 1987 a successor company called Rothschild & Cie Banque was created by Ren de Rothschild who was joined by his half-brother Edouard de Rothschild and cousin Eric de Rothschild.(Baron Guy de Rothschild, Leader of French Arm of Bank Dynasty, Dies at 98 The New York Times, Thu 14 Jun 2007) Capitalized at only $1 million and starting with just three employees, they soon built their tiny investment bank into a major competitor in France and continental Europe. In 2003, following the retirement of Sir Evelyn de Rothschild as head of N M Rothschild & Sons of London, the English and French firms merged into the Group Rothschild under the leadership of David Ren de Rothschild. In 2006, the French banking division expanded into Brussels, Belgium.Decline and Rise of economic powerBy the end of the 19th century, the introduction of national taxation systems had ended the Rothschilds policy of operating with a single set of commercial account records resulting in the various houses gradually going their own separate ways. The system of the five brothers and their successor sons had all but disappeared by War I. (House of Rothschild : Moneys Prophets: 1798-1848 by Niall Ferguson. Viking Press (1998) ISBN 0-670-85768-8) However, the tax relative to the bank and corporate assets was far more detrimental long-term because it restricted growth at a time when publicly owned banks were expanding rapidly with huge resources raised on capital markets.  In the 1930s, their vast railroad holdings were nationalized and in 1940 the Nazis seized their bank. Then, after having the bank restored to them at the end of the war, in 1981 the bank Rothschild Freres was nationalized by the French socialist government of President Mitterrand. (New York Times - June 14, 2007)The York Times wrote that the Rothschilds grossly misjudged the opportunities directly across the Atlantic and quoted Robert de Rothschild as saying that while the family had been in business for 200 years we never seized the initiative in America and that was one of the mistakes my family made. (New York Times - December 4, 1988)The Rothschilds TodayBoth the British and the French branches emerged from the Second World War with new generations of the family at the helm. Historic partnership ties between the two branches were revitalized, leading to a complete merger in 2003.An enduring entrepreneurial spirit saw business survive nationalization in France and the development of an international network of branch offices.The Rothschilds created their first hedge funds in 1969, and, in the 1980s, strengthened its position as a world leader in investment banking. Today, Rothschild has over 4000 private clients in 90 countries and is a global private bank.(http://privatebankingandtrust.rothschild.com/timeline.aspx?id206&mid201)  Rothschild provides a comprehensive range of services to individuals, governments and corporations worldwide. (http://privatebankingandtrust.rothschild.com/page.aspx?id92)Involvement in wine growingThe second French branch was founded by de Rothschild (18121870). Born in London, he was the fourth child of the founder of the British branch of the family, Mayer Rothschild (17771836). In 1842, he married de Rothschild (18251899), daughter of James Mayer de Rothschild and in 1850, they moved to Paris, where he was to work for his father-in-laws bank. However, in 1853 Nathaniel acquired Chteau Brane Mouton, a vineyard in Pauillac in the Gironde dpartement. Nathaniel Rothschild renamed the estate Mouton Rothschild: it would become one of the best-known wine labels in the world.In 1868, Nathaniels uncle/father-in-law, James Mayer de Rothschild, acquired the prestigious neighboring vineyard, Chteau Lafite.PhilanthropyThe French Rothschilds and members of the other branches in Europe were all major contributors to causes in aid of the Jewish people. However, many of their philanthropic efforts extended far beyond Jewish ethnic or religious communities. They built hospitals and shelters for the needy, supported cultural institutions and were patrons of individual artists. Their donation of works of art to various galleries has been the largest of any family in history. At present, a research project is underway by The Rothschild Archive (http://www.rothschildarchive.org/ib/?doc/ib/articles/project1pd) in London to document the familys philanthropic involvements.Family membersNotable Rothschild family members in France include:* James de Rothschild (18271905)* Caroline de Rothschild (18651909)* de Rothschild (b. 1965)* de Rothschild (18511903)* Ephrussi de Rothschild (18641934)* de Rothschild (b.1963)* de Rothschild (18251899)* de Rothschild (19141999)* Ren de Rothschild (b. 1942)* Adolphe de Rothschild (19261997)* James de Rothschild (18451934)* Etienne de Rothschild (b. 1957)* Alphonse de Rothschild (18681949)* Robert de Rothschild (19172007)* de Rothschild (19021945)* de Rothschild (19092007)* Jacqueline Rebecca de Rothschild (b. 1911)* Armand de Rothschild (18781957)* Mayer de Rothschild (17921868)* de Rothschild (19271996)* de Rothschild (b. 1932)* Robert de Rothschild (b. 1946)* de Rothschild (19081976)* de Rothschild (19021988)* de Rothschild (b. 1935) * James de Rothschild (18351864)Rothschild propertiesAll branches of the Rothschild banking family are famous for their art collections and a number for their palatial estates. Among the Rothschild properties in France were:* des Vaux de Cernay - Cernay-la-Ville, Yvelines* Clarke - Listrac-Mdoc, Gironde* de Ferrires - Ferrires-en-Brie, Seine-Maritime* des Fontaines - Chantilly, Oise (Website)* Chteau Lafite - Pauillac, Gironde* de Laversine - Saint-Maximin, Oise* des Laurets - Puisseguin, Gironde* Chteau Malmaison - Moulis-en-Mdoc, Gironde* de Montvillargenne - Gouvieux, Oise* Mouton Rothschild - Pauillac, Gironde* de la Muette - Paris, now the home of the for Economic Co-operation and Development* Rothschild dArmainvilliers - Gretz-Armainvilliers, Seine-et-Marne* Rothschild, Boulogne-Billancourt - Boulogne-Billancourt, Hauts-de-Seine* de Meautry - Calvados* Lambert - Paris* de Marigny - 23 avenue de Marigny, Paris. Today, a Presidential residence used for State visitors.* de Pontalba - 41 Rue du Faubourg-Saint-Honor, Paris. Today, the residence for the from the United States* Salomon de Rothschild - Paris* Talleyrand Building - Paris. Today, the embassy of the United States  (building website)* de Vallire - Mortefontaine, Oise* Ephrussi de Rothschild - Saint-Jean-Cap-Ferrat on the Cte dAzur* Rothschild, Cannes - Cannes on the RivieraSee also* banking family of Austria* banking family of England* banking family of Germany* banking family of Naples* banking family of Switzerland References  Literature * The Rothschilds; a Family Portrait by Morton. Atheneum Publishing (1962) ISBN 1-56836-220-X (1998 reprint)* The Rothschilds, a Family of Fortune by Cowles. A. Knopf (1973)  ISBN 0-394-48773-7* Baron James: The Rise of the French Rothschilds by Muhlstein. International Publications (1983) ISBN 0-86565-028-4* Mouton Rothschild: Paintings for the Labels 1945-1981 by de Rothschild. Brown and Company (1983) ISBN 0-8212-1555-8* The Whims of Fortune: The Memoirs of Guy de Rothschild by de Rothschild House (1985) ISBN 0-394-54054-9* A History of the Jews by Paul M. Johnson (1987) HarperCollins Publishers ISBN 5-551-76858-9* Rothschild: The Wealth and Power of a Dynasty by Wilson. Scribner, London (1988) ISBN 0-684-19018-4* House of Rothschild : Moneys Prophets: 1798-1848 by Ferguson. Press (1998) ISBN 0-670-85768-8  * The House of Rothschild (vol. 2) : The Worlds Banker: 1849-1999 by Ferguson. Publishing Co. (1999) ISBN 0-7567-5393-7* Writings by of Florida professor of history W. Paul (http://www.rothschildarchive.org/ib/articles/AR2005Chardin.pdf)*Edmond de Rothschild, The Man who redeemed the Holy Land (Edmond de Rothschild. Lhomme qui racheta la Terre sainte) (http://www.antebiel.com/EN/books/rothchild.html) by Antbi (2003) du Rocher ISBN 2-268-04442-4 * The Rothschild Gardens by Louisa Rothschild (1996) N. Abrams, Inc.  ISBN 0-8109-3790-5* Le Sang des Rothschild  by Valynseele and Mars is a 576-page genealogical study beginning with Mayer Amschel Rothschild down through both male and female lines. (2004) LIntermdiaire des Chercheurs et Curieux, Paris* The Life and Legacy of Baroness Betty de Rothschild  by Schor (2006) Lang Publishing ISBN 0-8204-7885-7 Notes External links * Website for groupe LCF Rothschild (English language)* Website for Rothschild & Cie Banque (French language)* French government Archives for de Rothschild Frres (French language)* The Rothschild Archive - an international centre in London for research into the history of the family. (English language)* The Musical Associations of the Rothschild Family by Henriette de Rothschild
4726573
Utah_Construction_Company
thumb|200px|Utah Construction Logo from 1900 - 1958thumb|200px|Utah Construction Logo from 1959 - 1970thumb|200px|Utah International Logo after acquisition by BHPThe Utah Construction Company was a construction company founded by Orson Wattis, Jr, Warren L. Wattis and William. H. Wattis in 1900.HistoryA short four years after its founding, the company was awarded the contract to build the River rail route between Oakland and Salt Lake City. This $60 million contract was challenging, but after five years, very profitable. The River route was completed for the Pacific Railroad in 1911. The Utah Construction Company thrived, and soon captured a large share of the tunneling, grading, and track projects for the rapidly expanding railroads in the mountain west. Seeing the end of railroad expansion, the Wattis brothers looked for ways to diversify their construction risks. In 1917, Utah Construction Company was awarded the $7 million  Dam contract, a controversial project that impounds the River in the Hetchy Valley of Californias Sierra Nevada mountains. Success with the Dam convinced the Wattis brothers to bid on more dam projects. In 1922, Utah Construction Company formed a partnership with the Morrison-Knudsen Company of Boise. With Crowe as the chief engineer, the MK-UC partnership successfully built dams throughout the American west. In 1931, the Brothers spearheaded the formation of Companies to build the Dam which was the largest construction project ever tackled by the US Government up to the time. Including the Dam, Utah Construction built 58 dams between 1916 and 1969. In 1942, several weeks after the Japanese bombing of Pearl Harbor, Japanese warships were sighted in Alaskan waters. No overland route existed connecting Alaska with the contiguous United States. This situation spurred the American Government to plan and build the Alaskan Army Highway, later renamed the Highway. US Army and civilian contractors, led by Utah Construction, completed the  arctic highway in just seven months and 17 days. In the 1950s, Utah Construction diversified into mining, becoming the Utah Construction & Mining Co. These ventures included the Marcona iron mine in Peru, the Lucky Mc uranium mine in Wyoming, and the Navajo coal mine and power plant in the Corners area of the United States southwest. Utah Construction also diversified into land development. Through a series of acquisitions, Utah Construction purchased the Moraga Ranch in the San Francisco Bay Area. This 3,000 acre (12 km) ranch was developed into California. Utah also filled in  of the Francisco Bay to create much of the area of present day south shore in Alameda.The 1960s brought further military construction with Utah Construction the lead contractor for the US Minuteman Missile hardened silos throughout the States.In 1969, Utah Construction went public on the York Stock Exchange with the symbol UC. The construction business was sold to the Fluor Corporation in 1969. In 1971, the company changed its name to Utah International. The company merged with the Electric company in 1976 for a value of over $2.2 billion, the largest corporate merger in history at that time. It continued to operate as a distinct entity however, and in 1984 GE sold the company to BHP.The Wattis brothers received funding from the David Eccles, Thomas D. Dee, Clark and James Pinegree family.  Thomas D. Dee served as the first president of Utah Construction until his death in 1905, David Eccles served as the second president, and David Eccels son Stoddard Eccles became the president of Utah Construction concurrently with being the Federal Reserve Chairman. The shareholders and A. Browning acquired the shares of Warren Wattis in the 1940s. The Brothers original $8,000 investment, in 1900, grew to $478 million after the 1976 acquisition by the Electric company. References * Sessions, Gene & Sterling. Utah International, A Biography of a Business. ISBN 0-9722102-0-2 External links * Stewart Library Collection, Utah Construction
4736211
History_of_Idaho
The history of Idaho is an examination of the human history and social activity within the state of Idaho, a geographical area in the Northwest area near the west coast of the United States and Canada. Other associated areas include southern Alaska, all of Columbia, Washington, Oregon, western Montana and northern California and Nevada.Humans may have been present in the Idaho for 14,500 years. Excavations in 1959 at Wilson Butte Cave near Falls, Idaho revealed evidence of human activity, including arrowheads, that rank among the oldest dated artifacts in North America.() American Indian tribes predominant in the area in historic times included the Perce and the Coeur dAlene in the north; and the Northern and Western Shoshone and Bannock peoples in the south. European exploration  refnum66000312Idaho was the last of the 50 states explored by people of European descent. The and Clark expedition entered present-day Idaho on August 12, 1805, at Pass. The first expedition to enter southern Idaho is believed to be a group led by Price Hunt, which navigated the River while attempting to blaze an all-water trail westward from Louis, Missouri, to Oregon, in 1811 and 1812. At that time, approximately 8,000 Native Americans lived in the region.trading led to the first significant incursion of Europeans in the region.(Idaho Fur Trade) Andrew Henry of the Missouri Fur Company first entered the Snake River plateau in 1810. He built Fort Henry on Henrys Fork on the upper Snake River, near modern Anthony, Idaho. However, this first American fur post west of the Mountains was abandoned the following spring. The British-owned Bay Company next entered Idaho and controlled the trade in the Snake River area by the 1820s. The West Companys interior department of the Columbia was created in June, 1816, and Donald Mackenzie was assigned as its head.  Mackenzie had previously been employed by Hudsons Bay and had been a partner in the Fur Company, financed principally by Jacob Astor.  During these early years, he traveled west with a Pacific Fur Companys party and was involved in the initial exploration of the Salmon River and Clearwater River. The company proceeded down the lower Snake River and Columbia River by canoe, and were the first of the Overland Astorians to reach Fort Astoria, on January 18, 1812.Under Mackenzie, the North West Company was a dominant force in the fur trade in the Snake River country. Out of Fort George in Astoria, Mackenzie led fur brigades up the Snake River in 1816-1817 and up the lower Snake in 1817-1818. Nez Perce, established in July, 1818, became the staging point for Mackenzies Snake brigades. The expedition of 1818-1819 explored the Blue Mountains, and traveled down the Snake River to the Bear River and approached the headwaters of the Snake.  Mackenzie sought to establish a navigable route up the Snake River from Fort Nez Perce to the Boise area in 1819. While he did succeed in traveling by boat from the Columbia River through the Grand Canyon of the Snake past Canyon, he concluded that water transport was generally impractical.  Mackenzie held the first rendezvous in the region on the Boise River in 1819. Despite their best efforts, early American fur companies in this region had difficulty maintaining the long distance supply lines from the Missouri River system into the Intermountain West.  However, Americans H. Ashley and Smith expanded the Saint Louis fur trade into Idaho in 1824. The 1832 trappers rendezvous at Hole, held at the foot of the Three Tetons in modern Teton County, was followed by an intense battle between the Ventre and a large party of American trappers aided by their Perce and Flathead allies.The prospect of missionary work among the Native Americans also attracted early settlers to the region. In 1809, House, the first white-owned establishment and first trading post in Idaho, was constructed. In 1836, the Reverend H. Spalding established a Protestant mission near Lapwai, where he printed the Northwests first book, established Idahos first school, developed its first irrigation system, and grew the states first potatoes. Whitman and Hart Spalding were the first non-native women to enter present-day Idaho.Mission, the oldest standing building in Idaho, was constructed at Cataldo by the Coeur dAlene and missionaries. In 1842, Father De Smet, with Fr. Nicholas Point and Br. Charles Duet, selected a mission location along the Joe River. The mission was moved a short distance away in 1846, as the original location was subject to flooding. In 1850, Ravalli designed a new mission building and Indians affiliated with the church effort built the mission, without nails, using the wattle and daub method. In time, the Cataldo mission became an important stop for traders, settlers, and miners. In addition to acting as a place for rest from the trail, the mission offered needed supplies and was a working port for boats heading up the dAlene River.During this time, the region which became Idaho was part of an unorganized territory known as Country, claimed by both the United States and Great Britain. The United States gained undisputed jurisdiction over the region in the Treaty of 1846, although the area was under the de facto jurisdiction of the Government of Oregon from 1843 to 1849. The original boundaries of Territory in 1848 included all three of the present-day Pacific Northwest states and extended eastward to the Divide. In 1853, areas north of the 46th Parallel became Territory, splitting what is now Idaho in two. The future state was reunited in 1859 after Oregon became a state and the boundaries of Washington Territory were redrawn.While thousands passed through Idaho on the Trail or during the gold rush of 1849, few people settled there. In 1860 the first of several rushes in Idaho began at Pierce in present-day Clearwater County. By 1862, settlements in both the north and south had formed around the mining boom.Settlement Mormon Settlers Mormon missionaries founded Lemhi in 1855, but the settlement did not last.  The first organized town in Idaho was Franklin, settled in April 1860 by pioneers who believed they were in Territory; although a later survey determined they had in fact crossed the border.() Mormon pioneers would go on to establish the majority of historic and modern communities in Southeastern Idaho, with Mormon settlers reaching areas near the current-day Teton National Park in Wyoming.:See Corridor. English Large numbers of English immigrants settled in what is now the state of Idaho in the late 19th and early 20th century, many before statehood.  The English found they had more property rights and paid less taxes than they did back in England.  Many came from humble beginnings and would rise to prominence in Idaho such as R. Gooding who was from a rural working class background but was eventually elected to be the seventh governor of the state.   Today people of English descent make up nearly one fifth of the entire state of Idaho and form a plurality in the southern portion of the state.(Sharing the Dream: White Males in a Multicultural America By Dominic J. Pulera.)(Reynolds Farley, The New Census Question about Ancestry: What Did It Tell Us?, Demography, Vol. 28, No. 3 (August 1991), pp. 414, 421.)(Stanley Lieberson and Lawrence Santi, The Use of Nativity Data to Estimate Ethnic Characteristics and Patterns, Social Science Research, Vol. 14, No. 1 (1985), pp. 44-6.)(Stanley Lieberson and Mary C. Waters, Ethnic Groups in Flux: The Changing Ethnic Responses of American Whites, Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science, Vol. 487, No. 79 (September 1986), pp. 82-86.)IrishA significant number of people from Ireland immigrated to North America after the Potato Famine, and some migrated west searching for land for agriculture. Many ended up in Montana and southern Idaho. Because the Catholic Church already had a presence in the northern and eastern portions of the state, many Irish Catholics settled in Boise as well as in Montana.AfricanYork, the helper of Lewis and Clark on their expedition to the Pacific, was the first recorded African American in Idaho. There is a significant African American population made up of those who came west after the abolition of slavery. Many settled near Pocatello and were ranchers, entertainers, and farmers. Although free, many blacks suffered discrimination in the early-to-mid-late 20th century. The black population of the state continues to grow as many come to the state because of educational opportunities, to serve in the military, and for other employment opportunities. There is a Black History Museum in Boise, Idaho, with an exhibit known as the Invisible Idahoan, which chronicles the first African-Americans in the state. Blacks are the fourth largest ethnic group in Idaho according to the 2000 census. Mountain Home, Boise, and Garden City have significant African-American populations.However, many major cities, such as Boise, have a small population of African Americans.(http://www.us-city-home.com/oklahoma/boise-city/public_school/boise-city-hs_400486000167.html)BasqueThe people from the peninsula in Spain and southern France were traditionally shepherds in Europe. They came to Idaho, offering hard work and perseverance in exchange for opportunity.(Historical Overview: Basque Americans in the Columbia River Basin) One of the largest Basque communities in the US is in Boise,() with a Basque museum (Basque Museum and Cultural Center) and festival held annually in the city.Chinese settlementChinese in the mid-19th century came to America through Francisco to work on the railroad and open businesses. They suffered discrimination due to the Anti-Chinese League in the 19th century which sought to limit the rights and opportunities of Chinese emigrants.() Today Asians are third in population demographically after Whites and Hispanics. Chinese made up 33 percent of Idahos population in the 1880s. Idaho Territorythumb|150px|left|Seal of Idaho Territory 1863-1866thumb|150px|Seal of Idaho Territory 1866-1890On March 4, 1863, President Lincoln signed an act creating Territory() from portions of Territory and Territory with its capital at Lewiston. The original Idaho Territory included most of the areas that later became the states of Idaho, Montana and Wyoming, and had a population of under 17,000. Idaho Territory assumed the boundaries of the modern state in 1868 and was admitted as a state in 1890.StatehoodWhen President Harrison signed the law admitting Idaho as a state on July 3, 1890, the population was 88,548. George L. Shoup became the states first governor, but resigned after only a few weeks in office to take a seat in the States Senate.Miners uprisingsDuring its first years of statehood, Idaho was plagued by labor unrest in the mining district of Coeur dAlene. In 1892, miners called a strike which developed into a shooting war between union miners and company guards. Each side accused the other of starting the fight. The first shots were exchanged at the Frisco mine in Frisco, in the Burke-Canyon north and east of Wallace. The Frisco mine was blown up, and company guards were taken prisoner. The violence soon spilled over into the nearby community of Gem, where union miners attempted to locate a Pinkerton spy who had infiltrated their union and was passing information to the mine operators. But agent Siringo escaped by cutting a hole in the floor of his room. Strikers forced the Gem mine to close, then traveled west to the Bunker Hill mining complex near Wardner, and closed down that facility as well. Several had been killed in the Burke-Canyon fighting. The National Guard and federal troops were dispatched to the area, and union miners and sympathizers were thrown into bullpens. Hostilities would again erupt at the Bunker Hill facility in 1899, when seventeen union miners were fired for having joined the union. Other union miners were likewise ordered to draw their pay and leave. Angry members of the union converged on the area and blew up the Bunker Hill Mill, killing two company men.In both disputes, the unions complaints included pay, hours of work, the right of miners to belong to the union, and the mine owners use of informants and undercover agents. The violence committed by union miners was answered with a brutal response in 1892 and in 1899.Through the Federation of Miners (WFM) union, the battles in the mining district became closely tied to a major miners strike in Colorado. The struggle culminated in the December 1905 assassination of former Governor Steunenberg by Harry Orchard (also known as Albert Horsley), a member of the WFM. Orchard was allegedly incensed by Steunenbergs efforts as governor to put down the 1899 miner uprising after being elected on a pro-labor platform.Pinkerton detective McParland conducted the investigation into the assassination. In 1907, WFM Secretary Treasurer Big Bill Haywood and two other WFM leaders were tried on a charge of conspiracy to murder Steunenberg, with Orchard testifying against them as part of a deal made with McParland. The nationally publicized trial featured Senator William E. Borah as prosecuting attorney and Darrow representing the defendants. The defense team presented evidence that Orchard had been a Pinkerton agent and had acted as a paid informant for the Creek Mine Owners Association. Darrow argued that Orchards real motive in the assassination had been revenge for a declaration of martial law by Steunenberg, which prompted Orchard to gamble away a share in the silver mine that would otherwise have made him wealthy.Two of the WFM leaders were acquitted in two separate trials, and the third was released. Orchard was convicted and sentenced to death. His sentence was commuted, and he spent the rest of his life in an Idaho prison.Mining in IdahoMining in Idaho(Idaho Bureau of Mines and Geology, Pamphlet 68, by W. W. Staley of the University of Idaho. For the United States Statistical Abstract.) was a major commercial venture, bringing a great of attention to the state. From 1860-1866 Idaho produced 19% of all gold in the United States, or 2.5 million ounces.Most of Idahos mining production, 18601969, has come from metals equating to $2.88 billion out of $3.42 billion, according to the best estimates. Of the metallic mining areas of Idaho, the Coeur dAlene region has produced the most by far, and accounts for about 80% of the total Idaho yield.Mining regionsSeveral othersBasin, River Valley, Stibnite, Blackbirg, and Owyheerange considerably above the other big producers. Atlanta, Bear Valley, Bay Horse, Florence, Gilmore, Mackay, Patterson, and Yankee Fork all ran on the order of ten to twenty million dollars, and Elk City, Leesburg, Pierce, Rocky Bar, and Warrens make up the rest of the major Idaho mining areas that stand out in the sixty or so regions of production worthy of mention.A number of small operations do not appear in this list of Idaho metallic mining areas: a small amount of gold was recovered from Goose Creek on Meadows; a mine near Cleveland was prospected in 1922 and produced a little manganese in 1926; a few tons of copper came from Fort Hall, and a few more tons of copper came from a mine near Montpelier. Similarly, a few tons of lead came from a property near Bear Lake, and lead-silver is known on Creek near Elba. Some gold quartz and lead-silver workings are on Ruby Creek west of Elk River, and there is a slightly developed copper operation on Deer Creek near Winchester. Molybdenum is known on Roaring River and on the east fork of the Salmon. Some scattered mining enterprises have been undertaken around Soldier Mountain and on Squaw Creek north of Montour.Progressive policiesIdaho proved to be one of the more receptive states to the progressive agenda of the late 19th century and early 20th century. The state embraced progressive policies such as suffrage (1896) and prohibition (1916) before they became federal law. Idahoans were also strongly supportive of Silver. The pro-bimetallism Populist and Silver Republican Parties of the late 1890s were particularly successful in the state.thumb|left|All female survey crew - Minidoka Project, Idaho 1918After statehood, Idahos economy began a gradual shift away from mining toward agriculture, particularly in the south. Older mining communities such as Silver City and Rocky Bar gave way to agricultural communities incorporated after statehood, such as Nampa and Twin Falls. Dam on the Snake River, completed in 1905, allowed for the formation of many agricultural communities in the Valley region which had previously been nearly unpopulated.Meanwhile, some of the mining towns were able to reinvent themselves as resort communities, most notably in Blaine County, where the Sun Valley ski resort opened in 1936. Others, such as Silver City and Rocky Bar, became towns.1950s to presentIn the north, mining continued to be an important industry for several more decades. The closure of the Bunker Hill Mine complex in Shoshone County in the early 1980s sent the regions economy into a tailspin. Since that time, a substantial increase in tourism in north Idaho has helped the region to recover. Coeur dAlene, a lake-side resort town, is a destination for visitors in the area.Beginning in the 1980s, there was a rise in North Idaho of a few right-wing extremist and survivalist political groups, most notably one holding Neo-Nazi views, the Nations. These groups were most heavily concentrated in the Panhandle region of the state, particularly in the vicinity of Coeur dAlene. Although Idaho is a conservative state politically, the vast majority of its residents reject such ideologies.In 1992 a stand-off occurred between Marshals, the F.B.I., and separatist Weaver and his family at their compound at Ridge, located near the small, northern Idaho town of Naples. The ensuing fire-fight and deaths of a U.S. Marshal, and Weavers son and wife gained national attention, and raised a considerable amount of controversy regarding the nature of acceptable force by the federal government in such situations.In 2001, the Aryan Nations compound, which had been located in Lake, Idaho, was confiscated as a result of a court case, and the organization moved out of state. About the same time Boise installed an impressive stone Human Rights Memorial featuring a bronze statue of Frank and quotations from her and many other writers extolling human freedom and equality. A recent poll found that Idaho citizens accept people of different cultures and ethnicities. The demographics of the state have changed. Due to this growth in different groups, especially in Boise, the economic expansion surged wrong-economic growth followed the high standard of living and resulted in the growth of different groups. Nuclear fallout from Nevada test site Image:US fallout exposure.png|thumb|Per capita thyroid doses in the continental United States of iodine-131 resulting from all exposure routes from all atmospheric nuclear tests conducted at the Nevada Test SiteIdaho was one of several states that received the brunt of nuclear fallout from tests at the Test Site during the 1950s and 1960s. Reports published by the U.S. government indicate that many Idaho citizens perished and continue to suffer as a result of these tests. As of September 2007, there were continuing efforts in the U.S. congress to compensate victims.See also* of the Western United States*of people from Idaho*evolution of IdahoReferences***** Dale, Harrison Clifford, The Ashley-Smith Explorations and the Discovery of A Central Route to the Pacific, 1822-1829. Cleveland: Arthur H. Clark, 1918.External links* Idaho History* Clayton Historyja:
4750422
Schladming
Schladming is a small mining town in the state of Styria, that is now very popular with tourists. It has become a large ski resort and has held various skiing competitions recently. The shopping area has lots of cafes, restaurant and a variety of shops and caters well for tourists.As of 2001, the town has a population of 4,570.RecreationSkiingThe main mountain is the Planai. It has a six seater gondola from bottom to top with a middle station in between. The Planai consists of many red runs and the competition black, there are many blue slopes for beginners but generally the Planai is an intermediate to expert mountain. The Hochwurzen is the other main mountain in Schladming. It has three main red runs off the four man chair lift and a sledge run. This mountain is better suited to more experienced boarders and skiers. It is a good mountain for snowboarding as it has a lot of jumps and a few rails and boxes. There is a fifteen man gondola which goes in groups of five to the top. There are many enjoyable off-piste runs on both the Hochwurzen and the Planai. There are two main ski operators, who currently operate on Planai, Hochwurzen and surrounding mountains the first being Tritscher Ski School, named after Franz Tritscher. The other is Hopl taking its name from the two mountains, HOchwurzen and PLanai.In 2008, Schladming was selected to organize the Alpine World Ski Championships 2013.Non-Winter monthsThe surrounding mountains are renowned for climbing and hiking and the country side and forest is ideal for cycling. In the summer there are downhill runs for toboggans and go karts with runs of 7 km. There is also a large outdoor swimming complex at the sport complex. The UCI Mountainbike Worldcup has taken place in Schladming since 2004. From September 12. to 14. 2008 there were the Worldcup Final in Downhill, Cross and Cross Country.In 2010 the Mountainbike Worldcup in Schladming was relocated to Leogang due to some large construction works for the Ski World Championships in 2013.()AccommodationThere are hotels ranging from 1* to 4* catering for a vast range of needs.TransportThere is a special bus service that runs up and down the Planai and surrounding mountains throughout the year. There are many ski lifts on the mountains some especially for small runs.Twin cities*Felletin, France since 1960 *Wetzlar, Germany since 1974 *Furano, Japan since 1977 External links * Mountainbike Worldcup in Schladming* Pictures of Schladming*Schladming at CommonsReferencesbar:Schlamingbs:Schladmingbg:da:Schladmingde:Schladminget:Schladmingfr:Schladminghr:Schladmingit:Schladmingnl:Schladmingno:Schladmingpl:Schladmingru:sk:Schladmingsl:Schladmingsr:sv:Schladmingwar:Schladming
4759978
La_Oroya
footnotes               La Oroya is a city of about 33,000 people on the River Mantaro in central Peru(Toponimia de La Oroya).  It is situated on the Altiplano some 176 km east-north-east of the national capital, Lima, and is capital of the Province.  La Oroya is the location of a smelting operation that earned the town a place on the Institutes 2007 report, The Worlds Worst Polluted Places.(The Worlds Worst Polluted Places, the Blacksmith Institute ) History Settlement at La Oroya dates to about 10,000 years BC. In 1533, the Spanish established a small settlement and started small-scale mining for metals in the area, but isolation and transport difficulties hindered  extraction. At the time of the War of Independence, the areas strategic position made it a center of guerrilla activity; one of the decisive battles of the war, Chacamarca (Junin), took place nearby, and Bolvar passed through the town after the battle.  In 1861, the settlement was named San Jeronmo de Callapampa and in 1893 it became La Oroya. In 1925, La Oroya was designated the capital of the Yauli province and finally, in 1942, it was elevated to city status(Bienvenidos a La Oroya, Historia).Mining in the area developed gradually, and did not greatly expand until the railway from Lima to La Oroya was completed in 1893. The railway, an extraordinary feat of engineering, was planned by the Polish railway builder Malinowski, and crosses the El Ticlio Pass, where it reaches an altitude of 4781 meters. Until the recent completion of the Railway it was the highest gauge railway in the world(The Central Railway of Peru).The smelter, now the citys main employer, was established in 1922 by the American Cerro de Pasco Corporation, who ran it until 1974 when Cerro was nationalized and became part of the state owned Empresa Minera del Centro del Peru S A, otherwise known as Centromin(The Doe Run Company What We Do  ).  In 1993, the Peruvian government decided to privatize Centromin. In 1997, 99.97% of the La Oroya smelter was acquired by Doe Run Peru, a subsidiary (now an affiliate) of the Group, for approximately US$247 million.  The acquisition consisted of a capital contribution to Centromins Metaloroya of US$126.5 million and a purchase price payment of US$120.5 million(Doe Run S-4, 1998). Doe Run Peru also bought the Cobriza copper mine for US$7.5 million to maintain concentrate supplies to the copper smelter(Doe Run S-4/A, 1998).The SmelterFirst to be built was the copper smelter in 1922, followed by the lead smelter in 1928 and the zinc refinery in 1952.  Annual capacities were 70,000 tonnes copper, 122,000 tonnes lead and 45,000 tonnes zinc, although the need to keep below emission limits and temperature inversions that trap gases over the city, smelter and surrounding area have tended to keep production below these levels(Doe Run 10 K 2006).A number of local mines produce dirty concentrates that contain metallic impurities that cannot be separated by the flotation process.  Over the years, the La Oroya metallurgists have devised methods to separate and recover these metals as byproducts, and the three main smelters have become heavily integrated for this purpose. La Oroya is one of few smelting operations in the world with this capability. As a result, La Oroya produces gold and silver (mainly from refinery residues), antimony, trioxide, bismuth, cadmium,  indium, selenium, tellurium, acid and oleum(Doe Run 10K 2001 ) This technology has helped the operation to reduce the emission of some noxious and toxic metals; however, the integrated nature of the plant has hindered the modification of individual parts of the plant.With the acquisition of La Oroya, Doe Run inherited a complicated and partially semi-obsolescent smelter complex. The operation had suffered from disrepair, previous owners had invested little in modernization or clean operations. As a result of years of pollution, the hills immediately around the smelter became completely denuded, the river became more toxic, and the health of area inhabitants suffered. Residents have been found to have alarmingly high concentrations of lead in their blood and in the drinking water, and many have bronchial troubles. A 1999 study (conducted two years after Doe Runs acquisition) showed high levels of air pollution, with 85 times more arsenic, 41 times more cadmium, and 13 times more lead than amounts generally considered safe.(Poisoned city fights to save its children).Pollution When Doe Run bought La Oroya, it took over Centromins PAMA, (Programa de Adecuacin y Manejo Ambiental or Environmental Remediation and Management Program), an environmental contract requiring environmental remediation measures. The measures required new sulfuric acid plants, elimination of fugitive gases from the coke plant, use of oxygenated gases in the anodic residue plant, a water treatment plant for the copper refinery, a recirculation system for cooling waters at the smelter, management and disposal of acidic solutions at the silver refinery, an industrial wastewater treatment plant for the smelter and refinery, a containment dam for the lead mud near the zileret plant, a granulation process water at the lead smelter, an anode washing system at the zinc refinery, management and disposal of lead and copper slag wastes, domestic waste water treatment, and domestic waste disposal. However, Doe Run Peru has been indemnified by Centromin (and guaranteed by the Peruvian Government) against any environmental liability arising out of Centromins prior operations.(  Doe Runs original commitment to this program was US$107 million but it is now expected that it will cost at least US$244 million(Doe Run announce lower airborne lead emissions).  The company caused trouble in 2004, particularly among non-governmental organizations, when it said that it would not be able to complete the PAMA by the deadline of 2006, and asked for an extension. On Dec 29, 2004, the Peruvian Government issued Supreme Decree No. 046-2004-EM, which recognized that exceptional circumstances may justify an extension of the time to complete one or more projects within the scope of a PAMA.  Doe Run Peru was granted such an extension by the Ministry of Energy and Mines on May 29, 2006(.  The exact reason for the request was not given but appears to have been a combination of cash flow availability, additional PAMA requirements and additional upgrading.  This includes the replacement of the reverbatory furnace with a submerged lanced reactor furnace at a cost of US$57 million that will reduce gas volume and provide a much richer sulfur dioxide off gas that is far more suitable for sulfuric acid production (Doe Run 10Q/A 2006)Conditions of the extension include the payment into a trust account each month of revenue sufficient to cover the next months estimated expenditure on the PAMA.  Also the company has been forbidden to make any payment to  any shareholder or affiliate that might affect completion of the PAMA.  Renco has confirmed that it understands that Doe Run Peru would lose the benefit of the PAMA extension if any such payment is made(The PAMA has since been modified to include the reduction of stack and fugitive emissions to meet air quality objectives, certain additional pollution controls and the protection of public health including the reduction of lead levels in blood and special health programs for children and expectant mothers(On February 5, 2008 Doe Run Peru reported that state health officials and OSINGERMIN, an independent Peruvian regulatory agency had confirmed that the quality of the Yauli or Mantaro Rivers was no longer impacted by the smelters liquid discharges. However, the company also stated that the river was still polluted by mining and other operations upstream.(Doe Run reports river discharges within permissible ranges)Other improvements have been achieved and on March 19, 2008, the company announced a 60% improvement in particulate emissions, a 61.7% reduction in air lead levels, 72% reduction in cadmium levels and 81% decrease in arsenic levels and the virtual elimination of polluting liquid discharges from the smelter into the Mantaro and Yauli rivers(Doe Run Peru Reviews Environmental Certification ).Despite advancements in other areas, dioxide emissions reached record levels in August 2008(The Peruvian Times ).  However, according to the Wall Street Journal, the lead smelter acid plant became operational in October 2008.  This will reduce sulfur dioxide emissions significantly.(Doe Run Peru Inaugurates New Lead Acid Plant in La Oroya Plant. Will bring substantial reduction in La Oroya plant emissions).  Further improvement can be expected when the copper smelter acid plant is completed, which is expected in October 2009.  Thereafter the main sources of sulfur dioxide from the smelter should be under control.  Nevertheless, none of these expected results have been attained in reality. The indicators shown above were designed by Doe Run and have not been certified by any official institute. Despite revenues that exceed US$150 million in each year of operations, after four months of lower price in minerals, Doe Run has asked the Peruvian Government for a bailout. No other company from the same activity has done that. But this request surprisingly coincides with a new request from Doe Run for an extension to comply with PAMA requirements. That means, the  expected results in 2009 again will not be completed.References(Notes*  Instituto Nacional de Estadstica e Informtica. Banco de Informacin Digital. Retrieved February 29, 2008. External links *  Portal of La Oroya* Health Crisis at the Doe Run Peru SmelterOroyaOroyaOroyaOroyaOrojaOroyaOroyallaqtaOroya
4767646
Tintenbar,_New_South_Wales
 location2 SydneyTintenbar is a village located on the Far North Coast of South Wales (in Australia).Administratively it is part of the Shire.  It is  located about  or a 9 minutes car drive north-west from Ballina along the Pacific Highway.  Sydney, the state capital, is located approximately  or 8.5 hours car drive south from Tintenbar.Over the past two decades the population of Tintenbar has increased dramatically.  This has principally been the result of three large estates being constructed (Norfolk Park Estate, Oatley Park Estate, and Phoenix Park Estate).  It has grown to 587 usual residents in an area of 21.7 kilometres2 - giving an average population density of 27 people per square kilometre. Demographics In the 2006 Census of Population and Housing, Tintenbar is represented as a State suburb (SSC 19067).In 2006 there were approximately 587 usual residents living in Tintenbar.  Of this count, 292 were males and 295 were females(. The median age for persons living in Tintenbar was 39 years. By age, 23% of the population were under 15 years old, 65% were between 15 and 65, and 12% were over 65 years old.Most people living in Tintenbar were born in Australia (87%). Economy According to the 2006 Census of Population and Housing(, the median invididual income was $454 per week (equal to approximately $23,673 per year).  The median family income in 2006 was $1,114 per week (equal to approximately $58,087 per year); and, the median household income in 2006 was $1,096 per week (equal to approximately $57,148 per year).There were 301 people employed in 2006 (to give an employment to working age population ratio of 0.79), and 17 people unemployed.  The most common occupations were Managers (26%), Professionals (16%), and Technicians and Trades Workers (15%).  The top 5 industries for employment were Fruit and Tree Nut Growing (5.0%), School Education (4.7%), Hospitals (4.0%), Residential Care Services (3.7%) and Residential Building Construction (2.7%). Housing In the 2006 Census of Population and Housing(, the median housing loan repayment was $1,413 per month, equating to approximately 30% of median household income. The median rent in 2006 was $160 per week, equating to approximately 15% of median household income.The average household size was 3.0 persons. Commerce Tintenbar has one general store (Tintenbar store), a restaurant (Che bon), a pharmacy (Tintenbar pharmacy), an art studio (David Lanes Studio), and a medical centre. Environment Tintenbar is a rural area that has many environmental features.  It is surrounded by the localities of Knockrow to the north, Fernleigh and Brooklet to the north-west, Teven to the South-West, Cumbalum to the South, and Lennox Head to the East.There are several creeks that flow through Tintenbar.  The major one is called Emigrant creek.  This flows into Killen Falls which is a waterfall that is a popular tourist destination. Culture Tintenbar has a multi-purpose hall located just off the old Pacific Highway.On the second Sunday of every month a market is held at the Tintenbar Oval. Transport Tintenbar has a major highway that crosses through it, called the Pacific Highway.  This is a major road that links Sydney to Brisbane.  It has a large volume of traffic, especially over Easter.The Tintenbar-end of the Pacific Highway upgrade was completed in early 2011.  An entrance and exit is now provided near the old Ross Lane entrance.  The upgrade means the highway is now further east than the old highway (now re-named Tamarind Drive), is much straigher, and is  dual-carriageway with bicycle lanes on either side.  The Highway was upgraded due to sharp corners which led to several traffic accidents, particularly around Tintenbar Hill.There is no public transport in Tintenbar.  There are some bus routes that are run to transport children to primary and high schools. Sport and sporting amenities Tintenbar has an oval and tennis courts.  These are for hire from the General Store.Tintenbar is a catchment area for the Tintenbar East Ballina Cricket Club Education There is one primary school in Tintenbar.  It is named the Teven-Tintenbar public school.  The school is located in Fredricks lane near the boundary with the village of Teven.Teven-Tintenbar public school was created in 1988 and is the result of an amalgamation of the Tintenbar and the Teven public schools.There are no high schools or higher education facilities in Tintenbar.  The nearest high school is Ballina High School, and the closest university is the Southern Cross University. Communications Tintenbar has a relatively good communications system.  Almost every dwelling has access to the copper wire land-line network.  Recently Digital Subscriber Line (DSL) was made available to the area by the upgrade of the Titnenbar exchange (located on the Pacific Highway).  DSL plans are offered by Telstra.The Telstra Next-G network has a very good signal near the Pacific Highway.  Internet is typically faster than DSL but is generally more expensive per GigaByte downloaded. History History of Tintenbar Public SchoolThe Tintenbar public school had a long history stretching back over 100 years.  Initially the school was located near the centre of the village.  In February 1884 that the school was opened, Miss Ellen Duffy being the first teacher.  It was in the vicinity of a Church of England, a coopers store, a hotel (Royal Hotel), and a blacksmiths shop.OpalsIn 1901 Opals were first discovered at Tintenbar (Opals down under).Mining for opals was conducted between 1919 to 1920(http://www.opalsdownunder.com.au/articles/history.php).CemeteryA cemetery at Tintenbar is the resting place of many people. If you are unable to visit the cemetery, records can be accessed at the Richmond River Historical society for a fee.Information on Tintenbar Cemetery can also be found at http://www.australiancemeteries.com/nsw/ballina/tintenbarhs.htmFamous and Notable ResidentsJoe McGuire (Maguire) - First person to build a hut at Tintenbar (http://freepages.genealogy.rootsweb.ancestry.com/~ballinapioneers/ballinapioneers.html)Gillies (Australian politician) - Former Premier of QueenslandSusie Olive Kaylock - Local government official and community worker (http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A140686b.htm)Julie Davis - Red Cross Honoured Local Volunteer (http://www.redcross.org.au/nsw/news_mediarelease_WorldRedCrossDay080508.htm)Lemuel Snow - Teacher-in-Charge at Tintenbar Public School (http://www.rootsweb.ancestry.com/~nswballi/surnames/clement.htm)Agnes Margaret Gillies (1874  1920) - Postmistress at Tintenbar, editor of the Atherton Examiner (http://abitofhistory.net/html/rhw/g_body.htm)Nathaniel Ross Gray -  Acting Sergeant during World War I.  Enlisted at the age of 21, occupation was a Farmer (http://alh-research.tripod.com/Light_Horse/index.blog/1959025/2nd-australian-light-horse-regiment-embarkation-roll-12th-reinforcements/)Samuel Theodore Jarrett - Private during World War I.  Enlisted at the age of 18, occupation was a Labourer (http://alh-research.tripod.com/Light_Horse/index.blog/1959025/2nd-australian-light-horse-regiment-embarkation-roll-12th-reinforcements/)Charles James Ross - Acting Corporal during World War I.  Enlisted at age of 21, prior occupation was a Farmer(http://alh-research.tripod.com/Light_Horse/index.blog/1959025/2nd-australian-light-horse-regiment-embarkation-roll-12th-reinforcements/)James Thomas Stoker - Trooper during World War I.  Enlisted at age of 19, prior occupation was a Farmer(http://www.anzacs.org/5lhr/pages/5lhrmemberss2.html) References  External links *Teven Tintenbar Public Schoolfr:Tintenbarnl:Tintenbar
4771942
New_Hartley
New Hartley is a village in South East Northumberland, England, adjacent to Hartley, Delaval and Sluice. The village is just off the road about six miles (10 km) north of Tynemouth and four miles (6 km) south of Blyth. In 2010 the village had a population of 2,001.HistoryThe village is historically linked to nearby Hartley village, which was originally an Anglo-Saxon settlement Records show that coal mining began in 1291 A number of pits were created and exhausted at Hartley, before a new pit called Hester was sunk at a site in between Seaton Sluice and Seaton Delaval. Soon after, families settled around the new mine, and the village of New Hartley was created.Houses were built to the North and West of the pit, in a rough L shape, which included a Methodist chapel and an Inn, the Hartley Hastings Arms and New Hartley Workmens Club. The New Hartley Pit Disaster occurred in the village in 1862, killing 204 men and boys. This led to a change in the law and a best practice of building two shafts to a pit throughout Britain and many countries across the world.It is also home to ex-Liverpool and Arsenal Legend Ray Kennedy, who began his career with the well known New Hartley Juniors. The village boasts a friendly local called the Hartley Hastings (known locally and rather obscurely as The Haggins) and also a large Working Mens Club.It also has a Post Office and within walking distance a well-supported Masonic Hall.On the periphery of the village a housing estate called the Brambles was built in 2007.Local transport is reasonable with the X4 operating a twice hourly service to and from Newcastle, however what should be a 20 minute journey is timed at nearer 50 minutes due to the route taken to Haymarket Bus Station. Local bus operator Phoenix also provides a 5 times a(week)day service to the Manor Walks Shopping Centre in nearby Cramlington. The old Blyth and Tyne passenger line cuts through the village at its eastern extreme however despite local campaigns to re-open this line to commuters, easing rush hour traffic and assisting South East Northumbelands social and economic development, the line remains sadly as Freight Only.There are many great walks in the local area, with the many tracks and lanes a testament to New Hartleys once proud Mining History.External linksHartley
4781147
James_Fussell
James Fussell was the name of several men from the same family who established a business grinding edge tools and forging iron plates at several sites on the River and its tributaries around Mells, Somerset, England. They were iron magnates operating several mills including the Ironstone Works, Mells in Vale between Mells and Elm.()James Fussell I (died 1755) leased the site in Mells in 1744 from the Horners of Manor, to erect a good, firme and substantiall Mill or Mills for Grinding Edge Tools and forging Iron plates.()(Fussell, James (2001). The Fussell ironworks at Wadbury, Mells: An Introduction. Retrieved 8 February 2010.) He expanded the business adding another mill at Nunney in 1760.(James Fussell II (17481832)() leased a water power site at Wadbury. He was a promoter of the and Somerset Canal and further developed the business.At one time it employed 250 people and continued for many years, with various members of the Fussell family operating a total of six sites in the local area: the Upper Works further up the Wadbury Valley, the Elm Edge-Tool Works, the Chantry Works, the Railford Works and a small site at Slade.(Industrial archaeology - Fussells iron works, British Geological Survey. Retrieved 8 February 2010.) Tools produced by Fussells were exported to Europe and America, and the family expanded its activities to include coal mining and banking, with the business issuing its own banknotes at one stage.(The business declined towards the end of the 19th century, due in part to a failure to convert from water to steam power until a late stage, and also to the collapse of English agriculture in the 1870s.( By 1895 production had ceased,( The Fussells Iron Industry Story, Fussells Iron Industry Society. Retrieved 8 February 2010.) and the company folded in 1900.()ReferencesExternal links* James Fussell Iron Industry Story
4791787
AJ_Roach
 website  http://www.roachmusic.comAJ Roach (born 1975) is an American singer-songwriter originally from Virginia, but now based in NY. Roach was born in Newport News, Virginia, but his family moved to his parents ancestral home in Duffield, Virginia when Roach was still very young.As a teenager, Roach reportedly spent a number of months under the tutelage of cult blues guitarist Williams; however this rumor has never been properly substantiated, and Roachs playing style does not suggest such tutelage.After attending college in Virginia, Roach lived in several different cities on the east coast of the States before moving to Francisco.  The move to Francisco was a turning point for Roachs musical career.  There he met and befriended musicians like Meshishnik, Sickafoose, Sean Hayes and Venable.  The musical impact that these relationships had on Roach can be heard on Dogwood Winter, his first studio album.  The album was jointly produced by Meshishnik and Sickafoose, and features Venable on backing vocals on several tracks.Musical styleA. J. Roachs writing blurs the line between indie and traditional folk, and he has drawn comparisons in the press to Oldham, Eugene Edwards and Chesnutt.(http://www.sfbg.com/blogs/music/2007/10/post_6.html Noise: SFBG Music Blog) He is considered a troubadour in the tradition of Van Zandt, Dylan and Cohen.  His performances are so powerful that it is commonplace for audience members to be moved to tears.  Roachs dry and cutting wit has made the stories he sometimes tells between songs almost as celebrated as the songs themselves.TouringRoach is best known for his vigorous touring schedule in both the States and in Europe, at times performing as many as 250 dates per year.  Roach has had a number of revolving cast musicians who have formed his band over the years.  Some musicians that Roach has performed and or recorded with include Birdsong (vocals), Sickafoose (bass), Venable (vocals), Rose (violin), Cline (guitar), Williams (guitar), Roszkiewicz (guitar, mandolin), Moschella (drums), Meshishnik (guitar), Parks (guitar, bass, organ), Moore (piano, trombone).AJ Roachs first full-length recording is entitled Winter and was released in the United States in the summer of 2003 on the Folkstar recording label.  A subsequent UK release followed in January 2005.  A follow-up to Dogwood Winter, Revelation, was released in the UK in late 2006 and had an American release in January 2008 on Records.  Revelation reached number 1 on the Chart in December 2006.  Also in December 2006, the album reached number 5 on the Americana and Roots (FAR) Chart.Roach frequently appears in concert with Andrews.  The two are close friends and have toured together often in both the United States and Europe.(http://www.the-medicineshow.co.uk/nelsandrews/pressroomajnels/index.html)  They are reportedly planning a full-length album together,(http://www.youtube.com/watch?vjIMD8RPreoQ) having already recorded a split 7 vinyl entitled Tape & Whiskey.Awards and DistinctionsIn 2004, Roach was the general category recipient of the 12th Annual Austin Songwriting Award at MerleFest in North Carolina.Revelation reached number 1 on the Chart in December 2006Cursing KerouacIn 2009, Roach and his friend, Andrews began chronicling their hectic touring schedules through the use of hand held video cameras.  Their video blog can be found at http://www.CursingKerouac.com and is posted on youtube under the username cursingkerouac.Discography*EP (2002, New Folk Star)*Winter (2003, New Folk Star)*EP (2004, New Folk Star)*Tape & Whiskey - Split 7 vinyl single with Andrews (2005, New Folk Star)*Revelation (2006 Lucky Dice (UK); 2008, Waterbug (US))*Poplar Tree (On Hold)*Pleistocene (In Production)On compilations*Black Lung on Music of Coal: Mining Songs from the Appalachian Coalfields (2007 Lonesome)NotesExternal links* Official website* AJ Roach, page at MySpace* AJ Roach, strait gig at Civic Actions* AJ Roach collection at the Archives live music archive* http://www.youtube.com/cursingkerouac video blog with AndrewsRoach
4801573
Outerside
 long_d-3.22226Outerside is a fell in the District in Cumbria, England. It is located 6 kilometres west of Keswick in the north western part of the park and is a smaller member of the Coledale group of fells with a height of 568 metres (1863 feet). The fell is part of a ridge on the southern side of Coledale which descends from the higher fell of Crags and continues over the neighbouring smaller fell of Barrow before reaching the valley at the village of Braithwaite.TopographyThe Western Fells occupy the area between the rivers Derwent and Cocker, a broadly oval swathe of hilly country, elongated on a north-south axis. Two roads cross from east to west, dividing the fells into three convenient groups. The central sector, rising between Pass and Pass, includes Outerside.The highest ground in the North Western Fells is an east-west ridge in this central sector, beginning with Grasmoor above Water and then gradually descending eastwards over Hill, Sail, Scar Crags and Pike. Outerside is a satellite of Scar Crags, standing out to the north of the main ridge across the marshy depression of High Moss (1,625 ft).Outerside has a conical profile in most views and its upper slopes are clad predominantly in heather. To the north of the fell runs the valley of Coledale, falling  north eastwards to Braithwaite and the floodplain of the Derwent. To the south is the little dale of Stonycroft Gill, havings its birth at High Moss. It flows east between Outerside and Causey Pike to join Newlands Beck at Stair. All of the waters of Outerside thus run to Lake.North east of Outerside the little ridge continues across Low Moss to the subsidiary top of Stile End (1,466 ft). This was not treated as a separate fell by Wainwright,(Wainwright: Pictorial Guide to the Lakeland Fells, Book 6, The North Western Fells: Westmorland Gazette (1964): ISBN 0-7112-2459-5) although some later guidebooks take a different view.(Birkett, Bill: Complete Lakeland Fells: Collins Willow (1994): ISBN 0-0021-8406-0) Beyond is Barrow, a shapely fell overlooking Braithwaite village.GeologyThe rocks of Outerside are representative of the Kirkstile Formation, laminated mudstone and siltstone also typical of the Skiddaw group. At High and Low Moss this is overlain by peat.(British Geological Survey: 1:50,000 series maps, England & Wales Sheet 29: BGS (1999)) The fell has no history of mining, unlike many of the surrounding hills.(Adams, John: Mines of the Lake District Fells: Dalesman (1995) ISBN 0-85206-931-6)AscentsThe fell is ascended either from Braithwaite or Stair in the Valley; the ascent from Stair uses an old mine road up Stoneycroft Gill which crosses the shoulder of the fell at a height of 460 m (1,510 ft) from where the walker then strikes northerly to attain the summit. The direct route from Braithwaite follows Barrow Gill south westerly before going west to the highest point. The fell is often climbed along with the adjoining fell of Barrow to which it is connected by a ridge.((Summit and viewThe view from Outersides summit cairn is restricted by the higher Coledale fells of Pike, Crag Hill and Causey Pike in an arc to the west but there is a good prospect of the range to the east and the Skiddaw group to the north east, as well as a birds-eye view directly down into Coledale with the Force Crag mine at its head.(References
4813972
East_Midlands_English
East Midlands English is a dialect traditionally spoken in those parts of Midlands lying East of Street (the A5 London - Shrewsbury Road). Today this area is represented by the counties of the Midlands of England, (Derbyshire, Leicestershire, Lincolnshire, Nottinghamshire, Rutland and Northamptonshire, see below).Originsthumb|right|450px|The Five Boroughs of the East Midlands distinct from the Kingdom of Mercia in the early 10th century(Falkus & Gillingham and Hill)Like that of Yorkshire, the East Midlands dialect owes much of its grammar and vocabulary to Nordic influences, the region having been incorporated in the Norse controlled Danelaw in the late 9th century. At this time, the county towns of the East Midlands counties became viking fortified city states, known as the Boroughs of the Danelaw.For example, the East Midlands word scraight (to cry) is thought to be derived from the Norse, skrike in modern Scandinavian, also meaning to cry.()East Midlands dialects in literatureThe romantic English novelist, and East Midlander, H. Lawrence who was from the Nottinghamshire town of Eastwood wrote in the dialect of the Nottinghamshire and Derbyshire Coalfield in several dialect poems as well as in his more famous works such as Chatterleys Lover and and Lovers.()Though spoken less commonly today, the dialect of the East Midlands has been investigated in texts such as the Ey Up Mi Duck() series of books (and an LP) by Scollins and Titford. These books were originally intended as a study of Derbyshire Dialect, particularly the distinctive speech of Ilkeston and the Erewash valley, but later editions acknowledge similarities in vocabulary and grammar which unite the East Midlands dialects and broadened their appeal to the region as a whole.Up (often spelt ayup / eyup) is a greeting thought to be of Old Norse origin (se upp) used widely throughout the Midlands and Yorkshire, and Mi Duck is thought to be derived from a respectful Anglo Saxon form of address, Duka (Literally Duke), and is unrelated to waterfowl.() Non-natives of the East Midlands are often surprised to hear men greet each other as Mi Duck.(Dialect wordsIn recent years, humorous texts such as Nottingham, As it is Spoke() have combined phonetically spelt standard English words together in order to deliberately confuse non-natives to the region. For example:;Aya gorra weeya?:is the wife with you? (lit. Have you got her with you?);Its black uvver ahh Bills mothers:it looks like rain. (lit. Its black over Bills Mothers. q.v.) -- a common, if somewhat old fashioned, Midlands expression implying impending bad weather.);Thiz summat up wee im:I think he may be ill. (lit. Theres something up with him.);Yo norrayin no tuffees!:You arent having any tuffees (sweets)!However, there are many words in use in the traditional East Midlands Dialect which do not appear in standard English. The short list below is by no means exhaustive. More comprehensive glossaries exist within texts such as Ey Up Mi Duck by Richard Scollins and John Titford. ;badly:hungover/ill;belt-job:defunct coal-mining definition for an easy job such as sleeping whilst watching a conveyor belt;blubber:to cry/weep uncontrollably (i.e. Stop your blubbing.);bonny:  In many dialects, this has the sense of looking well often referring to a healthy plumpness.(Oxford English Dictionary 2nd ed. (1989) Bonny, adj., 2. b.) In Leicester and Nottingham, a transferred sense of overweight is derived from this sense.:(There is a yet older sense now only commonly used in Scots, Northern & some Midland dialects meaning beautiful generally rather than of individuals having a pleasing embonpoint specifically.)(Oxford English Dictionary 2nd ed. (1989) Bonny, adj., 1.);chuck:throw (Chuck us ball, (South-East Derbyshire)).:The word has the Standard English literal sense of to gently toss a light object and the Standard English extended sense of to easily or contemptuously throwing a heavy object. The OED does not record a distinct regional use but does say that workmen use in their trades to mean throw generally. (OED 2nd ed. (1989) chuck v.2 2.)    ;clouts:trousers (usually pronounced claarts);croaker:doctor;croggie:an (illegal) crossbar ride, two-up on the crossbar of a mans bicycle;cob:a roll (bap),(as verb:) to throw;ducks necks:bottle of lemonade;fast: stuck, caught (ohs gorrer finger fast);Island:Roundabout;jitty/jetty:alleyway;larup/larop:to cover with (usually a thick substance);mardy: grumpy, sulky (i.e. Shes a mardy one!);mash:to make a pot of tea (i.e. Ill go mash the tea.);nesh:a weak person, or one who feels the cold;oakie:ice cream (common in Leicestershire);paste:to beat, often used interchangeably with larrup;piddle:falling liquid as rain or urine (i.e. Its piddling down with rain or A dogs just piddled on the wall):The OED records this as a Standard English colloquialism rather than a regionalism.(Oxford English Dict. 2nd Ed. (1989) piddle, v.; 2.);piggle:to pick at a scab, spot or a skin irritation (i.e. Stop piggling that scab!);puddled/puddle-drunk:intoxicated;puther:to pour out uncontrollably();pot:a plaster cast;rammel:rubbish/waste;scraight/scraitin:to cry/crying(;snap:lunch/food,();snidered/snided/snied:covered/infested, (Lawrence used the word Snied in a description of an infestation of mice in and Lovers.),( ;sucker:iced lolly;twitchel:alleyway;tabs:ears;tuffees:sweets, confectionery;wazzerk/wassock:fool (used across the east & west midlands);sket: a useless person. The greeting Now Then (as Nah theen) is still in use in Lincolnshire, used where other people might say Hello.People from Leicester are known in the popular holiday resort Skegness as Chisits, due to their pronunciation of how much is it when asking the price of goods in shops.(Mercury, 16 July 2004)It is also very common to hear people from Nottingham replacing the word of with on. There were two on em (There were two of them). Get hold on em (Get hold of them).GrammarThose who speak traditional regional dialects are not trying unsuccessfully to speak English. East Midlands English follows a series of distinct grammatical rules. Some examples follow below.Formal addressUp until the mid 20th century it was not uncommon to hear the use of informal forms of address, Thee and Thou, as compared to the more formal Yo or You. Use of the informal form of address is now uncommon in modern speech.Personal pronounsPersonal pronouns differ from standard English as follows:Example It eent theirn; its ourn! (It isnt theirs; its ours!)Reflexive pronounsReflexive pronouns are characterised by the replacement of Self with Sen (From Middle English seluen)Yusen - Yourself,Mesen - Myself,Thisens - Themselves/Yourselves,Ussens - OurselvesExample We shll ay to do it ussens. (We shall have to do it ourselves)Dialect variations within the political regionAlthough Northamptonshire is located in the East Midlands, and has historically harboured a dialect comparable to other forms of East Midlands English,( particularly among the older generation, the linguistic distinctiveness of Northamptonshire has significantly eroded. There are influences from the western parts of Anglia, the West Midlands, and the South as well as the Watford Gap Isogloss, the demarcation line between southern and northern English accents. Contrary to popular belief, the Watford in question is Watford village and not the town of Watford which borders the north of London.The Danelaw split the present county into a Viking north and a Saxon south. This is quite plainly heard, with people in the south speaking more like people from Oxfordshire or Cambridgeshire and people in the north sounding more like people from Leicestershire.  Also of note is the anomalous dialect of Corbyite spoken around Corby in the north of Northamptonshire, which reflects the migration of large numbers of Scottish and Irish steelworkers to the town during the 20th Century. The dialect is often compared to Glaswegian.The dialect of Coalville in Leicestershire is said to resemble that of Derbyshire because many of the Coalville miners came from there, and the dialect of Glossop in North West Derbyshire has similarities with Northern English due to its close geographical position to Manchester.Lincolnshire is, in a sense, separated from the remainder of the Midlands. East of the Wolds, in the southern part of the county, the Lincolnshire dialect is closely linked to Fens and Anglia, and, in the northern areas of the county, the local speech has characteristics in common with the speech of the Riding of Yorkshire. This is largely due to the fact that the majority of the land area of Lincolnshire was surrounded by sea, the Estuary, marshland, and the wolds; these geographical circumstances permitted little linguistic interference from the East Midlands dialects until the nineteenth century when canal and rail routes penetrated the eastern heartland of the county.There are also variations in Nottinghamshire and Derbyshire. Though all native speakers sound similar, there are noticeable differences between the accents of residents of, for example, Nottingham and Derby, or Mansfield and the Erewash Valley.Counties in which East Midlands English is Spoken* Derbyshire* Leicestershire* Lincolnshire* Nottinghamshire* Northamptonshire* Rutland* Staffordshire (Limited usage around Burton-upon-Trent)Bibliography*Evans, Arthur Benoni (1881) Leicestershire words, phrases and sayings; ed. by Sebastian Evans. London: Trbner for the English Dialect Society*Wright, Joseph (ed.) (1898-1905) The English Dialect Dictionary. 6 vols. Oxford University Press (appendices include dialect words grouped by region)*Skeat, W. W. (ed.) (1874) Derbyshire lead-mining terms, by T. Houghton; 1681 ... Derbyshire mining terms, by J. Mawe; 1802 other texts. London: N. Trbner for the English Dialect Society   *Mander, James (1824) The Derbyshire miners glossary. Bakewell : Printed at the Minerva Press, for the author by G. Nall (High Peak and Wirksworth districts)*Pegge, Samuel (1896) Two collections of Derbicisms; ed. by W. Skeat & T. Hallam. London: for the English Dialect Society by H. Frowde, Oxford University PressExternal links* Dialect words recorded in the Northamptonshire village of Sulgrave* Specimens of the Coalville dialectLinks to East Midlands dialect in literature*The Dialect Poems of D. H. Lawrence (Nottinghamshire and Derbyshire Coalfield)*Dialect in the East Midlands - BBC East MidlandsReferences
4827022
Cultural_Survival
Cultural Survival (founded 1972) is a nonprofit group based in Cambridge, Massachusetts, USA which is dedicated to defending the rights of peoples. Their stated mandate is to promote the rights, voices and visions, of indigenous people. For 37 years, Cultural Survival has partnered with Indigenous communities to protect their lands, languages, and cultures. Through its programs and campaigns Cultural Survival helps them get the knowledge, advocacy tools, and strategic partnerships they need to protect their rights. When their governments do not respond, Cultural Survival partners with them to bring their cases to international commissions and courts, and they involve the public and policy makers in advocating for their rights. Cultural Survival offers the most comprehensive source of information on indigenous peoples, including the award-winning magazine, the Cultural Survival Quarterly, which has been published for more than 30 years.HistoryCultural Survival was founded in response to the opening up of the Amazonian and South American hinterlands during the 1960s, and the drastic effects this had on Indigenous inhabitants. It has since worked with Indigenous communities in Asia, Africa, South America, North America, and Australia, becoming the leading US-based organization defending the rights of Indigenous Peoples around the world. Their efforts are guided by a board of directors that includes some of the worlds preeminent indigenous leaders, as well as anthropologists, philanthropists, and entrepreneurs, and their executive director is a renowned human rights lawyer.  Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Cultural Survival also has a satellite office for the Guatemala Radio Project in Guatemala. Cultural Survival has received a four-star rating from Charity Navigator for outstanding fiscal responsibility.(Charity Navigator - Cultural Survival)Goals1. To increase global understanding of indigenous peoples rights, cultures, and concerns;2. To empower indigenous peoples to be better self-advocates, and to partner with them to advocate for their human rights.GovernanceCultural Survival is governed by a of Directors and is indigenous lead. The Board of Directors serves as Cultural Survivals legal mechanism and bears the responsibilities of boards of directors in the United States and in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. The Program Council helps to identify and shape Cultural Survivals programs, and provides oversight to ensure that those programs maximally serve the needs of indigenous peoples.Publications*Survival Quarterly Cultural Survival Quarterly brings you inside indigenous cultures around the world, sharing their ways of life, their spirituality, their celebrations, and their challenges, all with stunning photography and intimate insights from native writers and experts.Cultural Survival Quarterly magazine has covered indigenous rights issues for nearly 30 years. Each issue includes feature articles focused on themes of concern to indigenous peoples, as well as news pieces, interviews, and book reviews. All of the authors are indigenous or are professionals who work closely with indigenous peoples.It has been Honored by many Utne Reader awards and nominations.  www.cs.orgProgramsThe organization works to empower indigenous peoples by: *Disseminating information about the solutions indigenous groups have adopted to address the problems they face, as well as the lessons learned from research and case evaluations.*Facilitating capacity-building on topics such as organizational management, media relations, fund raising, land demarcation, negotiation techniques, and political participation rights.*Providing the professional expertise needed to protect their rights and long-term development goals.*Assisting them to understand the motivations of governments, inter-governmental organizations, and financial and corporate interests.*Facilitating mutual-understanding and problem-solving dialogues among indigenous groups and non-indigenous interests.*Securing development assistance to support advocacy activities.*Cultural Survival, in partnership with indigenous peoples, advocates for their human rights before inter-governmental institutions, governments, courts, financial institutions, and corporations.Current Programs and ActivitiesUnder the guidance of our Indigenous-led Program Council, Cultural Survival partners with Indigenous communities to defend their rights and sustain their cultures. Cultural Survival seeks to help them to get the knowledge, advocacy tools, and strategic partnerships they need to protect their rights. Every Cultural Survival program is designed to become self-sustaining and run entirely by the indigenous community.Guatemala Radio ProjectThe Guatemalan army couldnt wipe out Mayan culture, but American Idol can.The indigenous peoples of Guatemala have kept their culture through 500 years of colonization, brutal repression, and, most recently, 36 years of genocide that killed 200,000 Maya. But where brute force failed, globalization is succeeding. Mainstream Western entertainment is now flooding Guatemalas airwaves, hammering home the 24-hour-a-day message that Mayans should abandon their languages, their clothing, their spirituality, and their identities. And the only thing holding back this tidal wave of homogeneity is a network of tiny 500-watt radio stations.   Cultural Survival is partnering with Guatemalan nongovernmental organizations to strengthen this network of 140 community radio stations across the country, many of which broadcast in one or more of the countrys 23 indigenous languages. The stations provide news, educational programming, health information, and traditional music, all reinforcing pride in Mayan heritage. Cultural Survival provides the equipment and organizational expertise, while cooperating with the local people who run the radio. This has produced some results: languages on the brink of extinction have come back into common use; marimba music that was being replaced with top-40 songs is being played again; and people are wearing the distinctive traje that defines where they come from and who they are. However, some problems have emerged. The Guatemalan laws allow the police to shut down stations and confiscate equipment, and this is being done with increasing frequency. Cultural Survival has resquested help from the public to shore up what they believe to be a fragile network of protection for Mayan communities and cultures.More information on the project: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/grp/program2 http://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/grp/program2 Ngbe Campaign  Stopping Dam Construction in PanamaFor centuries the Ngbe people have lived by the rivers in the remote hills of western Panama, but now the government of Panama sees profit in those rivers, and they have given concessions to subsidiaries of the American company AES to build a series of large hydroelectric dams. The dams would flood the Ngbes traditional territory, destroy their homes and fields, and break apart communities and families. To clear the way for the dams, the AES subsidiary and the Panamanian government are pressuring the Ngobe to sign away their rights on documents they cant read, and are using other techniques to drive them out. With the Panamanian partners, they have filed suit with the Inter-American Commission on Human Rights to stop this project, but Cultural Survival is anticipating further legal battles. For updated information visit: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/ngobe/programhttp://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/ngobe/programNative Language Revitalization CampaignCultural Survival points to governmental policies that existed through the 1950s as being the source that led to the destruction of Native American languages. The practice of removing Native children from their communities and placing them in remote boarding schools was intended to break the transmission of language from one generation to the next, and it was successful. They feel it is important to repair the damage to Native American languages while it is possible. There are techniques which have shown to work quickly in transmitting language from elders to young people. The experience of Indigenous Peoples in Hawaii and New Zealand shows that immersion schools, language nests (a fluent speaker working with a group of learners), and master-apprentice programs (pairing an elder speaker with one learner) are very successful. Cultural Survival has called attention for the Native American communities as being in need of funding, political support, and training to make these programs work. More information about the campaign: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/elc/programhttp://www.culturalsurvival.org/programs/elc/programGlobal Response CampaignWhen Indigenous communities face environmental destruction from extractive industries like mining, logging, and hydroelectric dams, Global Response steps in, with international letter-writing campaigns that put pressure on corporate executives and government officials. These campaigns, always undertaken at the request of the community, have been exceptionally effective: over the past 19 years Global Response has launched more than 100 campaigns around the world, and almost half of them have produced victories. Thanks to Global Response letter writers, Indigenous communities have kept their lands, saved their crops, preserved their forests, and maintained their way of life.More information about the campaign: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/take-actionhttp://www.culturalsurvival.org/take-actionCultural Survival BazaarThe Cultural Survival Bazaars are a series of cultural festivals that give Indigenous artists, their representatives, other non-profits, and fair trade companies from around the world the chance to sell their work directly to the American public. They also expose over 35,000 Americans each year to Indigenous art, music, and culture, while giving visitors a chance to talk with Indigenous artists directly.Every year, hundreds of artists and their representatives sell traditional crafts, artwork, clothing, jewelry, carpets, and accessories.  The bazaars also offer a wide assortment of performances, presentation, and craft-making demonstrations providing the public with an entertaining experience while educating the public about Indigenous rights and cultures. The bazaars also serve as a fundraiser for Cultural Survivals international non-profit work in partnership with Indigenous Communities.  In the past seven years alone the bazaars have generated over $3 million for indigenous artisans, fair trade businesses, indigenous communities programs, and Cultural Survivals work on behalf of Indigenous Peoples.More information about the program/events: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/bazaar/cultural-survival-bazaarhttp://www.culturalsurvival.org/bazaar/cultural-survival-bazaarUniversal Periodic ReviewThe new United Nations Human Rights Council is evaluating the human rights performance of every country in the world every four years. Cultural Survival wants to be sure that indigenous rights are included in those evaluations, so, with the assistance of the Harvard College Student Advocates for Human Rights, they are providing country reports to the Human Rights Council. These reports detail how a given country is (or is not) respecting the rights of its indigenous populations in relation to the UN Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples, and they offer recommendations for improvements. Each report is submitted to the Human Rights Council as part of its Universal Periodic Review process.Read the reports: http://www.culturalsurvival.org/our-programs/uprhttp://www.culturalsurvival.org/our-programs/uprRelated ConceptsRather than being frozen in time, or in aspic, the notion of cultural survival, is an anthropological concept pioneered by the founder of Cultural Survival, Universitys well-known ethnologist of central Brazil, Professor of Anthropology, Maybury-Lewis. It refers to the ability of a distinctive people to recall their past, while also having a real say in the contemporary and future direction of their culture(s).See also*of Peoples Close to Nature*InternationalReferencesExternal links* 
4837124
Anacleto_Angelini
Anacleto Angelini Fabbri (January 17, 1914 &ndash; August 28, 2007) was an Italian born, Chilean businessman. At the time of his death, he was Americas wealthiest person, with an estimated net worth of USD $6 billion. He was chairman at Antarchile, one of Americas largest conglomerates.LifeAngelini was born in Ferrara, Italy to Giuseppe Angelini and Adalisa Fabbri. A veteran of the Italian armys campaign in Ethiopia, he immigrated to Chile in 1948, and made his fortune based on fisheries, forestry, mining and fuel distribution.  In 1986 he bought a majority in Chilean company Copec.Without an heir, he ceded day-to-day control of his holding company, Antarchile, to a nephew, Roberto Angelini Rossi. Anacleto Angelini resided in a modest apartment in a middle-class neighborhood in Santiago.(Forbes List of Billionaires 2004)ControversyAngelinis Celco pulp mill was closed in 2005 after the company lawyers reportedly produced a misleading environmental study regarding pollution on the River. The scandal prompted Celcos chief executive to resign in June 2005 and the company to pledge to adopt cleaner technologies. The plant reopened two months later at limited production capacity.(Forbes List of Billionaires 2006)DeathOn 28 August 2007, Angelini died in the clinical hospital of the Catholic University of Chile from emphysema, which had been aggravated by a severe cold.ReferencesAngeliniAngelini
4846566
San_Luis_Rey_River
 footnotes The San Luis Rey River is a river in northern Diego County, California. The rivers headwaters are in the National Forest near Mountain. The river drains into the Ocean on the northern end of the city of Oceanside. The river is over  long(U.S. Geological Survey. National Hydrography Dataset high-resolution flowline data. The National Map, accessed March 16, 2011) and drains . There is little water in the river during most of the year, but it can have very large flows during winter storms. The dam that forms Henshaw is the only one on the river itself, but the rivers drainage is extensively dammed. During the last , the river flows through a  earthen channel with levees on each side to prevent flooding, although the rest of the river remains unchannelized. Urbanization, mining and agriculture have caused substantial deterioration of the watershed. Lake Henshaw, relatively close to the headwaters, is a source of water. However, the water in the lower part of the river is only used for groundwater recharge. In 2009, a bridge was completed across the river near its mouth, replacing a small causeway that used to wash away every few years.CourseThe San Luis Rey River rises in two main branches. The mainstem starts east of Rocky Mountain in the National Forest and flows generally south-southwest. The West Forks headwaters rise as a pair of tiny streams, Fry Creek and Iron Springs Creek, just to the north of Mountain. These two streams combine into the West Fork, which flows southeast through the Mendenhall Valley. The West Fork joins the main stem at Henshaw, a reservoir formed by a dam across the main stem San Luis Rey River.From the base of Henshaw Dam, the river winds west along the foot of the Palomars, followed by State Route 76. It then bends southwest into a gorge. It leaves the canyon at the wide and spacious Valley, where it becomes a wash surrounded on both sides by agricultural fields. Potrero and Pauma Creeks enter from the right, then Frey Creek and Agua Tibia Creek as the river travels northwest. The river turns west, passing Pala, flowing through a patchwork of privately owned, government-owned and Native American lands. It then crosses under 15 and exits the foothills of the mountains near Bonsall.After passing Bonsall the river flows generally southwest, through the cities of San Luis Rey and Oceanside. Although usually dry up to this point the river starts to contain water as it nears the mouth, both from seeps and from tidal activity that forms a lagoon at the mouth of the river. The San Luis Rey empties into the Pacific north of Oceanside, about  south of the Margarita River and ~ north of Diego.In popular cultureThe 2010 Rockstar Games release Dead Redemption features a river inspired by the San Luis Rey. The San Luis River serves as the border between the Western Border States and Mexico and is one of the hallmarks of the game.GalleryImage:Sanluisreyriverphoto2.jpg|Pacific St and mouth of riverImage:Sanluisreyriverphoto3.jpg|Former causeway across mouth of riverImage:Lakehenshaw1.jpg|Lake Henshaw from Mesa Grande RdImage:Lakehenshaw2.jpg|Lake Henshaw from road to Love ValleyImage:Lakehenshaw3.jpg|Lake Henshaw from lookout on County Highway S7image:San_Luis_Rey_River_High_Water_2010.jpg|Underneath the Benet Rd bridge after several days of intense rainfall in winter 2010References*Busch Gardens - San Luis Rey River*Project Clean Water - San Luis Rey RiverLuis Rey RiverLuis Rey River
4851545
Structure_mining
Structure mining or structured data mining is the process of finding and extracting useful information from semi structured data sets. Graph mining is a special case of structured data mining.DescriptionThe growth of the use of data has created new opportunities for data mining, which has traditionally been concerned with tabular data sets, reflecting the strong association between mining and databases. Much of the worlds interesting and mineable data does not easily fold into relational databases, though a generation of software engineers have been trained to believe this was the only way to handle data, and data mining algorithms have generally been developed only to cope with tabular data.XML, being the most frequent way of representing semi-structured data, is able to represent both tabular data and arbitrary trees. Any particular representation of data to be exchanged between two applications in XML is normally described by a Schema often written in XSD. Practical examples of such Schemata,  for instance NewsML, are normally very sophisticated, containing multiple optional subtrees, used for representing special case data. Frequently around 90% of a Schema is concerned with the definition of these optional data items and sub-trees. Messages and data, therefore, that are transmitted or encoded using XML and that conform to the same Schema are liable to contain very different data depending on what is being transmitted.Such data presents large problems for conventional data mining. Two messages that conform to the same Schema may have little data in common. Building a training set from such data means that if one were to try to format it as tabular data for conventional data mining, large sections of the tables would or could be empty. There is a tacit assumption made in the design of most data mining algorithms that the data presented will be complete. Many algorithms perform badly with incomplete data sets, for instance those based on neural networks.XPath is the standard mechanism used to refer to nodes and data items within XML. It has similarities to standard techniques for navigating directory hierarchies used in operating systems user interfaces. To data and structure mine XML data of any form, at least two extensions are required to conventional data mining. These are the ability to associate an XPath statement with any data pattern and sub statements with each data node in the data pattern, and the ability to mine the presence and count of any node or set of nodes within the document. As an example, if one were to represent a family tree in XML, using these extensions one could create a data set containing all the individuals in the tree, data items such as name and age at death, and counts of related nodes, such as number of children. More sophisticated searches could extract data such as grandparents lifespans etc.The addition of these data types related to the structure of a document or message facilitates structure mining.The other desideratum is that the actual mining algorithms employed, whether supervised or unsupervised, must be able to handle sparse data.  In practice the set of data mining algorithms that are best at handling sparse data are those that process the training set data into trees of related patterns. These are frequently descendants of or take their inspiration from Quinlans algorithm.See also*mining*mining*mining*warehousing*contentExternal links*The 5th International Workshop on Mining and Learning with Graphs, Firenze, Aug 1-3, 2007References* Andrew N Edmonds,  On data mining tree structured data in XML, Data mining UK conference, University of Nottingham, Aug 2003* Gusfield, D., Algorithms on Strings, Trees, and Sequences: Computer Science and Computational Biology, Cambridge University Press, 1997. ISBN 0-521-58519-8* R.O. Duda, P.E. Hart, D.G. Stork, Pattern Classification, John Wiley & Sons, 2001. ISBN 0-471-05669-3
4862452
Mount_Hope,_New_South_Wales
Mount Hope (, elevation 223 m) is a settlement in western South Wales, Australia. It is situated on the Way, 94 kilometres north of Hillston and 160 km south of Cobar.HistoryThe town was once a busy copper mining town in the 1890-1920s. At the 2006 census, Mount Hope had a population of 53 people.()  Much of the township was destroyed in a major bushfire in the 1950s. Travellers are warned that there is no fuel available in this village. It has its own crossover air strips still being used today. The only visible business open in the village is the Royal Hotel, commonly known as the Mount Hope Pub.EnvironmentBlocks of remnant mallee to the south, west and north-west of the town are included in the 2500 km2 NSW Mallee Important Bird Area because of its significance for bird conservation, especially of the Malleefowl and Whistler.()Notes and references
4868666
Freeminer
Freeminer is an ancient title given to a coal or iron miners in the of Dean, Gloucestershire, England, who have earned the right to mine personal plots, known as gales.History of FreeminingFor hundreds of years, mining of the of Dean Coalfield and iron reserves has been regulated through a system of Freemining, with the Free Miners Mine Law Court sitting at the House from 1682. The earliest known existing copy of Dean Miners Laws and Privileges, known locally as the Book of Dennis, dates from 1610 but the copy itself contains references to much earlier origins.(COST website) It also claims that Freemining rights were granted to Foresters by Edward I who, in so doing, also confirmed that such customes and franchises had existed since tyme out of mynde.(The Forest of Dean, H G Nicholls) Freeminers had been instrumental in recapturing Berwick upon Tweed several times (1296, 1305 and 1315) and it is thought that these privileges were granted as a reward for their endeavours.A plaque bearing the engraved of arms of the Freeminers is on the Greyndour tomb in the Clearwell Chapel in Newland church, and other important medieval and modern mining emblems are in the Freeminers Guild church of Michael in Abenhall.Towards the end of the 18th century, as the revolution began to take hold, increasing demand for coal and iron led to conflicting mining interests and the Mine Law Court became bogged down with disputes. Deep coal and iron reserves could not be mined without substantial investment and the Crown became determined to introduce the free market into the Forest. In 1777 Mine Law Court documents mysteriously disappeared from the Speech House where they were stored and the Court fell into dissaray, most of the Court documents were later found to have been in the possession of local Crown officials (Deputy Gavellers) and they were produced as evidence at an Inquiry, some 50 years later. (Clearwell Caves website) A Royal Commission was appointed in 1831 to inquire into the nature of the mineral interests and freemining customs in the Forest of Dean, leading to the passing of the Dean Forest Mines Act 1838,(Dean Forest (Mines) Act, 1838) which now forms the basis of Freemining law. It confirmed the Freeminers exclusive right to the minerals of the Forest of Dean, but also allowed Freeminers to sell their gales to a non-Freeminers, weakening the Freeminers control and opening up the Forest to outside industrialists.The Coal Industry Nationalisation Act, of 1946,  specifically exempted the Forest of Dean, due to its unique form of ownership and history, allowing Freemining privileges to continue intact. Some large colliery gales were subsequently compulsorily purchased by the Coal Board (NCB), but these remained under the Freemining system, with a royalty paid to the Freeminers, by the NCB, as a share of the minerals extracted. The last of the NCB deep mines closed in 1965.(Clearwell Caves website) Eligibility All male persons born or hereafter to be born and abiding within the said of St Briavels, of the age of twenty one years and upwards, who shall have worked a year and a day in a coal or iron mine within the said Hundred of St Briavels, shall be deemed and taken to be Free Miners. the Dean Forest (Mines) Act 1838.(Dean Forest (Mines) Act 1838)This qualification has recently been challenged on the grounds of sex discrimination and although legal opinion advised that the 1838 Act was not subject to Equal Rights legislation, the Forestry Commissioners who act as Gaveller of the Forest of Dean, made the decision to enter females onto the register for the first time in 2010. It is now understood that the qualification of male, also incorporates or female.  The ancient administrative district, known as the Hundred of St Briavels, is generally considered to be the whole of the statutory of Dean and each parish adjoining it. And, as of 2010, the gender requirement has been recognised as archaic and women are now allowed to become freeminers.(www.guardian.co.uk)Present dayThe Dean Forest Mines Act is the basis for Free Mining today and Freemining is administered by the Deputy Gaveller; a post established in Medieval times, recently held by Chartered mining engineer  John Harvey MBE (retired March 2011). The post is being advertised and currently filled by the Forestry Commission Area Land Agent - Richard Davies FRICS, assisted by James Brittan, whose offices are at Bank House, in Coleford.There are probably still around 150 Freeminers alive today, although only a handful of collieries are still operating,(Clearwell Caves website) due to the demanding nature and relatively high costs of small-scale extraction; the closure of maternity hospital facilities at the Dilke Hospital - so that it has become unusual to be born within the Hundred of St Briavels - and attempts by the UK government to exact commercial coal mining licence charges under the 1994 Coal Act adds further difficulties.  Despite the modest level of activity, some Freemines do operate successfully, especially through diversification into non-traditional areas such as tourism and ochre mining. Freemining continues to be an important aspect of Forest of Dean culture and an important part of local identity.See also*Caves, working iron-ore mine, now open to the public.*of Dean CoalfieldReferencesFurther reading* Verderers and Forest Laws of Dean, Dr. Cyril Hart, ISBN 0-7153-5289-XExternal links* Hopwell Colliery; one of the few working collieries in the Forest of Dean, now open to the public* 1965 BBC News footage of Forest of Dean mines* Freeminers today in the Forest* Local Heritage Initiative - Freeminers of the Forest* Freeminer Brewery - history* http://www.copsewood.org/mining/books/oldham/fod_01.htm
4879667
Holds_of_Pern
Holds, in McCaffreys fiction series of Pern, are the residences of the bulk of the planet Perns population.Members of specialized professions on Pern live in Crafthalls and dragonriders live in Weyrs, but for most people, the Hold is both the residence and primary social authority.Throughout most of Pern, Holds are made up of either stone buildings or networks of caverns both natural and man-made.  By shuttering any windows and barring the door, this makes the Holds ideal shelter in times of Threadfall.  Holds are under tight strictures to keep Thread-susceptible greenery away from the entrances.  There are three types of Hold.  Major Holds are the largest and most politically powerful.  These Major Holds are analogous to Greek city-states, with a large (for Pern) quasi-urban center of perhaps one thousand residents (the Hold itself) surrounded  by a vast, mostly rural territory under the Holds jurisdiction of 10,000 or more additional residents.  When referring to a Major Hold, a speaker might mean either this entire region or only the urban center.The Major Holds are ruled by a Lord Holder, whose power is largely unchecked in his domain so long as he fulfills his responsibility to the Holds residents; namely, he provides residents protection from Thread, an appropriate education, and food and shelter in return for labor.  The Lord provides protection from Thread by tithing a percentage of the Holds agriculture and other materiel to the Weyr to which his Hold looks.As the series opens in the novel Dragonflight, there are fifteen such Major Holds, occupying the entire Northern Continent (other than the uninhabitable Arctic).  These holds are listed below.Under the jurisdiction of the Major Holds are Minor Holds.  These can range widely in size, but operate not unlike a Major Hold on a smaller scale.  Despite the name, some of the larger Minor Holds may approach the population of a Major Holds urban center.   Nonetheless, they are subject to the Major Hold of which they are a part and to which they tithe.  Minor Holds are managed by a Holder, not a Lord.  In many cases, however, a Lord Holder will install his son as Holder at a Minor Hold; the son retains the hereditary title of Lord.The more rural members of the population live in cotholds.  These are much smaller vassal holds, often consisting of a single extended family located near the fields, pasture, or other site of the holders agricultural pursuits.Hold ManagementAs noted above, Major Holds are managed by a Lord Holder.  Day-to-day operations are delegated to a Steward, who is responsible for the Holds economic health, trade with the outside, tithes to the Weyr, and dealings with its vassal Holds.  In the Hold itself, food, clothing, healing, and other maintenance of the dwellings and residents are the responsibility of a Headwoman under the supervision of the Lady Holder (the Lords wife).  The Lords female children and relatives frequently assist in these tasks.The Lords sons, along with fosterlings, nephews, and other male relatives, are given experience in Hold management.  This can consist of acting as Steward (or assisting the Steward), taking charge of a particular portfolio of the Holds activities (such as husbandry) or becoming Holder of a Minor Hold.  These young lords are often referred to derisively as lordlings.Hold children are educated by the Holds Harper, typically trained in the Harpercrafthall at Fort Hold.Each hold is responsible for the discipline of its wrongdoers. Most times the Lord Holder will make the wrongdoer pay restitution and service to the wronged party. The next severest punishment is incarceration. Death penalty can also be used in response to heinous crimes. But the greatest punishment is to be named holdless. This is where a person is stripped of all rank and status and thrown out of the hold. The reason this is the most severe punishment is because the holdless have nowhere to go during Threadfall.The Major Holds of PernAs Dragonflight opens, there are fifteen Major Holds, all located on Perns Northern Continent.Hold, located to the West of the Northern Continent, is Perns oldest Hold.  It is the location to which the Pern colonists evacuated upon abandoning the Southern Continent ten Turns (years) after arriving on Pern.  Colonists Sallah Telgar and Tarvi Andiyar discovered the cave network.  In Perns early history, the colonists established a College at Fort Hold which evolved into the Harper Hall during the Second Pass.  The Masterhealer is located at Fort Hold as well.  During Threadfall, Fort Hold is protected by dragons from Fort Weyr.Hold is believed to be Perns second Hold, although in fact it was the third established.  It is located east of Fort Hold.  Colonists Peter Red Hanranhan and his wife Mairi established the Hold nineteen Turns after the Landing on Pern.  Hanrahans group needed to cross a difficult ford to reach their site from Fort Hold, which led to the new settlements name: Rua Atha means Reds Ford in Irish, (though using correct Irish grammar, the name would actually be thrua).  Hanrahan bred horses (runnerbeasts in Perns idiom), and throughout Perns history Ruatha has been known for its runnerbeasts.  Ruatha also has a reputation for providing the Weyrs many famous dragonriders, particularly including queenriders.  Ruatha was one of the Holds conquered by Fax in the Turns before the Ninth Pass.  It is protected by Fort Weyr during Threadfall.Southern Boll Hold was the second Northern Hold founded, although this fact is not known to modern Pernese.  It occupies the southern end of the Boll peninsula in the West of Pern, south of Fort Hold, with the Hold itself located near the peninsulas tip.  Colonist Peter de Courcis established Boll Hold in the seventeenth Turn after Landing.  He named it after his wife, the recently-deceased Governor Emily Boll.  Boll, a hero of the War as a planetary governor, led the initial Pern colony with Admiral Paul Benden.  It is not clear whether the current Hold is in the same location as de Coucis original settlement.  Southern Boll is also under the protection of Fort Weyr.Benden Hold is located in the East Coast of Perns Northern Continent, with its southern reaches extending to the edge of the Nerat peninsula.  The last settlers to leave the Perns Southern Continent established Benden Turns after the rest of Pern had moved North. They named their Hold after Admiral Paul Benden, a hero of the Nathi War, co-leader of the early colonists with Emily Boll, and original captain of the expedition that brought the colonists from Earth.  Benden is best known for its wines.  It is protected from Thread by Benden Weyr.Bitra Hold is located to Bendens northwest.  The hold was founded after the end of the First Pass by dissidents from Benden Hold that held a different view of Avril Bitras actions and place in the history of Pern.  Bitra Hold is under the jurisdiction of Benden Weyr.Lemos Hold occupies the mountainous territory to Bitra Holds west, approaching the center of the Northern Continent.  The circumstances of its founding have not been revealed.  Benden Weyr protects Lemos Hold from Thread.Lemos Hold is most likely named after Bart Lemos, a charterer in the original Pern expedition.High Reaches Hold lies on Perns Northwest Coast, in the wintry High Reaches Mountains.  The circumstances of its founding have not been revealed.  It is under the protection of High Reaches Weyr.Nabol Hold is located in the center of Perns Northern Continent.  The circumstances of its founding have not been revealed.  Nabol Holds primary industry is mining, and it is often regarded as an unpleasant place by other of Perns inhabitants.  Fax, self-styled Lord of Seven Holds, was Nabolese.  Nabol is also under the protection of High Reaches Weyr.Nabol hold was named after Nabhi Nabol, a charterer in the Pern expeditionTillek Hold occupies the Tillek peninsula on the Northern Continents West Coast, south of High Reaches Hold and west of Fort.  Colonist Zi Ongola founded Tillek Hold in the twenty-second Turn after Landing, but the Hold went nameless for at least three Turns until the death of Jim Tillek.  Tillek was one of the colony leaders and captain of one of the ships that brought the colonists to Pern.  Tillek also established Perns first fishing fleet and maintained contact with the genetically enhanced dolphins the colonists brought with them.  Modern Tillek produces wines, but they are not as well regarded as Benden Holds; they have been described as acidic, foxy and very unpleasant. High Reaches Weyr fights Threadfall over Tillek Hold.Keroon Hold sits in the prairie east of the center of Perns Northern Continent, south of Bitra and Lemos Holds, west of the Nerat Perninsula.The circumstances of its founding have not been revealed, but presumably the Hold was named in honor of Ezra Keroon.  Keroon captained one of the colony ships from Earth and served the colony as a scientific advisor. Keroon Hold is known for its livestock, particularly its runnerbeasts, though they are said to be not as good as Ruathas.  Keroon is under the protection of Igen Weyr.Ista Hold occupies the whole of Ista Island, a large, partly desert island to the Southwest of the Igen Hold coast.  The name Ista comes from the initials of the four families that settled there.  Due to its temperate climate and low humidity, Ista, like the American Southwest, has served as retirement destination for those suffering from the symptoms of old age.  Ista Weyr, on the island, has traditionally been a place for the recuperation of injured dragons and riders. Ista Hold is protected from Threadfall by Ista Weyr.Igen Hold is a largely desert region in the South of Perns Northern Continent.  Although on the eastern half of the continent, Igen Hold has a long western coastline.  During the Ninth Pass, sandworms infesting Igens plains were discovered to offer some protection from Thread.  Most of Igen Hold is protected from Threadfall by Ista Weyr, with parts of the Holds rural north flown by the nearby Igen Weyr.Nerat Hold occupies the Nerat Peninsula on Perns East Coast, south of Benden Hold. It is separated from Keroon Hold to the west by Nerat Bay. With its extensive coastlines on both the ocean and the bay, fish are Nerat Holds main product. It is under the protection of Ista Weyr.Telgar Hold is situated at the northern end of the longitudinal center of Perns Northern Continent.  Telgar Hold evolved from the mining facilities founded by Pern contractor Telgar (ne Tarvi Andiyar) and named in honor of his wife Sallah Telgar.  Most of Telgar Hold is protected by Telgar Weyr, although Igen Weyr flies Thread over the southern portion of the Hold.Crom Hold is located in the low mountains west of Telgar Hold, north of Nabol and Ruatha Holds.  The primary industry of Crom Hold is mining, and in the Ninth Pass the Masterminer is located there.  A group of miners established Crom Hold near the end of the First Interval; similar to Ista, the holds name is derived from the first initials of these four.  It is protected by the dragons of Telgar Weyr.In addition to the various products mentioned above, every Major Hold save Lemos, Crom, Telgar, and Nabol have substantial seacoasts, so fishing and other maritime industries are important throughout Pern.The Southern ContinentBeginning in the novel Dragonflight, the Pernese slowly begin migrating back to the Southern Continent.  Important Holds in the South include Southern Hold (eventually attains Major Hold status), Paradise River Hold, and Cove Hold.
4891004
West_Melton
See also Melton, New Zealand and West, Victoria.West Melton is a former mining village in the parish of Bierlow in Yorkshire, England. It lies between Wath-upon-Dearne and Bierlow, roughly 5 miles north of Rotherham and 5 miles south east of Barnsley.There has been a rise in drug related crime in west melton over the last 20 years, Yorkshire Police say.External linksMelton
4897146
Fraser_Lake,_British_Columbia
footnotes               Fraser Lake is a village in northern Columbia, Canada. It is located on the southwest side of Lake() between Burns Lake and Vanderhoof alongside the Highway. The small communitys population is primarily employed by either the forest industry, (Fraser Lake Sawmills, or various logging contractors) or the mining industry, (the nearby Endako Mines, a large molybdenum mine).  Fraser Lake is also the hometown of Tianda Flegel, winner of The Next Star Season 2.The attractive lakeside community of Fraser Lake lies alongside the Yellowhead Highway, west of the city of Prince George. The pioneer roots of the areas history date back to the fur trade, with the establishment in 1806 of a fur-trading post by Simon Fraser, at Fort Fraser near the east end of Fraser Lake.The modern day town was established in 1914, during the construction of the Grand Trunk Railway, and was incorporated as a village in 1966.DirectionsFraser Lake is east of Lake (69), Topley (120), Houston (150), Smithers (216), Terrace (419), and Prince Rupert (563). It is west from Fraser (20), Vanderhoof (59), St. James (106), and Prince George (154).See also*FraserReferencesExternal links*Fraser Lakezh:
4901952
Madamon
 Madamon is a village located in Ranni-Perunad Panchayat of Taluk, Pathanamthitta District of Kerala. It is situated in the Ghats and has undulating terrain. The place is blessed with Pamba, a holy river which flows through it.The village boasts of the Hrishikesha Temple which is a stop over for many pilgrims who pass through this village to the holy shrine Sabarimala, 60 km away. The main festival of this temple is that of Pathamudayam, meaning the tenth sunrise. This occurs generally in mid April, when the sun is exactly over this latitude. This is a 10 day festival which is the main attraction for the folks around this village. Similarly the temple celebrates the Sabarimala festive season during mid November to mid January.The village has a government run Upper Primary School (classes till Seventh Standard) and a Post office. Till recently, sand mining used to be a big source of income and employment to the local population.The village has attained prominence amongst the Sabarimala pilgrims as a stopover place. They take a break for a holy bath in Pamba river as well as for refreshments. The local temple also forms an added attraction.The village folks are generally farmers growing food items like tapioca, bananas, vegetables, and cash crops like coconut and rubber. They produce Betel nut as well as black pepper too.As with most other villages, a large number of the locals work outside the State, even abroad and support the families back in this village.Madamon is divided into Madamon Vadekkekkara and Madamon Thekkekkara. The main Sabarimala Road is going through Vadekkekkar on the other hand Thekkekkara connected to Ranni and Vadasserikkara. The main attraction of Vadekkekkara is the Church of God Madamon a Christian church started in 1960. Also another attraction is the Madamon convention by Ezhava Community conducting on yearly basis.
4911587
Speers_Point,_New_South_Wales
TeralbaSpeers Point is a suburb within, and the location of the council seat of the  of Lake Macquarie Local Government Area in South Wales, Australia. It is located  west-southwest of the city of Newcastle on the northern shore of Lake Macquarie, in Cockle and Warners bays, between the suburbs of Cardiff and Warners Bay.()Speers Point was settled in 1828 and local commerce began through a colliery in 1843. By 2006, the suburb had a population of 3,103.()HistoryBefore European settlement, the people of Lake Macquarie had inhabited the area and called it Biddaba or Milloba.()(The first claimant to the land was a settler named William Brooks, who selected the area now called Kahibah Parish in 1828, named his property Lochend and received deeds in 1839. The title deeds covered the area east of Cockle Creek, Boolaroo and the place now known as Speers Point. However, before Brooks claim the land had been occupied by R. Sadleir, who did not make a claim to the land. Brooks developed his claim and opened the Lochend Colliery in 1843, which mined coal from the bottom of the hills around Speers Point.(In 1870, William Speer, a wealthy businessman from Sydney, settled there and obtained some of Brooks land. Speers residence was erected opposite the current Council Administration Centre. William Brooks name of Lochend was forgotten and Speers name remained as Speers Point, referring to the peninsula of land into Macquarie that part of the area is located on.(Lake Macquarie Library Infohunt (accessed 2007-08-09).)In 1887, a Mr Ryan was the only resident of the area. Ryan was Speers estate administrator. However, Speers Point began to become more populated when its first subdivision occurred in 1902. Further subdivisions occurred and industry began to open up, and Speers Point Park was transferred to the Lake Macquarie council in 1910. In 1912, a steam tram line began service, whilst the Lake Macquarie council offices moved to Speers Point in 1915 (and moved again in 1955). In 1916 the first office was opened along with another mine.(In 1920, a rowing boat (later hire boat and ferry) service operated across Cockle Creek, however a footbridge was constructed in 1928. In 1930 the steam tram service ceased operations, but was replaced by a private bus service in 1931. Two routes were opened by the government in 1937, whilst an industrial port bus service began operation in 1938. Sewerage systems were put in place in 1945, and two public schools opened in January 1957 and January 1959.(The first winner of the to Hobart Yacht Race in 1945, a cutter called Rani was built by the Steel brothers of Lake Macquarie. Being the second smallest of the nine competing, it was given up as lost by the organisers.((Marine history - Hot Shot Kaskelot Salt (accessed 2007-09-22))(Dugard, Martin. Knockdown, The Harrowing True Account Of A Yacht Race Turned Deadly. Pocket Books.)The post office closed in 1976 and the Newcastle earthquake brought substantial damage to the town, especially to the Boolaroo-Speers Point RSL club and its youth section. The epicentre of the magnitude 5.6 earthquake was the neighbouring suburb of Boolaroo.((1989 Earthquake damage to RSL club - Lake Macquarie City Library (accessed 2007-11-02))Geographythumb|200px|right|Speers Point in relation to Newcastle (NASA image)Speers Point is located approximately  WSW of New South Wales and  north-east of Sydney,(Google Earth map directions for Speers Point - Newcastle (accessed 2007-09-11)* Google Earth map directions for Speers Point - Sydney (accessed 2007-09-11)) within the of Lake Macquarie at .() The suburban boundaries of Speers Point are somewhat ill-defined, but a general guide would be Cockle Creek to the west, Seventh Street to the north, Fairfax Road to the east and Macquarie to the south.(Newcastle and Lower Hunter Valley UBD street directory (accessed 2007-09-12))The elevation of Speers Point is approximately 27 metres above sea level.(Bonzle Digital Atlas of Australia - Map of Speers Point, NSW (accessed 2007-09-12))ClimateSpeers Point is located in an climate zone, similar to that of Melbourne and Canberra.(Koppen classification world map (accessed 2007-11-02))(Australian Bureau of Meteorology. Newcastle Nobbys Signal Station statistics (accessed 2007-11-02). 17 km from Speers Point.)EconomyEarly industry in Speers Point included the Lochend Colliery from 1843 where coal was mined until 1916, when the Speers Point Gully mine was opened by T.D.H. Rhodes. Soon after settlement by William Speer, a dairy began operating and before 1874 a citrus orchard was in operation by the lakeside.(The nearby Pasminco (now Zinifex) Creek Smelter operated from 1896, however operations ceased on 12 September 2003. Since the departure of the mining industry Speers Point has not housed any major businesses.(Hunter New England Health (accessed 2007-08-13))FacilitiesThe Lake Macquarie area in general receives the same media outlets as nearby Newcastle. However, the Macquarie News is a local newspaper owned by the News Limited community newspaper circle.(Lake Macquarie News (accessed 2007-08-13))right|thumb|150px|Recreation on the Speers Point foreshore (1904).Despite its small size, Speers Point is home to many sports clubs, many of which may be considered markets, such as the Speers Point Amateur Sailing Club, a major social ground for manyh residents.(Speers Point Amateur Sailing Club - About Us (accessed 2007-09-20)) This organisation was founded on Lake Macquarie in the early 1900s and is currently situated at Speers Point Park.( Speers Point is also home to a swim centre.(Speers Point: Lake Macquarie City Council (accessed 2007-09-20))Opposite the Speers Point swim centre is Speers Point Park, which boasts a stage area, playgrounds,  barbecue facilities and lighting. The park is dog friendly.(Speers Point Park - Community Directory - Lake Macquarie City Council (accessed 2007-09-20))Speers Point also gives its name to a RSL sub-branch in nearby Boolaroo.(RSL Sub-branch listing A-K (accessed 2007-09-20)) A bowls club is located near there.(Speers Point Sailing Club - Speers Point (township) (accessed 2007-11-02))There is no hospital in Speers Point but in the nearby suburb of Warners Bay there is one hospital (Warners Bay Private Hospital).thumb|right|90px|The logo of Speers Point Public SchoolSpeers Point has one public school, Speers Point Public School, located on Bell Street. It has enrollment figures of 170, with years K-6 attending. The school was founded in 1957 and currently features an outdoor playground, undercover areas, sports facilities, computer labs and resources.(Speers Point Public School - Facilities Tour (accessed 2007-09-23))Only one high school serves the 2284 postcode area, Lake Macquarie High School, located in nearby Booragul.(School Locator - Speers Point Public School (accessed 2007-09-23)) An school is located in nearby Booragul called St Pauls High School.(Schools - NSW (Nationwide Index) (accessed 2007-09-23))DemographicsAt the ABS 2006 census, Speers Point had a population of 3,103.( This was an increase of 66 people from the 2001 census.()Speers Point residents had a median age of 44 years, compared to the northern Lake Macquarie regional average of 38 years, and the South Wales and Australian median of 37 years.()() The median individual income was below average for the region$408 per week compared with $432 per week across northern Lake Macquarie and $461 a week in New South Wales.( The 2006 Census figures put Speers Points unemployment rate at 1.6% below the Newcastle average.Females make up 50.7% of the 3103 residents of Speers Point (a total of 1573), whilst males, at 1530, make up only 49.3%. This differs from the national Australian average of 50.6% females and 49.4% males.(The population of Speers Point is predominantly Australian-born, with some 84.8% of its residents as at the 2006 census. The second most prevalent birthplace was the United Kingdom at 3.90%. 2.00% reported one or more parents of Italian birth. At the 2006 census, 1.42% of residents identified as Australians.(The most popular religious affiliations in descending order in the 2006 census were Anglican, Roman Catholic, no religion and Uniting.( The All Saints Anglican Church, Our Lady Help of Christians Catholic Church() and Boolaroo Uniting Church are all located on Main Road in or near the suburbs northern boundary.Transportthumb|right|190px|Speers Point and the Lake Macquarie area has historically been frequented by water crafts.Cars are the preferred mode of transport in the suburb. At the 2001 census, the Bureau of Statistics reported that 74.96% of Speers Points residents were drivers or passengers of cars in their commute to work,( a figure significantly higher than the regional average of 71.87%.() Other private modes of transport included motorcycling (0.48%), cycling (0.72%) and walking (1.86%). A state bike path runs close to the suburb (Newcastle 39).(Bike Paths map (accessed 2007-11-02))At the 2001 census, 4.12% of Speers Point residents used public transport to get to work, compared with 2.72% regionally. The suburb is served by the 363 bus route (Monday-Saturday) between Belmont/Warners Bay and Newcastles central business district, provided by Newcastle Buses & Ferries. The bus also connects with the Main North railway line at Cockle Creek railway station approximately  to the north of the suburb, and a major regional shopping centre, Glendale.(Newcastle Buses - Route Information (accessed 2007-09-22))Early transport included steam trams (beginning in 1912 and closing 1930), a rowing boat ferry service operated by Harry Linsley across Cockle Creek in 1920 (a footbridge was built in 1928) and government bus services beginning 1937.(Government and politics250px|thumb|right|The results of the 1998-2004 Federal elections from Speers Point booths.At federal level, Speers Point is within the of Charlton, a safe seat for the Labor Party. It has been held since 2007 by former ACTU secretary Combet.() The Speers Point booth was won comfortably at the 2007 federal election by the Labor Party, with a two-party preferred vote of 60.97%.()In the South Wales Legislative Assembly, Speers Point is within the electorate of Lake Macquarie. Normally a safe Labor seat,() it was won at the 2007 election by Independent Piper, the former mayor of the Lake Macquarie City Council.Speers Point is located within the West Ward of the of Lake Macquarie,(West Ward - City of Lake Macquarie (accessed 2007-11-02)) and hosts the Citys council offices.(Council Meetings - City of Lake Macquarie (accessed 2007-11-02))Polling place statistics are presented below from the Speers Point polling place in the federal and state elections as indicated.ReferencesExternal links*Lake Macquarie LGA website*Speers Point Public School website
4923982
Terraforming_of_Venus
Image:TerraformedVenus.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Artists conception of a terraformed Venus. The cloud formations are depicted assuming the planets rotation has not been sped up.The terraforming of Venus is the hypothetical process of engineering the global environment of the planet Venus in such a way as to make it suitable for human habitation. Terraforming Venus was first seriously proposed by the astronomer Sagan in 1961.()  The minimum adjustments to the existing environment of Venus to support human life would require three major changes to the planet:* Reducing Venuss 450C (850F) surface temperature.* Eliminating most of the planets dense 9 MPa (~90 atm) dioxide atmosphere, via removal or conversion to some other form.* Addition of breathable oxygen to the atmosphere.These three goals are closely interrelated, since Venuss extreme temperature is due to the effect caused by its dense carbon-dioxide atmosphere.  In addition, two additional changes would be highly desirable:* Establishing a day/night light cycle shorter than Venuss current day (currently equal to 116.75 Earth days).* Establishing a planetary magnetic field or substitute for protection against solar and cosmic radiation.Solar shadesVenus receives about twice the sunlight that Earth does, which is thought to have contributed to its greenhouse effect. Terraforming Venus will likely involve reducing the insolation at Venus surface to prevent the planet from heating up again.Space basedshades could be used to reduce the total insolation received by Venus, cooling the planet somewhat.() A shade placed in the Sun-Venus  Lagrange point also serves to block the wind, removing the radiation exposure problem on Venus.Construction of a suitably large solar shade is a daunting task. The size of the shade would be four times the diameter of Venus itself if at the  point. This size would necessitate construction in space. There would also be the difficulty of balancing a thin-film shade perpendicular to the Suns rays at the Sun-Venus point with the incoming pressure, which would tend to turn the shade into a huge sail. If the shade were left at the  point, the pressure would add force to the sunward side and necessitate moving the shade even closer to the Sun than the  point.Modifications to the  solar shade design have been suggested to solve the solar sail problem. One suggested method is to use orbiting, solar-synchronous mirrors that reflect light toward the back of the sunshade, from the non-sunward side of Venus. Photon pressure would push the support mirrors to an angle of 30 degrees away from the sunward side.()Paul Birch proposed() a slatted system of mirrors near the  point between Venus and the Sun. The shades panels would not be perpendicular to the suns rays, but instead at an angle of 30 degrees, such that the reflected light would strike the next panel, negating the photon pressure. Each successive row of panels would be +/- 1 degree off the 30-degree deflection angle, causing the reflected light to be skewed 4 degrees from striking Venus.Another possibility, suggested by C. Edwards, is to put into orbit around Venus a belt of material, blocking a portion of sunlight.  Multiple thinner belts may be used, and may be composed of a thin net of fibers spaced so that certain wavelengths could not get through while using less material.(Edwards, Bradley C. Westling, Eric A. The Space Elevator: A revolutionary Earth-to-space transportation system. 2002, 2003 BC Edwards, Houston, TX.)Solar shades could also serve as solar power generators. Space-based solar shade techniques, and thin-film solar sails in general, are only in an early stage of development. The vast sizes require a quantity of material that is many orders of magnitude greater than any man-made object that has ever been brought into space or constructed in space.Atmospheric or surface-basedCooling could also be effected by placing reflectors in the atmosphere or on the surface. Reflective balloons floating in the upper atmosphere could create shade. The number and/or size of the balloons would necessarily be great. A. Landis has suggested() that if enough floating cities were built, they could form a solar shield around the planet, and could simultaneously be used to process the atmosphere into a more desirable form, thus combining the solar shield theory and the atmospheric processing theory with a scalable technology that would immediately provide living space in the Venusian atmosphere. If made from nanotubes (recently fabricated into sheet form) or graphene (a sheet-like carbon allotrope), then the major structural materials can be produced using carbon dioxide gathered in situ from the atmosphere. The recently synthesised carbonia might prove a useful structural material if it can be quenched to STP conditions, perhaps in a mixture with regular silica glass. According to Birchs analysis such colonies and materials would provide an immediate economic return from colonizing Venus, funding further terraforming efforts.Increasing the planets albedo by deploying light color or reflective material on the surface could help keep the atmosphere cool. The amount would be large and would have to be put in place after the atmosphere had been modified already, since Venuss surface is currently completely shrouded by clouds.An advantage of atmospheric and surface cooling solutions is that they take advantage of existing technology. A disadvantage is that Venus already has highly reflective clouds (giving it an albedo of 0.65), so any approach would have to significantly surpass this to make a difference.Eliminating the dense carbon dioxide atmosphereBiological approachesA method proposed in 1961 by Carl Sagan involves the use of genetically engineered bacteria to fix carbon into organic forms.( Although this method is still commonly proposed in discussions of Venus terraforming, later discoveries showed it would not be successful.() The production of organic molecules from carbon dioxide requires an input of hydrogen, which on Earth is taken from its abundant supply of water but which is nearly nonexistent on Venus. Since Venus lacks a magnetic field, the upper atmosphere is exposed to direct erosion by wind and has lost most of its original hydrogen to space.Furthermore, any carbon that was bound up in organic molecules would quickly be converted to carbon dioxide again by the hot surface environment. Venus would not begin to cool down until after most of the carbon dioxide has already been removed. Twenty-three years later, in Pale Blue Dot, Sagan conceded that his original proposal for terraforming would not work because the atmosphere of Venus is far denser than was known in 1961.(Floating colonies could gradually transform the Venerian atmosphere: for example, their reflectivity could alter the overall albedo of Venus. Colonies could also grow plant matter, if water or another source of hydrogen were imported, which would gradually sequester carbon dioxide in the air. However, it would take an enormous number of such colonies, and large quantities of introduced hydrogen, to have a significant atmospheric impact, as there is over 1.2 kg of carbon in Venuss atmosphere.Introduction of hydrogenBombarding Venus with hydrogen, possibly from some outer solar system source, and reacting with carbon dioxide, could produce elemental carbon (graphite) and water by the reaction. It would take about 41019 kg of hydrogen to convert the whole Venerian atmosphere. (Loss of hydrogen due to the wind is unlikely to be significant on the timescale of terraforming.)  Due to the relatively flat surface, this water would cover about 80% of the surface compared to 70% for Earth, even though it would amount to only roughly 10% of the water found on Earth.(The remaining atmosphere, at around 3 bars (about three times that of Earth), will mainly be composed of nitrogen, some of which will dissolve into the new oceans of water, reducing atmospheric pressure further, in accordance with law.Capture in carbonatesBombardment of Venus with refined magnesium and calcium metal could sequester carbon dioxide in the form of calcium and carbonates. About 8 kg of calcium or 5 kg of magnesium would be required, which would entail a great deal of mining and mineral refining.() 8 kg is a few times the mass of the asteroid Vesta (more than 300 miles in diameter).Modelling by Mark Bullock(Bullock, M.A., and D.G. Grinspoon, The Stability of Climate on Venus, J. Geophys. Res. 101, 7521-7529, 1996.) of Venus atmospheric evolution suggests that existing surface minerals, particularly calcium and magnesium oxides, could serve as a sink of carbon dioxide and sulphur dioxide. If these could be exposed to the atmosphere then the planet would cool and its atmospheric pressure decline somewhat. One of the possible end states modelled by Bullock was a 43 bar atmosphere and 400 K surface temperature.Direct liquefaction and sequestrationBirchs proposal( involves using a solar shade to cool Venus down sufficiently to permit liquefaction, from a temperature less than 304.18 K and partial pressures of CO2 down to 73.8 bar (dioxides critical point) and then down to 5.185 bar and 216.85 K (carbon dioxides point). Below that temperature, freezing of atmospheric carbon dioxide into ice will cause it to deposit onto the surface, after which the frozen CO2 would be buried and maintained in that condition by pressure, or shipped off-world. After this process was complete, the shades could be removed or solettas added, allowing the planet to partially warm again to temperatures comfortable for Earth life. A source of hydrogen or water would still be needed, and some of the remaining 3.5 bar of atmospheric nitrogen would need to be fixed into the soil. Birch suggests disrupting an ice-moon of Saturn and bombarding Venus with its fragments to provide perhaps an average depth of 100 meters of water over the whole planet.Removing atmosphereThe removal of Venuss atmosphere could be attempted by a variety of methods, possibly in combination. Directly lifting atmospheric gas from Venus into space would likely prove difficult. Venus has sufficiently high escape velocity to make blasting it away with asteroid impacts impractical. Pollack and Sagan calculated in 1993( that an impactor of 700 km diameter striking Venus at greater than 20 km/s, would eject all the atmosphere above the horizon as seen from the point of impact, but since this is less than a thousandth of the total atmosphere and there would be diminishing returns as the atmospheres density decreased a very great number of such giant impactors would be required. Smaller objects would not work either, requiring even more. The violence of the bombardment could well result in significant outgassing that replaces removed atmosphere. Most of the ejected atmosphere would go into solar orbit near Venus, and, without further intervention, could be captured by Venus gravitational field and become part of the atmosphere once again.Removal of atmospheric gas in a more controlled manner could also prove difficult. Venuss extremely slow rotation means that elevators would be very difficult to construct as the planets orbit lies an impractical distance above the surface; and the very thick atmosphere to be removed makes drivers useless for removing payloads from the planets surface. Possible workarounds include placing drivers on high-altitude balloons or balloon-supported towers extending above the bulk of the atmosphere, using fountains, or rotovators.RotationVenus rotates once every 243 days  by far the slowest rotation period of any of the major planets. A Venerian sidereal day thus lasts more than a Venerian year (243 versus 224.7 Earth days). However, the length of a day on Venus is significantly shorter than the day; to an observer on the surface of Venus the time from one sunrise to the next would be 116.75 days. Nevertheless, Venuss extremely slow rotation rate would result in extremely long days and nights, which could prove difficult for most known Earth species of plants and animals to adapt to. The slow rotation also likely accounts for the lack of a significant magnetic field.One proposal is a system of orbiting solar mirrors which might be used to provide sunlight to the night side of Venus and possibly shade to the day side surface.  In addition to his suggestion of slatted system of mirrors near the  point between Venus and the Sun, Paul Birch has proposed a rotating soletta mirror in a orbit, which would produce a 24-hour light cycle.(Increasing the speed of Venuss rotation would require many orders of magnitude greater amounts of energy than construction of orbiting solar mirrors, or even than the removal of Venuss atmosphere. Recent scientific research suggests that close fly-bys of asteroids or cometary bodies larger than 60 miles across could be used to move a planet in its orbit, or increase the speed of rotation.(Astronomers hatch plan to move Earths orbit from warming sun, CNN.com) David Nordley has suggested, in fiction,() that Venus might be spun-up to a day-length of 30 Earth-days by exporting the atmosphere of Venus into space via drivers. This concept was also explored more rigorously by Birch.()See also* Terraforming* of Venus* of MarsReferencesExternal links*An approach to terraforming Venus*Terraformers Society of Canada - Terraforming Venus*Visualizing the steps of solar system terraforming*The Terraforming Information Pages*A fictional account of the terraformation of Venus*Terraform Venus (discussion on the New Mars forum)*Terraforming Venus - The Latest Thinking (discussion on the New Mars forum)Venueder Venuses:Terraformacin#Venusde Vnusdi VenereteraformavimasVnusz terraformlsaav Venusde Vnus#Terraformandoav Venus
4931276
John_Gell
John Gell may refer to:*John Gell, 1st Baronet (15921671), Parliamentarian in the English Civil War*John Gell, 2nd Baronet (16121689), lead mining magnate and MP for (UK Parliament constituency)*Eyre Gell (died 1739), known as John Eyre before inheriting the Gell estate and mines, see Baronets*Gell (admiral) (17401806), British admiralSee also*Baronets
4937544
Menangle,_New_South_Wales
AppinMenangle () is a village in the Macarthur Region of South Wales, Australia.LocationMenangle is part of the Shire. At the 2006 census, Menangle had a population of 327 people.(HistoryThe towns name is derived from an aboriginal word for a place of swamps and lagoons.()In 1806, Walter Davidson named his land grant in this district Manangle. This property was later incorporated into the larger Macarthur Estate and the village grew to service the operations of Camden Park Estate.(St Patricks Church history)The opening of the railway in 1863(Bayley, W. A. 1973. Picton-Mittagong Loop-Line Railway. p.11 Bulli: Austrail. ISBN 0 909597 14 6) enabled overnight milk deliveries to the Sydney Market. The railway bridge over the Nepean River is one of the oldest in use in New South Wales today.(... typical of British bridge engineering of the 1860s, the iron spans having been fully imported. Additional supporting piers were later erected under the spans so that heavier engines could be used... see Heritage Listing.) In 2003, the Viaduct underwent an intensive investigation after a report that it was in danger of collapse.(Rails red alert Sydney Morning Herald 12 April, 2003)In connection with the construction of Harbour Bridge, a tramway was constructed between the railway station and a sand-mining area on the banks of the River(Eardley, Gifford. 1970. The Menangle Sand Companys Railway. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, March, 1970 pp65-67); however, this tramway is not currently in service.(The National Library of Australia has an image in its collection titled: Menangle Sand Co. 0-4-0T locomotive built by Davenport Loco Coy Davenport, Iowa 2 0 gauge at Menangle January 1934 PIC P861/5097 LOC Box N8 Folder 1)The Village Todaythumb| left|150px |Northern aspectSt James ChurchThe village is serviced by the Menangle railway station which is on Cityrails Southern Highlands line.Menangle has several heritage-listed buildings. These include Camden House,(Camden Park Heritage Listing) The Menangle Store,(Menangle Store Heritage Listing) the Rotolactor,(Rotolactor info. and image) Gilbulla,(Gilbulla Heritage Listing) The Pines, Menangle railway station(Menangle Station), and the Menangle Railway Viaduct.()Menangle has two churches, St James Anglican and St Patricks Catholic Church. Both churches are Heritage Listed. St Patricks is a typical example of a Simplified Gothic Revival country church of its time.(St Patricks Heritage Listing) St James (18761896) has historical significance through its links with the Macarthur-Onslow family of Camden Park and Gilbulla, and its associations with two leading architects, Horbury Hunt and Sir John Sulman.(St James Heritage Listing)The primary school has been closed for more than twenty years and is awaiting restoration.(Menangle Public School saved: Wollondilly Advertiser, 2008)The villages population was expanded in the 1990s with the release of Camden Park Land to Westcoast developers. A Development Control plan was created to manage the heritage of the village.  Until this time, water was pumped from the Nepean River, however, in 1992 the developers provided a new water supply. References Further reading* Hawkey, Vera. 1976. A history of St. James Church of England, Menangle, 1876-1976.  N.S.W. : Parish of St. John. ISBN 0909625050* Menangle School 90th. Anniversary : souvenir book (1961)* Menangle Underbridge Assessment : Review of Damage State Library of NSW. Retrieved June 2010.* Moloney, J. J. 1929. Early Menangle.  Newcastle, N.S.W. : The Australasian Society of Patriots, Dally Dalley Branch.* Willams, Ken. 2009. Along the Menangle Road : a concise history of the land grants on Menangle Road between Menangle Bridge and the junction with Picton Road.  Picton and District Historical and Family History Society. ISBN 0957992580External links* Menangle Community Website* Durham Green Retirement Village, Menangle* Elizabeth Macarthur Agricultural Institute* 1930s photo of Gilbulla* Menangle House history* St James Church history* St Patricks church history* Historic photo exhibition Macarthur Chronicle June, 2010* Image of viaduct, in 1884, from State Library of NSW* Gilbulla Conference Centre* Menangle Virus, 1997Menangle GalleryFile:St James Menangle 1.jpg|St James ChurchFile:Saint Patricks Menangle.jpg|St Patricks ChurchFile:Menangle Store.jpg|Menangle StoreFile:Menangle Station Buildings.jpg|Heritage listed station buildingsFile:Menangle Viaduct 1.jpg|Railway Viaduct: deckFile:Menangle Viaduct 2.jpg|Railway Viaduct: northern approachFile:Menangle Viaduct 3.jpg|Railway Viaduct: eastern sideFile:Menangle Viaduct 4.jpg|Railway Viaduct: western side
4944216
Pedro_Domingo_Murillo
:For the province, see Domingo Murillo Province.awards        Pedro Domingo Murillo (17571810) was a patriot of Peru who played a key role in Bolivias independence.BiographyBorn in the city of La Paz on September 17, 1757. Belonging to an elite family La Paz, his father is Juan Ciriaco Murillo, seminarian who shortly after his birth became a priest and a native woman named Mary Ascencia Carrasco. He was trained by his father and may have attended the Colegio Seminario de San Carlos, at La Paz. Then he studied law at the Universidad San Francisco Xavier de La Plata (Chuquisaca), although apparently he did not finished his studies. In 1778 he married in Potosi Olmedo Manuel de la Concha. In 1781 he found himself living in Irupana and had at least two children. When he took part in the campaign against the of Tpac Amaru II, distinguished by its great value, for which he was appointed Lieutenant of the Militia.In 1785 his father died, Juan Ciriaco Murillo, which left most of his fortune to the children of Pedro Murillo and Manuel de la Concha. However, an aunt of Pedro, called Catalina Felipe, he filed a lawsuit, he disputed property left by Juan Ciriaco. Murillo won easily in the first instance, but made a terrible mistake: falsifying his law degree.Pedro Murillo acted with great cunning. First, he used that had a rector at the Universidad San Francisco Xavier. Then, when you set a date to take the test, none other than the Attorney General of the Royal Auduencia, Murillo was submitted with the Notary Sebastian del Toro, who worked regularly for members of the audience, the notary certifies that Pedro Murillo submitted days ago, the original title, which that day was forgotten. Thus, consideration can yield Murillo without showing any discharge document. He explained that he was brilliant examination and obtained his law degree. But a year later, when Murillo was practicing in La Paz, was denounced as a forger of his title. Quoted by Judge Sebastian Segurola (friend) to present the original of the title, Murillo simply disappeared. Authorities to raid his home discovered the medium even falsifying documents in the handwriting of Murillo. Later, no less than four notaries attest that Murillo had forged their signatures.For this reason, Murillo not only lost the case against her aunt, but it is declared in contempt and must escape from the authorities, however, in early 1789 he was pardoned. After that, Pedro Murillo is engaged in mining.In 1805 he was part of a group that conspired against the Spanish government, but was discovered and brought to trial. In 1809, leads a band of patriots who plotted and rebelled on July 16, 1809. A few days later, met in a council to make public a document called Proclamation Tuitiva Board, expressed the same as the release of the Alto Peru from the Spanish Empire.After the Revolution of July 16, 1809, the royalist troops sent to suppress the revolution in La Paz, some from the Viceroyalty of Peru and the other from Buenos Aires, but by that time the troops of the regiments composed of natives would not intervene a repression of a patriotic movement. Murillo decided to escape the royal army, but was captured and hanged along with other patriots on January 29, 1810. Before his execution made the following statement:Every 16 July, the town of La Paz recalls the patriotic deeds of the year 1809. The departmental celebration begins when the various national and local authorities turn the call Tea of Liberty is in the house of the martyr, and then a parade through the center of the city of La Paz, in which citizens torches in their hands to symbolize the torch of Pedro Domingo Murillo, parade known as the Parade of Teas.Bibliography* ReferencesDomingo MurilloDomingo MurilloMurillo
4953515
Garcia_River
 footnotes The Garcia River is a river on the northern coast of California, in southern Mendocino County. The rivers watershed covers  and its mainstem is  long. The watershed receives  of precipitation per year near the coast and  inland. The watersheds elevation ranges from sea level near the ocean to  in the Coast Range. The river empties into the Ocean just north of Arena.Excessive erosion caused by logging, grazing and gravel mining is the most serious issue facing the river. Logging in the area began in the 19th century, but the most damage occurred in the decades after World War II. During this time, modern machinery was available, increasing production, but regulations and industry good practices had not yet been developed. The river and its tributaries were often clogged with logging slash. In addition, skidding the logs over streams destroyed their protective vegetation. The streams were eventually cleared of this debris, naturally and through human efforts. Unfortunately, there is now a lack of large woody debris in the streams because of the extensive logging. This debris is needed for salmonid reproduction, to help prevent erosion and to create pool habitat for aquatic organisms.About 80 percent of the land in the watershed is privately owned. Coast Forestlands is the largest landowner in the area, followed by Pacific and Mailliard Ranch. There are several more large landowners that own the bulk of the rest. However, some land of the land consists of private residences and small ranches and farms. Public access to the river and the rest of the watershed is limited due to this private ownership.CourseFrom the confluence of Pardaloe Creek and Mill Creek, about  south of California, the Garcia River descends to the west. After receiving water from Inman Creek, it turns northwestward.  Then the North Fork Garcia River enters from the right.  Just south of Mountain View Road, the river turns westward again, flowing under State Route 1 at milepost 18.5.  It discharges into the Pacific Ocean between Point Arena and Manchester State Beach.References*State Water Resources Control Board*Klamath Resource Information SystemSee also*of rivers in California
4959459
Wolfen,_Germany
Wolfen is a town in the district Anhalt-Bitterfeld, Saxony-Anhalt, Germany. Since 1st of July, 2007 it is part of the town Bitterfeld-Wolfen. It is situated approximately 6 kilometres northwest of Bitterfeld, and 20 kilometres south of Dessau.In the early 1920s the first colour film of the world was produced by AGFA in Wolfen. After the second world war the name was ORWO (ORiginal WOlfen). ORWO was the only worldwide trademark of the GDR. During GDR years, Wolfen became home to most people working at the Bitterfeld and Wolfen industrial plants (Filmfabrik Wolfen, Chemiekombinat Bitterfeld (including former Farbenfabrik, Wolfen)) and lignite mining company BKK Bitterfeld (today: MIBRAG). Since the reunification, the whole area has suffered from disinvestment, deindustrialization, and depopulation; unemployment became a serious problem. Population decreased by approximately 50% because of these problems. Since the 1990s the industry became a new chance with Bayer, Hereaus, Q-Cells and Guardian Industries.de:Wolfeneo:Wolfen(ville)hsb:Wolfenit:Wolfennl:Wolfenro:Wolfenru:sv:Wolfen
4966992
Inca_society
 thumb|Inca tunicThe society of the Empire was centered in what is now Peru, from 1438 BC to 1533 AD. Over that period, the Inca used conquest and peaceful assimilation to incorporate in their empire a large portion of western South America, centered on the Andean mountain ranges. The Inca empire proved short-lived: by AD 1533, Atahualpa, the last Inca emperor, called Inca, was killed on the orders of the conquistador Pizarro, marking the beginning of Spanish rule.PopulationThe population of Tawantinsuyu is currently unknown. There are estimates ranging from as few as 4 million people to more than 37 million. The reason for these various estimates is that, despite that the Inca kept excellent census records using their quipus, knowledge of how to read them has been lost. Almost all of them had been destroyed by the Harns in the course of their conquest.( There is some debate about the size of the population.)ChildhoodInca childhood was harsh by todays standards.When a child was born, the Inca would wash the baby in cold water and wrap it in a quilt. Later, the baby was put in a pit in the ground as a simple playground. By around age one, the baby could expect to receive very severe discipline. At age fourteen, boys earned a loincloth in a ceremony to mark their manhood. Boys from noble families were subjected to many different procedures of endurance and knowledge. After the test, they received earplugs and a weapon, the colour of which represented rank in society. WomenWomen were an essential part of Inca society. Their principal role in society was to care for their children, cook, weave, make chicha beer and work at the fields; however, they had many other household duties to make their lives after marriage very strenuous. MarriageIncan women were typically married at the age of sixteen. In Inca society, due to economic regulations, men of lower rank could only have one wife. The aristocracy, starting with the curaca, were allowed to engage in polygamy.()Trial marriages were typical within Inca culture. In this type of marriage, the man and woman would agree to try out being married to one another for a few years. At the end of this time, the woman could go home to her parents if she wished, and her husband could also send her home if he did not think it would work out. However, once the marriage was made final, they could only divorce if the woman was childless.Women would almost always marry men in the same social class as them. However, while it was very rare for them to marry a man with a higher social ranking, it was still possible for some young women. The only way for a young woman to alter her social ranking would be if a man of higher ranking took notice of her.In the Inca society, a wedding was not a joyous celebration. Instead, it was looked at more as a business-like agreement. Therefore,  for the Inca, marriage was an economic agreement between two families. Once a woman was married, she was expected to collect food and cook, watch over the animals and the children. A womans household obligations would not change after she became pregnant. When she did find out she was pregnant she prayed and made offerings to an Inca god, Kanopa.ArtsThe Inca were a conquering society, and their expansionist assimilation of other cultures is evident in their artistic style.  The artistic style of the Inca utilized the vocabulary of many regions and cultures, but incorporated these themes into a standardized imperial style that could easily be replicated and spread throughout the empire.  The simple abstract geometric forms and highly stylized animal representation in ceramics, wood carvings, textiles and metalwork were all part of the Inca culture.  The motifs were not as revivalist as previous empires. No motifs of other societies were directly used with the exception of Huari and Tiwanaku arts.ShipbuildingFor fishing, trade, construction, transport and military purposes, the Inca built seagoing vessels called balsas by weaving together totora reeds. The largest of these vessels were 20 to 30 meters long, making them comparable in length to Spanish Caravels. This method of constructing ships from woven reeds is an ancient Peruvian tradition which long predates the Inca. There are depictions of such vessels in Moche pottery dating back to 100 A.D.ClothingInca officials wore stylized tunics that indicated their status. It contains an amalgamation of motifs used in the tunics of particular officeholders. For instance, the black and white checkerboard pattern topped with a red triangle is believed to have been worn by soldiers of the Inca army. Some of the motifs make reference to earlier cultures, such as the stepped diamonds of the Huari and the three step stairstep motif of the Moche. Cloth was divided into three classes. Awaska was used for household use, having an approximate count of about 120 threads per inch, and usually made from llama wool. Finer cloth, qunpi, was divided into two classes: The first, woven by male qunpikamayuq (keepers of fine cloth) from alpaca wool, was collected as tribute from throughout the country and was used for trade, to adorn rulers and to be given as gifts to political allies and subjects to cement loyalty. The other class of qunpi ranked highest. It was woven in the Acllawasi (acllahuasi) by aclla (female virgins of the sun god temple) from vicua wool and used solely for royal and religious use.  These had thread counts of 600 or more per inch, unsurpassed anywhere in the world, until the Revolution of the 19th century. Aside from the tunic, a person of importance wore a llawtu, a series of cords wrapped around the head. To establish his importance, the Inca Atahualpa commissioned a llawtu woven from vampire bat hair. The leader of each ayllu, or extended family, had its own headdress. In conquered regions, traditional clothing continued to be worn, but the finest weavers, such as those of Chan, were transferred to Cusco and kept there to weave qunpi. (The Chim had previously transferred these same weavers to Chan Chan from Sican.)The Incan government controlled all clothing of their society. One would receive two outfits of clothing, one formal and one casual pair, and they would then proceed to wear those same outfits until they could literally be worn no longer. Since the government was in such strict control on their clothing, the Incans could not alter their clothing without the permission of the government. HairstylesDiscoveries have been made about the Incan hairstyles through studying their ancient mummies. It is believed that women of this culture had very long hair that they would most typically braid. Men on the other hand, would still have relatively long hair, yet would occasionally cut it with a certain type of knife. It has been thought that certain hairstyles may distinguish one class from another.JewelryThe wearing of jewelry was not uniform throughout the empire. Chim artisans, for example, continued to wear earrings after their integration into the empire, but in many other regions, only local leaders wore them.Ceramics and metalworkImage:Recipiente Chim-Inca caimn (M. Amrica, Madrid) 01.jpg|thumb|200px|right|Chim-Inca ceramic from the Late Horizon.Ceramics were for the most part utilitarian in nature, but also incorporated the imperialist style that was prevalent in the Inca textiles and metalwork.  In addition, the Inca played drums and on woodwind instruments including flutes, pan-pipes and trumpets made of shell and ceramics.The Inca made beautiful objects of gold, silver, copper, bronze and tumbago . But precious metals were in shorter supply than in earlier Peruvian cultures. The Inca metalworking style draws much of its inspiration from Chim art and in fact the best metal workers of Chan were transferred to Cusco when the Kingdom of Chimor was incorporated into the empire. Unlike the Chim, the Inca do not seem to have regarded metals to be as precious as fine cloth. Nonetheless, the metalworks of the Incas were perhaps the most advanced in America. When the Spanish first encountered the Inca they were offered gifts of qunpi cloth.Incan ceramics are usually very distinct and easy to recognize. The shapes of the vessels are highly standardized. The most typical Incan pottery would have a spherical body with a cone shaped base. This spherical body usually includes two vertical side handles with a tall neck and flaring rim. The Incans often would place animal heads on their pottery as well usually near the top of the vessel. There were also several other popular styles for Incan ceramics which included a shallow dish with a single bird head and handle, a pedestal beaker, and a single or double handled bottle. Incans often decorated their ceramics with a multitude of images and colors. They usually decorated their pottery with bright colors of red, yellow, orange, black and white. Much like all other forms of Incan art, the pottery was often decorated with geometric shapes. The Incans would put diamonds, squares, checkers, triangles, circles and dots on almost all of their ceramic work. Other common themes were animals and insects like llamas, birds, jaguars, alpacas, bees, butterflies as well as block-like humans. Image:Andean Bronze Age Bottle.jpg|thumb|160px|left|An Andean silver bottle made by Chim artisans from circa 1300  A.D.As part of a tax obligation to the commoners, mining was required in all the provinces. Even though the Inca Empire contained a lot of precious metals, the Incans did not value their metal as much as fine cloth. The Incans adopted much of their metal-working characteristics from the metalwork of Chimu. Because of their expertise in metalworking, after the fall of Chimu many metalworkers were taken back to the capital city of Cuzco to continue their metalworking for the emperor. Copper, tin, gold, and silver were all obtained from mines or washed from the river gravels. These metals would then be handed over to metallurgists. Because the Inca had a system that emphasized political and religious organization, there were many specialized artisans like metallurgists. There were also specialized weavers, cloth makers, pottery makers, and many more. Both copper and bronze would be used for basic farming tools or weapons. Some of the common bronze and copper pieces found in the Incan empire included sharp sticks for digging, club-heads, knives with curved blades, axes, chisels, needles and pins. All of these items would be forged by a metallurgist and then spread throughout the empire.  	The Incans reserved their more precious metals for ornaments and decorations. Gold and silver were common themes throughout the palaces of Incan emperors. It was said that the walls and thrones were covered with gold and that the emperor dined on gold and silver service. These golden plated services would often be inlaid with llamas, butterflies or other creatures. Even beyond the gold and decoration of the emperors palace were the ornaments that decorated all of the temples throughout the empire. The temples of the Incans were strewn with sacred and highly precious objects. Headdresses, crowns, ceremonial knives, cups, and a lot of ceremonial clothing were all inlaid with gold or silver.  	Many historians believe that the choice of gold was to distinguish the more sacred or holy pieces from others. The commonality of gold has much to do with the Incan religion surrounding the sun. Because of the beautiful reflection that gold casts, it gave the appearance of containing the sun, making the precious metal even more valued in a sun-obsessed society. Gold was reserved for the highest class of Incan society which consisted of priests, lords and of course the Sapa Inca or emperor.Educationthumb|Representation of an Incan quipuThe Inca used quipu or bunches of knotted strings, for accounting and census purposes.  Much of the information on the surviving quipus has been shown to be numeric data; some numbers seem to have been used as mnemonic labels, and the color, spacing, and structure of the quipu carried information as well.  Since it isnt known how to interpret the coded or non-numeric data, some scholars still hope to find that the quipu recorded language.  The Inca depended largely on oral transmission as a means of maintaining the preservation of their culture. Inca education was divided into two distinct categories: vocational education for common people of Inca and highly formalized training for the nobility.MedicineThe Inca made many discoveries in medicine. They performed successful skull surgery, which involved cutting holes in the skull to release pressure from head wounds.Coca leaves were used to lessen hunger and pain, as they still are in the Andes. The Chasqui (messengers) chewed coca leaves for extra energy to carry on their tasks as runners delivering messages throughout the empire.Recent research by Erasmus University and Medical Center workers Sewbalak and Van Der Wijk showed that, contrary to popular belief, the Inca people were not addicted to coca.Another remedy was to cover boiled bark from a pepper tree and place it over a wound while still warm.The Inca also used guinea pigs not only for food but for a so-called well-working medicine.Burial practicesImage:Peruvian mummy.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Peruvian mummy at the Convent (Lisbon).The Inca believed in reincarnation. Those who obeyed the Incan moral code &mdash; ama suwa, ama llulla, ama quella (do not steal, do not lie, do not be lazy) &mdash; went to live in the Suns warmth. Others spent their eternal days in the cold earth. The Inca also believed in mummifying  personages. The mummies would be provided with an assortment of objects which were to be taken into the pacarina. The mallquis were also used in various rituals or celebrations. The deceased were generally buried in a sitting position. One such example was the 500-year-old mummy Juanita the Ice Maiden, a girl very well-preserved in ice that was discovered at 20,000 feet, near the summit of Ampato in Southern Peru. Her burial included many items left as offerings to the Inca gods.ReligionThe belief system of the Incas was polytheistic. Inti, the Sun God, was the most important god, which the Incas believed was the direct ancestor of the Sapa Inca, the title of the hereditary rulers of the empire.Other practicesThe Inca practiced cranial deformation. They achieved this by wrapping tight cloth straps around the heads of newborns in order to alter the shape of their still-soft skulls. These deformations did not result in brain damage. Researchers at the Field Museum believe that the practice was used to mark different ethnicities across the Inca Empire.(Machu Picchu: Ongoing Investigations)Food and farmingleft|thumb|Around 200 varieties of Peruvian potatoes were cultivated by the Incas and their predecessorsIt is estimated that the Inca cultivated around seventy crop species.  The main crops were potatoes, potatoes, maize, chili peppers, cotton, tomatoes, peanuts, an edible root called oca, and the pseudograins quinoa and amaranth. The  crops developed by the Inca and preceding cultures makes South America one of the historic centers of diversity (along with the East, India, Mesoamerica, Ethiopia, and the East). Many of these crops were widely distributed by the Spanish and are now important crops worldwide. Salsa was originated by the Inca people using tomatoes, chili peppers, and other spices.thumb|Many varieties of Peruvian maize (corn) were well-known to the Incas for centuriesThe Inca cultivated food crops on dry Pacific coastlines, high on the slopes of the Andes, and in the lowland rainforest. In mountainous Andean environments, they made extensive use of terraced fields which not only allowed them to put to use the mineral-rich mountain soil which other peoples left fallow, but also took advantage of micro-climates conducive to a variety of crops being cultivated throughout the year. Agricultural tools consisted mostly of simple sticks. The Inca also raised llamas and alpacas for their wool, meat, and to use them as pack animals and captured wild vicuas for their fine hair.  The road system was key to farming success as it allowed distribution of foods over long distances. The Inca also constructed vast storehouses, which allowed them to live through Nio years while some neighboring civilizations suffered. Inca leaders kept records of what each ayllu in the empire produced, but did not tax them on their production. They instead used the mita for the support of the empire.The Inca diet consisted primarily of fish and vegetables, supplemented less frequently with the meat of cuyes (guinea pigs) and camelids. In addition, they hunted various animals for meat, skins and feathers.  Maize was malted and used to make chicha, a fermented alcoholic beverage.   Economy According to Ferreira and Chamot::The social system of the Incas had an ancient Andean origin based on the ayllu, an extended family group with a common ancestor. The economic system was also based on ancient social structures and can be explained through several principles, namely reciprocity, redistribution, and vertical control.These authors also add::Redistribution, a practice employed by the state, ensured that all agricultural goods not exchanged by reciprocity were to be distributed in the different areas of the empire in the case of bad crops.(Darget-Chamot, Ferreira Cultures and Customs of Peru; Greenwood Press; Westport Ct/London; 2003; pp 13)In essence, the government of the Inca functioned as a safeguard against mass starvation.ReferencesExternal links*Inca Architecture*Inca civilization and other ancient civilizations.inca 
4981669
Van_Duzen_River
 footnotes The Van Duzen River is a river on the north coast of California. It is a major tributary of the Eel River and drains , mostly in Humboldt County, with a small portion in Trinity County. The river travels  from its headwaters on the west side of the North Coast Range to its confluence with the Eel River, about  upstream from the Ocean and  south of California. The rivers elevation is over  at its source and only  when it merges with the Eel River. The river has two forks in its upper reaches. The North Fork travels northwest until it reaches the small town of Dinsmore, where it starts flowing west. The Little Van Duzen, which also flows northwest, joins the North Fork a few miles later. The river flows roughly west from then on. It meets its largest tributary, Yaeger Creek, about  before it reaches the Eel River.The primary use in the watershed is timberland. Road construction and poor logging practices, particularly historical, have increased erosion, leading to excessive sediment buildup in the river and its tributaries. In addition, gravel mining, particularly at the confluence of the Van Duzen and Eel River, has increased erosion, affected channel alignment and may block migration.About 26 percent of the land is owned by industrial timber companies. About 31 percent is privately owned, but not industrial, land used for timber production and ranches. Residential land makes up 26 percent and public land makes up 17 percent. Most of the public land is near the rivers headwaters in Rivers National Forest.The Van Duzen River has been federally designated as a Wild and Scenic River.References*United States Environmental Protection Agency*Klamath Resource Information System*Save the RedwoodsExternal links*, USGS, GNIS* Friends of the Van Duzen River
4989510
Samar_Mubarak_Mand
 footnotes         Samar Mubarakmand (Urdu:   ) (born September 17, 1942), (NI, HI, SI, Ph.D, FPAS), is  a Pakistani  physicist, who served as the founding chairman of Engineering and Scientific Commission (NESCOM) from 2001 till 2007.( Samar Mubarak-Mand launched the  Missile Integration Programme in 1987 which was successfully completed in 2005. A pioneer of Fluid and Aerodynamics in Pakistan, Mand earned renowned internationally in May 1998, when he headed the team of academic scientists which carried out the countrys first and successful nuclear tests  Codename Chagai-I on May 28 and Codename Chagai-II on May 30  in Balochistan Province of Pakistan.()EducationSamar Mubarakmand completed his elementary and intermediate education from Lahore, British Punjab. He did his matriculation from St. Anthonys High School in 1956.() He received his B.Sc. in Physics in 1958 and, followed by his M.Sc. degree in nuclear physics in 1962, in which he wrote his M.Sc. thesis on Construction of a gamma-ray spectrometer,both from College University, Lahore.() The same year, he won the doctoral scholarship, and attended Oxford University. Mand studied with Shaukat Hameed Khan, and while at Oxford, he studied scattering and dynamical theory of spectroscopy. He received his Ph.D. in Physics from the of Oxford in 1966 under the renowned nuclear physicist Dr. D. H. Wilkinson.() There, Mand studied with Shaukat Hameed Khan at the Physics Department, learning about the accelerators, and after returning to Pakistan he built one. In Oxford, he was part of the team that commissioned a 22 million volt atomic accelerator.() After his doctorate, Mand returned to Pakistan where he joined Pakistan Atomic Energy Commission in 1966.Pakistan Atomic Energy Commission (PAEC)After his doctorate, Mand joined Pakistan Atomic Energy Commission (PAEC) in 1966. The following year, he was sent to Institute of Nuclear Science and Technology (PINSTECH) where he did his post-doctoral research under Ahmad Khan. In January 1972, Mand was assigned to Ahmads Nuclear Physics Division where he took charge to carry out the calculations in implosion method, and mathematical multiplication involved in nuclear fission.() In 1974, on the advise of Abdus Salam, Ishfaq Ahmad formed the Fast Neutron Physics Group, making Mand as its head. Mand was tasked to began to calculated the energys distributive ranges  determining the numbers would produced during the fission process  and economy  how much power would be produced by the neutrons.( In September 1973, Mand then began the work on simultaneity  key calculations involving to investigate detonation of the weapon from several points at the same time. However, the work was passed on to the Mathematical Physics Group (MPG) under Qadir, and the Theoretical Physics Group (TPG) under Salam as it felt that the calculations would be better off with MPG and TPG under Salam, as it involved complex mathematical and physics applications of Einsteins Special and relativity.( Mand charged with the test teams, and was made responsible for the countdown for the detonation of the weapon.( As scientist, Mands team was tasked with the carrying the measurement and collecting scientific experimented data from the nuclear detonation.(In 1978, both TPG and MPG completed the work on the neutron calculations, and the designing of the first implosion fission weapon. In 1978, Mand led the construction of a nuclear and particle linear accelerator, and the generator at the secret Pinstech Laboratory. On March 11 of 1983, Mand was one of the few scientists that were invited to eye-witnessed the cold test of theoretically designed weapon, codename Kirana-I. Mand was the part of the Ishfaq Ahmads Nuclear Physics Division, and led the countdown of the weapon while TPG and MPG calculated the yield. In 1980s, Mand was given transferred to Directorate for Technical Development(DTD)  a secret directorate that was mandate to develop lenses and triggering mechanism for the fission weapon. There, along with Qureshi, Mand provided the technical assistance to the engineers there. At Pinstech Laboratory, Mand built another nuclear accelerator to conduct studies of an explosion process in a fission weapon. For his own role in the project and DTD, Mand later concluded: Engineer people (referring to Hafeez Qureshi and dr. Zaman Sheikh), at DTD, were really smart. They were trained very thoroughly in the development of a weapons necessary materials at very low cost.(Samar Mubarakmand, Science Odyssey: Pakistans Nuclear Emergence, November 30th 1998.)  Mubarakmand first visited in Chagai Hills in 1981, along with Ishfaq Ahmad and other scientists from different divisions. In 1998, in the absent of Ishfaq Ahmad, Mand had briefly directed then-Prime minister Sharif as he was first responsible for the preparations of tests. However, after Ishfaq Ahmad arrived, Mand was made responsible for the preparations of the tests. In May 28, 1998, Mand led the countdown of tests  codename Chagai-I  in Koh Hills of Chagai region. On May 30, Ishfaq Ahmad received permission from the Prime minister, and Mand led the a very small team of academic scientists that supervised the countrys plutonium fission weapon  codename Chagai-II. ) In the 1990s, he served as the Director General of Defence Complex, another Pakistani organization shrouded in secrecy.()On a day when Mubarakmand was interviewed by Pakistani journalists Mir on his program Talk, Mubarakmand eulogized his memories and said::Dr. Qadeer Khan sahib was also one of them It was the first visit of his life to Chagai. He came at the invitation of the Chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission, Dr. Ahmad, and he arrived 15 minutes prior to the explosions.()Space programmeAfter his active role in Pakistans nuclear weapons research programme, Mubarakmand has been associated with the countrys space program where he largely contributed his research in fluid dynamics, aerodynamics, and physics. Into Pakistans scientific circle, he is known as father of Pakistans missile program where he is reportedly been present at the flight test facilities of Pakistan.() In 1987, Ministry of Defence initiated the Missile Research and Development Programme, an equivalent program to Indias Integrated Guided Missile Development Program (IGMDP). The MoD initiated the program under the leadership of dr. Samar Mubarakmand and dr. Abdul Qadeer Khan. In 1995, Mubarakmand became chief project coordinator of Shaheen Strategic Missile Guidance System, and the following year, Mubarakmand was made head of the Missile Research and Development Programme (IMRDP), . The program, in which, Pakistans developed its liquid and solid booster based missiles for her nuclear war heads. As the head of the Missile Integration Program, Mubarakmands team successfully developed the solid booters and solid engine for Shaheen-I. This was later followed by developing the Shaheen-II and Shaheen-III missiles.  As of today, Mubarakmand is considered the main architect of Pakistans missile program, which includes systems such as the missile, missile series, and the Ghaznavi missile system.()Mubarakmand, who has been a chief architect of Pakistans solid booster, he has been a strong advocate for a Pakistans space program. As a Science and Technology member at the Planning Commission of Pakistan, he has been staunch supporter of rocket science in his country where he led the Shaheen Missile guidance system project. Talking to the media on  August 18, 2009, Mubarakmand has Pakistan would launch its own satellite in April 2011 it made some things seem all to obvious to analyst familiar with the subject.()He described the satellite as being able to monitor agricultural programs, minerals programs and weather conditions and that it was funded by the Pakistani Planning Commission. He went on to say there was enough moneys for both the defense, nuclear and space programs. Whether this will be a less than 100 kg first test satellite or a much heavier satellite remains to be seen.()Thar Coal Power ProjectOf 2010, currently, Dr. Samarkand Mubarakmand is supervising coal mining practiced on scientific lines, for the Thar Coal Power Project.LegacySamar Mubarakmand is widely credited with bringing modernization in the design and development of many components and instruments that are the backbone of Pakistans nuclear and missile technology.() Mubarakmand is a recipient of Pakistans three highest civilian awards; Sitara-e-Imtiaz (1993), Hilal-e-Imtiaz (1998) and Nishan-e-Imtiaz (2003). In 2000, he was elected Fellow of Academy of Sciences. He has always kept a low profile and is often referred to as the Unsung Hero of Nuclear Pakistan. Despite keeping away from the public spotlight, Samar Mubarakmand is considered the most influential and eminent Pakistani Nuclear Scientist.Samar Mubarakmand served as Special Assistant to the Prime Minister on Science & Technology from December 2007 to April 2008, and joined Commission (Pakistan), Government of Pakistan as Member (Science & Technology) on 16-12-2008.Scientific journals and papersConference Papers* A Science Oddyssey: Pakistans Nuclear emergence, Dr. Samar Mubarakmand, Dr. Khalil Qureshi, Dr. Masoor Beg, Dr. Ahmad.Research Publications* Aspects of a-emission from the bombardment of 58Ni with 14.7 MeV neutrons, by Naeem Ahmad Khan, Samar Mubarakmand and Masud Ahmed, journal of Nuclear physics, PINSTECH.*Cross-section measurements with a neutron generator by Samar Mubarakmand, Masud Ahmad, M. Anwar and M. S. Chaudhry.*Some characteristic differences between the etch pits due to 86Rn and 232 Th  particles in CA8015 and LR115 cellulose nitrate track detectors, by Hameed Ahmad Khan, M. Afzal, P. Chaudhary, Samar Mubarakmand, F. I. Nagi and A.Waheed, journal of Isotopic Radiation, PINSTECH (1977).*Application of glass solid state nuclear track detectors in the measurement of the + particle fission crosssection of uranium, by Samar Mubarakmand, K. Rashid, P. Chaudhry and Hameed Ahmad Khan, Methods of Nuclear Instrumentation. (1977)*Etching of glass solid state nuclear track detectors in aqueous solutions of (4NH)2HF, NaOH and KOH, by Hameed Ahmad Khan, R. A. Akbar, A. Waheed, P. Chaudhry and Samar Mubarakmand, journal of Isotopic Radiation, PINSTECH (1978).*Derivation of a mathematical relationship between the relative movement of point charges and their associated viscosic medium - Dr. Samar Mubarakmand, Fahad Shiftra and Prof. Ian.*Super critical movement of point charges in a Bose-Einstein condensate-Fahad Shiftra, Prof. Abidi and Dr. Samar Mubarakmand (Turkish journal of physics - May 2005)Awards and honors* Dr. Nazir Ahmad Award (2007)* Nishan-e-Imtiaz (2003)* Hilal-e-Imtiaz (1998)* Sitara-e-Imtiaz (1992)* Academic Roll of Honour, College, Lahore (1962).Memberships/fellowships* Fellow of Academy of Sciences (2000)* Fellow of Pakistan Nuclear Society (1995)* An elected member of Nuclear Society of Pakistan (1994)* Fellow of the Pakistan Mathematical Society (2007)Quotes by Samar Mubarakmand* Samar Mubarakmands response on the day when Pakistan complete its nuclear task of explosion on May 28, 1998.:():See also*and its Nuclear Detterent Program*Ahmad Khan*Ahmad*Hafeez Qureshi*(missile)*Chagai-I*Chagai-II*HillsNotesReferences and Links*Samar Mubarakmand* http://www.pakdef.info/nuclear&missile/memorial_munirahmed.html* http://www.pakdef.info/forum/showthread.php?t9214%20-%20280k* http://cerncourier.com/cws/article/cern/28142/1/people11_12-99* http://www.ciitlahore.edu.pk/PL/News/VisitDrSamar110209.html* http://www.pakdef.info/nuclear&missile/science_odyssey.html 
5002319
Notebook_(style)
Notebook is a style of writing where people jot down what they have thought or heard at the spur of moment. The contents of a notebook are unorganized, and the number of subjects covered in a notebook are unlimited: a paragraph of autobiography can be followed immediately by one on astronomy or one on history. Some famous authors are also famous for the notebooks they left. The Italian poet Leopardi kept a notebook, called Zibaldone, from 1817 to 1832. The idea of keeping that, which contains no less than 4,526 pages, was possibly suggested by a priest who fled from the Revolution and came to live in the poets hometown. The priest suggested that every literary man should have a written chaos such as this: notebook containing sottiseries, adrersa, excerpta, pugillares, commentaria... the store-house out of which fine literature of every kind may come, as the sun, moon, and stars issued out of chaos.(Origo, Leopardi: A Study in Solitude. Helen Marx Books. 1999. pp. 142-3.)  There are writers who earned their posthumous fame solely by their notebooks, such as the German scientist and humorous writer Lichtenberg. He called his notebooks waste book, using the English book-keeping term. He explains the purpose of his waste book in his notebook E:Die Kaufleute haben ihr Waste book (Sudelbuch, Klitterbuch glaube ich im deutschen), darin tragen sie von Tag zu Tag alles ein was sie verkaufen und kaufen, alles durch einander ohne Ordnung, aus diesem wird es in das Journal getragen, wo alles mehr systematisch steht ... Dieses verdient von den Gelehrten nachgeahmt zu werden. Erst ein Buch worin ich alles einschreibe, so wie ich es sehe oder wie es mir meine Gedancken eingeben, alsdann kann dieses wieder in ein anderes getragen werden, wo die Materien mehr abgesondert und geordnet sind.(Aus Sudelbuch E, Zeno.org.) Tradesmen have their waste book (scrawl-book, composition book I think in German), in which they enter from day to day everything they buy and sell, everything all mixed up without any order to it, from there it is transferred to the day-book, where everything appears in more systematic fashion ... This deserves to be imitated by scholars. First a book where I write down everything as I see it or as my thoughts put it before me, later this can be transcribed into another, where the materials are more distinguished and ordered.The notebooks of scientists, such as those of Faraday and Darwin, can reveal the development of their scientific theories. On the other hand, the notebooks used by scientists for recording their experiments are called notebooks.The notebooks used by artists are usually referred as sketchbooks, which may contain more than sketches. da Vincis notebooks contain his writings on painting, sculpture, architecture, anatomy, mining, inventions and music, as well as his sketches, his grocery lists and the names of people who owed him money.In Chinese literature, notebook or biji is a distinct genre, and has a broader meaning.Notes(zh:
5011333
University_of_Pittsburgh_School_of_Health_and_Rehabilitation_Sciences
Image:Forbes Tower.JPG|thumb|300|right|Tower, one of several buildings on Pitt Campus related to the SchoolThe University of Pittsburgh School of Health and Rehabilitation Sciences (or SHRS) is one of the schools of the of Pittsburgh, one of six dedicated to Sciences.() The School has its own publication, FACETS,  which is published 7 times a year.()HistoryThe school was originally founded in 1969 as the School of Health Related Professions.() By 1971, the school had 23 full-time faculty members and had graduated 31 students with degrees, 10 with degrees and 18 with post-baccalaureate certificates. Focused from its creation on entry-level professional education, the school began to focus more on research and advanced graduate school after 1989, under the guidance of then senior vice chancellor for health sciences Thomas Detre.() The name of the school was changed in 1991 after E. Brubaker became Dean, at which time it was expanded with new programs and departments.( In 2009-2010, the faculty had grown to over 100, with over 1,100 enrolled students.()AcademicsThe school offers a school-wide Health and Rehabilitation Sciences program as well programs in eight other specialized departments/programs within the school: Communication Science and Disorders, Medicine, Information Management, Therapy, Therapy, Assistant Studies, Rehabilitation Science and Technology, and Medicine and Nutrition. Degrees available in each program vary from certificate programs, to degrees, degrees, professional degrees (e.g. of Physical Therapy and of Audiology), and PhDs.()In 2010, the News & World Report listed the school as among the top graduate programs to prepare...for a successful career in the United States in the field of Physical Therapy, where it tied for 2nd place with the University School of Medicine.() The school also ranked tied for ninth in Occupational Therapy,() 12th in Speech-Language Pathology,() and 16th in Audiology() by U.S. News in their most recent ranking of those graduate  programs in 2008. The schools athletic training program was also ranked fifth in the nation according to a 2003 study of undergraduate athletic training education.()ResearchSHRS faculty and students are active in basic, translational and clinical research. In 2009, SHRS received more than $13.5 million in external research funding from government and private sources.() Areas of inquiry include: the measurement and study of motion; balance disorders; human performance; hearing disorders; speech, language and cognitive disorders; neuropsychological parameters; telerehabilitation; wheelchair performance and design; and data mining. SHRS research typically involves faculty from multiple departments, schools, as well as other institutions.()SHRS includes four Institute on Disability and Rehabilitation Research Rehabilitation Engineering Research Centers (RERCs): Wheelchair Transportation Safety, Telerehabilitation, Spinal Cord Injury, and Wheeled Mobility.() Some particularly important interdisciplinary collaborations include: McGowan Institute for Regenerative Medicine (MIRM)http://www.mirm.pitt.edu/, Psychiatry, Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation, Neurological Surgery, Orthopedic Surgery, Nursing,  Center for Sports Medicine, Neurology, Center for Emergency Medicine of Western Pennsylvania, Otolaryngology, and several departments of Pitts School of Engineering. Collaborations also exist with schools and programs of Mellon University including engineering, computer science, design, psychology and robotics. SHRS also has a joint project with the of Michigan and the of Louisville.()SHRS is developing resources for computational modeling for clinical research. It is working with specialist in regenerative medicine to merge rehabilitation and regeneration to create a new research paradigm for regenerative rehabilitation. Similarly, the SHRS RST department cooperates with Medical Robotics of CMU on a project in Quality of Life Technology for self-determination for older and disabled adults.Clinical collaborations include several programs of the of Pittsburgh Medical Center (e.g., Center for Assistive Technology, Institute for Rehabilitation and Research, Centers for Rehabilitation Services, Center for Sports Medicine, Comprehensive Spine Center, Facial Nerve Center).See also* of Pittsburgh Medical Center* of Pittsburgh School of MedicineReferencesExternal links* Website
5019465
Douglas,_South_Lanarkshire
Douglas is a village in Lanarkshire, Scotland. It is located on the south bank of the Water and on the road that links Ayr, on the West coast of Scotland, to Edinburgh on the East, around 12 miles south west of Lanark. The name Douglas is of Gaelic origin, dubh-glas meaning dark greey/green, in reference to the river. The Douglas family took this name when their ancestors settled here in the 12th century.HistoryThe village grew to service the nearby Castle, the seat of the Lords of Douglas. The first recorded mention of the Parish of Douglas is in a charter of de Douglas, of Moray dated between 1203-1222 to the monks of Abbey which is witnessed by Freskin Parson of Douglas, brother to the bishop.(Maxwell, vol i p17)  The castle was well established by the time of William the Hardy when he was called upon to imprison de Abernethy there in 1288 and where Abernethy died at some point before 1293.(Maxwell, vol i, p21) The castle was occupied for some time by English forces during the Wars of Independence.  However the castle was liberated by Sir James Douglas when in 1307 he and some followers trapped the English garrison inside the Castle chapel whilst they were worshiping and burnt it to the ground, causing some damage to the castle.Notable BuildingsThe only remains of the castle are those of a 17th century corner tower, still known as Dangerous, after the Scott novel which took Douglas Castle as its inspiration. In the 1930s Douglas-Home, 13th Earl of Home allowed the mining of coal in the park near to the castle, in a philanthropic effort to alleviate local unemployment. The Lanarkshire coal industry, once the mainstay of Scotlands production, had seen its output almost halved by 1937, with catastrophic consequences for local communities.  As a consequence of the mining works the castle was considered to be at risk of subsidence and had to be demolished in 1938.The oldest structure within the village itself is the ruin of St. Brides Church, which like the castle originated in the 14th century.  This church became the mausoleum of the Lords of Douglas.  The church clock, which is still in working order today, and installed sometime in the 16th century, is rumoured to have been given as a gift to the village by Queen of Scots, after spending time in the area. The parish church was moved to its present site, near to the old chapel, where the Douglas St Brides Parish Church still stands. Its congregation now worships at the newer St Brides Church built some distance away.Within the village stands a statue to one of the Covenanters, James Gavin who was persecuted for his religious faith and had his ears cut off with his own tailoring scissors for refusing to renounce it. After suffering this humiliation he was transported to a life of slavery in the cotton fields of the West Indies. The ruins of his house stood until 1968 with the tailors engraved lintel still in place above the front door. The lintel has been incorporated within the monument erected in the rear garden of the house. Also within the village is a statue of Douglas, Earl of Angus, commemorating the Cameronians regiment which he raised in 1689. Nearby, another memorial commemorates the disbanding of the Cameronians in 1968.The village was shaped later by the Revolution, which brought woolen mills and coal mining (in common with other villages in this part of Scotland). There is a heritage museum in Douglas that charts the history of the area.ReferencesNotesSources* Fraser, Sir W., The Douglas Book IV vols. Edinburgh 1885.http://www.archive.org/details/douglasbook01fras* Groome, F.H., Ordnance gazetteer of Scotland : a survey of Scottish topography, statistical, biographical, and historical, VI vols, Edinburgh 1884.http://www.archive.org/details/ordnancegazettee02groo* Maxwell, Sir H., A History of the House of Douglas II vols, London 1902.
5025013
The_Settlers:_Heritage_of_Kings
The Settlers: Heritage of Kings (also known unofficially as The Settlers V, original German title: Die Siedler - das Erbe der Knige) is the fifth instalment of The Settlers series of Time Strategy games on the PC. Heritage of Kings breaks off from the typical pattern that Settlers games have followed since they began: while the concept of the game remains, in essence, the same, a lot of the gameplay features have changed from those of Settlers IV, and slightly resemble many of the gameplay aspects displayed in the game European Wars. Despite this, Heritage of Kings still maintains many of the characteristics of classic Settlers gameplay.OverviewIn a change from the gameplay of Settlers IV, the player no longer has a choice in who they play as, the main story mode following the adventures of the kings son Dario and his companions, as they seek to defeat the evil Mordred and return peace to the land.PlotThe game starts when Dario, a young boy in Thalgrund, is suddenly attacked by minions of the evil Mordred. Dario learns from his dying mother that he is the rightful heir to the throne of the land, upon which he sets out, accompanied by his childhood friend Erec, to locate his last living relative, his uncle Helias. Throughout their journey, Dario and friends face perilous dangers and must overcome difficult challenges, including making peace between the rival nations of Barmecia and Cleycourt, battling the ferocious barbarians of Folklung and Norfolk, as well as the dark hordes, and foiling the evil schemes of the countess Mary De Mortfichet in Kaloix, before eventually reaching the Kings Castle, where Dario subdues Mordreds dark general, Kerberos.GameplayThe objective of the game remains the same as always: to create a thriving settlement, while amassing an army and defeating rival nations. There are now, however, an extraordinarily large amount of features that can be used in-game. Settlers fans will no doubt recall the scarcity of resources in the previous games; in Heritage of Kings, the introduction of Refineries for the various resources was a welcome addition, as it enabled players to construct more buildings in less time. Another welcome change was the addition of Upgrading Buildings: this enabled buildings to perform their specific job more efficiently, as well as providing room for more settlers to work there and, in some cases, providing new technology.HeroesIn Heritage of Kings, the players main party is composed of characters known as Heroes. There are a total of six of them in the main game, each with specific attributes and abilities: these abilities can only be used once, before the player must wait a specific time to use them again. The Heroes in general are much better in combat than regular infantry and cavalry units, and also have the ability to talk to people found throughout the game. If a Hero is defeated in battle, he/she lies on the battlefield until units revive them by standing near them; upon revival, the Hero faces a set time before abilities can be used again.DarioThe main character of the story, Dario, is the only hero present in the party at the beginning of the story. Dario is a swordsman living in the small village of Thalgrund in the West with his pet Falcon; however, an unexpected attack by the minions of the evil Mordred sends Dario on a wild adventure throughout the entire land. Upon clearing his village of Thalgrund of all threats, Dario sets off to the nearby village of Ridgewood to check upon his elderly mother. However Dario finds that the bandits have also attacked Ridgewood, and Darios mother lies severely wounded. As she nears her end, Darios mother explains to him that he is the rightful heir to the throne of the land, that he is the son of the once great King Keron. She hands him an amulet, and tells him that it is what the bandits were searching for, before she passes on.With his mothers words in heart, Dario sets off to rid the land of Mordred and claim his rightful throne. Battling countless enemies in the lands of Barmecia, Folklung and Kaloix, he and his party eventually arrive at the Old Kings Castle, where Garek, an old squire of Keron, awaits him. Dario cleanses the area and restores the ruined castle to its former glory. After defeating Mordreds vile General, Kerberos, Dario moves on to defeat Mordred himself in Evelance, and return peace to the land.Dario is the most well-rounded hero with useful techniques. He can send his falcon to fly in a certain direction and see what lies ahead. He can also use his leadership skills to defend his soldiers by causing enemies to retreat. The player can also get to see through the eyes of Darios Eagle (this is the only ability that can be used all the time at any time). By far Darios most useful skill is his ability to detect nearby enemies: if somebody is near, Darios icon in the bar at the top of the screen will flash blue, alerting the player of possible danger.ErecA childhood friend of Dario, Erec followed his natural talent and joined the Brotherhood of Knights, who went to war in the East. Erec then returns to Ridgewood, with quite a sizable army to meet up with his old friend. Erec accompanies Dario from Ridgewood for the rest of his journey. Erec plays a medium-major role in the plot of the story, often advising Dario on combat strategies, and leading the forces into the fray. When the party arrives in Kaloix, Erec is the first person to doubt Aris sincerity, believing that she had run off, never to be seen again, much to the dismay of Dario. However, Erec is proved to be wrong when the party finds Pilgrim in a village to the east.Erec is by far the most useful unit in combat, while the game shows Erec to have the same attack power as Dario, many people believe Erec to have a stronger attack than most other units. The game also shows Erec to have a higher defence than other units, however Erec is often the first hero to fall in battle, although this could be a case of the enemies ganging up on him to eliminate his threat.Erec has probably the most useful combat abilities, his first being Aura of Strength, which doubles the attack power of all the units in his vicinity. His second ability is Maelstrom, which violently slashes all enemy units around him.  Maelstrom, coupled with Aura of Strength is capable of defeating an entire squad of troops in one hit.HeliasA wise old priest, brother to King Keron and uncle to Dario, Helias relinquished the throne to Keron, choosing instead the path of God. Since the demise of the Old Empire, Helias has served mainly as a negotiator, attempting to keep peace between the remaining nations. His latest task is acting as a negotiator for the town of Crawford. When Dario and Erec arrive at Crawford, the town is already under siege by Mordreds forces, Helias and the town elders entrust the safety of Crawford to the two friends. They manage to once again thwart Mordreds forces and send their General Kerberos fleeing. After the incident in Crawford, Helias joined Dario and Erec as they continued their journey.Helias also served as a negotiator with the ruler of Kaloix, the Countess Mary De Mortfichet, and hence, was not available during that level. Helias could be regained in the following level The Great Plague, where he explained to the party of the Countesss evil schemes. Helias holds a dark secret, he is actually the father of Mordreds evil General Kerberos.Helias is most likely (and most obviously) the weakest hero in combat, however his abilities make up for it. He can turn any enemy unit to fight alongside the heroes and he can also allow all units in his vicinity to receive more hits before they are defeated.AriAri is a Robber Knight, leading her band of Rogues in the Cleycourt area. In order to gain the trust of the people of Barmecia, Dario and friends must capture Ari and her gang, and present them to the mayor of Barmecia. Upon doing so, the heroes also finish the Weather Machine that was being constructed nearby, which make the skies burst open with rain, as was requested by the mayor of Cleycourt. However, trouble struck when the Weather Machine broke down, causing the rains to become endless, and flooding much of the land around Cleycourt. With the country in turmoil, Cleycourt declared war on Barmecia, it was then that the heroes sought the help of Ari, returning to Barmecia and relieving her of her prison cell. In return, Ari helped the heroes to halt the rain and make peace between the two nations. Dario requested that Ari join them on their journey and she humbly accepted. When the party arrive in Kaloix, Ari is sent away to the neighbouring villages along with Pilgrim to check reported disturbances, the party later find Ari in the clutches of De Mortfichet, but after De Mortfichets defeat, Ari is returned to the group. At this point, it becomes apparent that Dario is smitten with Ari.While Ari has the same defensive attributes as Helias, she is an invaluable member of the team, as she can attack from afar using her bow. Her abilities are also incredibly useful, Aris first ability is that she can Camouflage herself to avoid enemies, this skill comes in handy on many occasions. Her other ability is useful when low on soldiers, as she can summon members of her gang to lend a helping hand in the fray, however these reinforcements only stay around for a short time.PilgrimPilgrim is a miner, who comes from a Sulphur Mining family. The family specialized in explosives of all kinds, keeping the secret arts within the family, as a result, he has a slight distrust in other people and doesnt feel that anyone other than himself is competent with explosives. When the party first meet Pilgrim, he is in charge of the Stone Mining operation in Barmecia, Pilgrim joins the party when the mayor of Barmecia requests stones so he can construct a cathedral. Pilgrim proves to be invaluable to the party as he guides them through the hills of Folklung and Norfolk, he also assists in the recruiting of the final hero, Salim. When the party arrives in Folklung, they find the city under siege by barbarians, led by the vicious Varg. Pilgrim goes on ahead of the others to meet engineering genius, Salim, with the two of them joining back with the party later in this level. Pilgrim is also sent away with Ari to the villages east of Kaloix by the countess Mary De Mortfichet. The party later encounter Pilgrim in a village far to the east, where he tells of the ambush that he and Ari got caught up in, and that Ari was taken away.Pilgrim is by far the strongest hero in battle, with high attack and defense caps. Pilgrims speed is what lets him down, being slower than the other heroes. Pilgrims abilities are also very useful. He can erect a Spring Cannon to act as a temporary defence mechanism. He can also plant bombs, either to expose mine shafts or to obliterate enemies in combat.SalimThe final hero gained in the main game and appears to be of Oriental origin. Not much is known about Salim, other than he is a mechanical genius, working in the city of Folklung. Rumours say that Salim is the advisor to a king who looks after all situations, no matter how hopeless. He is recruited to the party by Pilgrim, as he arrives in Folklung ahead of the other heroes. Salim acts as a sort of advisor and keeps very cool in all situations. He is the only hero, aside from Erec, to remain with Dario for the entirety of the story since he joined.Salim acts as another well-rounded character and is helpful in defense, utilizing his traps in well-placed locations. Salim can also heal allies in his vicinity. Salims Saracen origins enable him to execute attacks in lightning fast speed, coming only second to Ari in terms of agility.Other Major CharactersKerberosSon of Helias and General of Mordreds army, Kerberos became twisted when his father turned down the throne of the Old Empire. Kerberos usually commands his minions from afar, however he does make a rare appearance now and again, the first of which being in Crawford, where Dario and Erec defeated his troops and made Kerberos retreat. Kerberos also makes an appearance at the Old Kings Castle, where the heroes put a stop to his madness.Kerberos is a playable character in The Cloudy Mountains mission in campaign mode. He is also a playable character in the online multiplayer mode, as with the heroes, Kerberos features abilities which can be used to the players advantage, among which, Kerberos can lower enemy troops attack power. Kerberos basic stats are the same as Pilgrims.Mary De MortfichetThe countess Mary De Mortfichet, ruthless ruler of the region of Kaloix, very little is known about her past, the local people of Kaloix claim that she just turned up and took over the lordship of Kaloix one day. The heroes later find out that De Mortfichet was allied with Mordred and was poisoning the people of her estates to make them easy targets for Mordred. Though she has allied with Mordred, she bears no loyalty to him and merely hopes to increase her personal gain. She despises Mordreds General Kerberos.Mary De Mortfichet is  only a playable character in the Online Multiplayer mode, bearing slight resemblance to Salim, in that she is very swift in her movement. De Mortfichet has a technique that poisons the opposing troops.ExpansionThere are a couple of expansion packs that can be installed:* The Settlers: Heritage of Kings - Expansion Disc* The Settlers: Heritage of Kings - Legends Expansion DiscThe first expansion disc adds bridge building and the following characters:* Drake - The Bounty Hunter* Yuki - The Mercenary* Kala - The Witch of the Shrouded PeopleThe second expansion makes it possible to play as:* Kerberos - the dark knight* Mary De Mortfichet - former ruler of Kaliox* Varg - leader of the Wolf Bandits External links * Official web pages at Ubi.comSettlers: Heritage of KingsSettlers: Ddictv krlSettlers V : LHritage des RoisSettlers: LEredit dei ReSettlers: Heritage of KingsSettlers: Dziedzictwo KrlwSettlers: Heritage of KingsSettlers: Heritage of KingsSettlers: Heritage of Kings
5032177
Hutchinson,_Pennsylvania
thumb|right|255px|USGS Map of HutchinsonHutchinson is a village located in County, Pennsylvania, and is part of Township, Pennsylvania.  As of the 2000 census, Hutchinson had 99 single family homes, and a total population of 322.  Although only about the size of a small subdivision, Hutchinson has its own post office and zip code: 15640.  Hutchinson was built as a mining town in 1924, and is geographically located above the Hutchinson Mine.The community was named for S. P. Hutchinson, president of Westmoreland Coal Company at the time the town was built. Because it was built much later than nearby coal patch towns, Hutchinson was distinguished by an unusually spacious layout, in which houses had larger yards than one would find in older coal mining communities.External references* Hutchinson Mine
5041418
Unionville,_Nevada
Unionville is a small hamlet in Pershing County, Nevada, with the most recent population estimate being approximately 20 people. The towns best years were during the 1870s, when it was an active mining and prospecting town serving the surrounding hilly region.  For a brief time, Langhorne Clemens lived there and prospected, but left without having had much success. Currently, the hamlet consists of a single business - a tourist inn - and a few small houses clustered along or near the gravel roadway which permits vehicular ingress and egress.  The nearest paved road, an extension of this gravel road, is about 7 miles to the east. The nearest services of any sort, other than those available at the inn, are approximately one hours drive away.Now in Pershing County, Unionville was the original county seat for Humboldt County, serving in that capacity from its founding in July 1861 until the seat was relocated to Winnemucca in 1873.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Humboldt_County,_Nevada)  The big mining boom at Unionville occurred between 1863 and 1870.  During that time, the population was reported to be as high as 1,500 persons.  As is common in most mining communities, after the boom, the town experienced a decline soon afterwards.  By 1870, it was discovered that there was little rich ore in the district.  The decline was speeded by the completion of the Central Pacific Railroad through the Humbolt valley, and the establishment of Winnemucca as a major trading and shipping center.(Russell R. Elliot and William D. Rowley, History of Nevada (Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1987), 101.) There is now no formal government as such in the hamlet of Unionville, which is unincorporated.  Some abandoned buildings such as Twains cabin and a schoolhouse remain standing in various stages of disrepair, but there is no ongoing, active effort to preserve any of these.  Unionville is frequently referred to as a town.  Just north of the towns limits is a cemetery, which may still be used for occasional burials.  A few hundred yards farther into the county, there is a fork in the main road.  Aerial photographs reveal a large cemented foundation upon which stand two large buildings, along with two or three smaller buildings of relatively recent vintage.  Whether any of these structures are in use and what they are, or were, is not identified in any reference source.   Ethnic Diversity in Unionville Paul Laveaga, one of Unionvilles more prominent citizens, was born in Mexico in 1841.  He was the only member of his family to leave Mexico for Nevada.  When he came to state in 1866, he worked for wages and mined in Unionville.  In 1868, Laveaga opened up a lodging house and restaurant which he ran until 1884 when he left for Winnemucca.  In addition, he served as post master in Unionville for many years. Laveaga was a successful businessman and well-respected by his fellow citizens.  In 1874, he was elected to the state assembly where he served four terms.  Laveaga also served as the Humbolt county treasurer for eight years.  Although he would eventually leave Unionville for the more prominent town of Winnemucca, Laveagas success in the state of Nevada stemmed from his intial settlement in Unionville.(Thomas Wren, A History of the State of Nevada: Its Resources and People (New York: The Lewis Publishing Company, 1904), 683-684.)Like other mining towns in the American West, Chinese laborers resided in Unionville and mined in the American Canyon.  The towns white inhabitants were quick to exhibit virulent anti-Chinese racism.  The Democratic party newspaper in town, the Humboldt Register, equated the Chinese to baboons or trained monkeys.  In addition to anti-Chinese racism, a segment of Unionvilles population, organized as the Anti-Chinese League, was responsible for forcibly expelling the Chinese population in the middle of January 1869.  The Chinese, outnumbered and outgunned, did nothing to resist expulsion, nor did any of the towns religious or fraternal organizations attempt to stop it.  The 35 Chinese males that resided in town were put on a wagon and taken twenty-five miles to Mill City, the nearest station on the Central Pacific Railway.  No charges were ever filed against the perpetrators that instigated the aggression toward the Chinese residents.  This was a significant event which provides an early example of the attitudes of white Nevadans toward the Chinese.  Anti-Chinese agitation and forced expulsion emerged in other communities throughout Nevada and the Far West.The events of 1869 did not permanently dissuade some Chinese from remaining in the county.  After Unionville declined as a white mining center, scattered Chinese returned to mine the surrounding environs.  Because water was at premium in the area, Chinese miners used rockers rather than sluices at their sites.  As late as 1905 there were still Chinese miners that continued to work in the American Canyon, but by that time they were quite elderly and numbered fewer than ten.(Arif Dirlik and Malcolm Yeung, eds., Chinese on the American Frontier (Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield, 2001), 98-99, 106.) References External links*GhostTowns.com Unionville page*Signatures of Samuel Clemens - Mark Twain & Unionville gold discoverer on 1863 territorial stock(Nevada)
5046618
List_of_Statutes_of_New_Zealand_(18401890)
The first Enactment of the New Zealand parliament (General Assembly), created by the 1852 Constitution Act, was the English Laws Act 1854 which established the applicability of all English laws in effect January 14 1840, to New Zealand. The 1846 Constitution Act was never implemented and was suspended.This is part of a of Statutes of New Zealand for the period up to and including part of the first year of the Liberal Government of New Zealand. 1840s  1841 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1841.html * Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cca18415v1841n2323* Courts of Requests Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cora18414v1841n6366* Customs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca18414v1841n3244 Amended: 1844/46/1914/20/21/22/23/24/26/27/29/59/65/67/68/70/71/72/73/76/81/82/85/86/87/88/89/90/91/92/94/95/96* Distillation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da18414v1841n5273 Amended: 1918/58/59/61/86 Repealed: 1844* Juries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ja18415v1841n3217 Amended: 1844/1951/57/59/60/61/62/63/66/67/68/74/75/76/79/82/85/94/2000/01* Land Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lra18415v1841n9311 Amended: 1852* Local and Personal Ordinances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lapoa18415v1841352* New South Wales Act 4 Vict No 7 Repealed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nswa4vn7ra18414v1841n2469* New South Wales Laws Adopted Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nswlaa18414v1841n1422* New Zealand Banking Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzbca18415v1841n1367* Police Magistrates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pma18415v1841n4316* Sessions Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sca18414v1841n4342* Court Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sca18415v1841n1303 Amended: 1846/48/66 1842 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1842.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa18425v1842n13260 Amended: 1844/1910/15/57/64/77* Trespass Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cta18425v1842n16305 Amended: 1844 Repealed: 1846* and Chapels Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caca18425v1842n7291* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca18425v1842n10261 Amended: 1844* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca18425v1842n18253 Amended: 1924/67/71/85/86/89/90/96/97/99/2005* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ha18425v1842n15235 Amended: 1844/1908/10/12/13/14/21/22/25/33/48/52/56/57/59/61/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/74/75/77/80/81/83/88/89/90/93/94* Claims Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lca18425v1842n14219 Amended: 1844* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/la18425v1842n12224 Amended: 1844/51/54/1910/14/18/20/33/48/49/52/53/55/56/57/58/59/60/61/63/74/80/81* Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mva18425v1842n11302* Corporations Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mca18425v1842n6381 Amended: 1902/03/06/10/13/14/15/21/23/28/38/48/50/51/53/56/57/58/59/60/61/62/63/64/66/68/69/70/71/72/74/75/76/77* South Wales Laws Repealed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nswlra18425v1842n19422* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa18425v1842n8217* Houses Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rha18425v1842n17288* Proceedings Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spa18425v1842n5348 Amended: 1844/1961/63/64/67/68/69/70/73/74/75/76/78/79/80/81/82/85/86/87/89/91/92/93/94/95/96/98/99/2000/03/04/06 1844 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1844.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa18447v1844n5296* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da18447v1844n4244* Nuisance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dna18447v1844n19242* Settlers Naturalization Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gsna18448v1844n2470* for Debt Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ifda18447v1844n7357* Claimants Estates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcea18447v1844n20333* Exemption Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nea18447v1844n18318* Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nta18447v1844n9299* Rate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra18448v1844n2306 Repealed: 1845* Court Rules Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/scra18448v1844n1373* Bank of Australia Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/uboaa18448v1844n1345* Testimony Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/uta18447v1844n16389Plus 9 Acts amended and 1 Act repealed. 1845 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1845.html * Importation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aia18459v1845n1327* Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cga18458v1845n3282 Amended: 1867/70/1955/65/72/79* Acts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eaa18458v1845n8247* for Assaults Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ffaa18458v1845n7329* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma18458v1845n1207* Naturalization Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/na18458v1845n1308* Munster Ordinances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nmoa18458v1845348* Roads and Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/prawa18458v1845n6347* Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/saa18458v1845n5468Plus 1 Act repealed. 1846 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1846.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa184610v1846n18188 Amended: 1921/30/34/62/64/66/68/71/74/76/85/87/89/92/99/2000* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca184610v1846n2280* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca184610v1846n5240 Amended: 1908/20/30/45/54/56/59/70/76/96/2003/04* Persons Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dpa184610v1846n9354 Amended: 1915/26/30/51/53/55/63* on Crown Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/focga184610v1846n11340* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/la184610v1846n21232* Land Purchase Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlpa184610v1846n19316* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa184610v1846n7244 Amended: 1912/19* Magistrates Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmca184610v1846n16438* of the Peace Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sotpa184610v1846n20326* Office Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/soa184610v1846n4261* and Measures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wama184610v1846n10334 Amended: 1904/22/33/68/69/71/72/76/77/80/91/99/2000/01/05Plus 3 Acts amended and 2 Acts repealed. 1847 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1847.html * Security Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsa184711v1847n11356* Education Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/%(pdf)s Amended: 1908/10/12/13/15/19/20/21/24/26/32/36/38/47/48/49/50/52/53/54/55/57/58/59/60/61/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/72/74/75/76/77/78/79/81/82/83/85/86/87/89/90/91/92/93/94/96/98/99/2000/06/07* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fa184711v1847n8192 Amended: 1922/53/55/79* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fa184711v1847n12252* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ga184711v1847n2255* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ia184711v1847n6253 Amended: 1908/63/68/80* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ia184711v1847n13245* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma184711v1847n7205 Amended: 1851/1912/15/19/20/26/27/29/33/46/51/59/66/70/76/78/82/85/86/91/93/94/99/2005* Force Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nfa184711v1847n1248* Currency Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pca184711v1847n16291 Amended: 1851* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ra184711v1847n9284* of Spirits to Natives Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sostna184711v1847n3430* Banks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sba184711v1847n4267* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa184711v1847n5324* Walker Nenes Annuity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twnaa184711v1847n15424 1848 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1848.html * Councils Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pca184812v1848n1338Plus 1 Act amended 1849 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1849.html * Force Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cfa184913v1849n9322* Roads Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cra184913v1849n10302* Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cla184913v1849n1254 Amended: 1851* Titles Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cta184913v1849n4288* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ea184913v1849n5256* Animal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eaa184913v1849n3250* Practitioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpa184913v1849n2335 Amended: 1924/49/51/54/57/62/64/67/70/72/73/77/78/79/80/82/83/86/87/94/99* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa184913v1849n3244 Amended: 1914/24/25/32/36/37* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa184913v1849n4162* Ejectment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sea184913v1849n6330* Roads and Streets Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/trasa184913v1849n7376 1850s  1851 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1851.html * Charters Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bca185115v1851n13249 Amended: 1853* and Land Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/balsa185115v1851n11349 Amended: 1865/69* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca185115v1851n8216* Writ of Arrest Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwoaa185115v1851n1377* of Customs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/doca185115v1851n5335* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ia185115v1851n3311 Amended: 2005* Fund Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lfaa185115v1851n2364* Elective Franchise Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mefa185115v1851n4377* Zealand Companys Land Claimants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzclca185115v1851n15444Plus 6 Acts amended 1853 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1853.html * Court Practitioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/scpa185316v1853n5457 1854 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1854.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da185418v1854n3201* Practitioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lpa185418v1854n8328 Amended: 1913/15/20/21/29/30/35/52/53/57/61/62/63/64/65/67/68/69/70/74/75/76/81/85/87/88/91/93/94/95/99* Trust Funds Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ntfa185418v1854n4366 Amended: 1856/63* of Attorney Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poaa185418v1854n10360* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwla185418v1854n13358* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra185418v1854n7301 Amended: 1862* Punishment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spa185418v1854n9365* Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wla185418v1854n6249Plus 2 Acts amended 1856 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1856.html * Hospital and Grammar School Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahagsra185619a20v1856n27557* Paper Currency Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bpca185619a20v1856n4331* of Sale Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bosra185619a20v1856n8401 Amended: 1862* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca185619a20v1856n18255 Amended: 1908/10/13/15/19/21/25/27/29/31/34/49/52/54/55/56/57/58/59/60/61/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/72/74/75/76/77* Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda185619a20v1856n25332 Amended: 1900/09* Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fsa185619a20v1856n28337 Amended: 1911/14/15/22/48/49/53/54/57/59/61/62/63/64/68/70/72/73/75/77* Salary Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gsa185619a20v1856n26351* Claims Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcsa185619a20v1856n32358* Orders and Scrip Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/loasa185619a20v1856n31333* Posts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lpa185619a20v1856n30279* Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mia185619a20v1856n11382* Wesleyan Chapel Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nwcsa185619a20v1856n7398* Zealand Colonial Bank of Issue Winding-Up Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzcboiwa185619a20v1856n13544* Zealand Debenture Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzda185619a20v1856n14337* Zealand Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzla185619a20v1856n17290* Zealand Native Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nznra185619a20v1856n10420* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa185619a20v1856n24269* Laws Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pla185619a20v1856n35317* Offices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poa185619a20v1856n23270* Charitable and Educational Trusts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcaeta185619a20v1856n21553* Magistrates Courts Extension of Jurisdiction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmceoja185619a20v1856n29728* Law Practitioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/slpa185619a20v1856n33406* Deputy Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sda185619a20v1856n16430* Court Procedure Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/scpa185619a20v1856n15415* Provincial Councils Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpcpa185619a20v1856n34474Plus 6 Acts amended 1858 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1858.html * Debtors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ada185821a22v1858n5288* Defendants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ada185821a22v1858n4294* Act 1858 No 1 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa1858n1a185821a22v1858n63360* Act 1858 No 2 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa1858n2a185821a22v1858n64360* Improvement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aia185821a22v1858n69355 Amended: 1875* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ara185821a22v1858n49319* Roman Catholic Endowments Sales Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/arcesa185821a22v1858n18508* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa185821a22v1858n31207* Creditors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aca185821a22v1858n21383* Draft Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bda185821a22v1858n62264* Returns Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bra185821a22v1858n34328* of Islands Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boisa185821a22v1858n79395* of New Zealands Trusts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bonzta185821a22v1858n17463* of Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bopa185821a22v1858n19386* Association Land Orders Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caloa185821a22v1858n36488* List Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cla185821a22v1858n71263 Amended: 1915/36/54/55/57/61/64/65/70/71/72/73/75/77/83/85/87* Service Superannuation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cssa185821a22v1858n43455* Practices Prevention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cppa185821a22v1858n57474 Amended: 1895* Costs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cca185821a22v1858n3296* Grants Correction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cgca185821a22v1858n46408* of Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/doda185821a22v1858n37383* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da185821a22v1858n32310* Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dca185821a22v1858n30341 Amended: 1979/80/81/82/83/85/86/87/88/89/91/92/94/95/96/98/99/2001/02/03/04/05/06/07* Petitions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/epa185821a22v1858n58350* Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eda185821a22v1858n55351* Laws Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ela185821a22v1858n2275* of Criminals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eoca185821a22v1858n10372* Seamens Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fsa185821a22v1858n14293* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ga185821a22v1858n25227* Duty Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gda185821a22v1858n73257 Amended: 1909/12* Fields Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gfa185821a22v1858n74240* and Watercourses Diversion Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hawda185821a22v1858n78526* 001 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/i001a185821a22v1858n1327* 002 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/i002a185821a22v1858n1327* of the Peace Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jotpa185821a22v1858n27329 Amended: 1908/10/12/23/26/46/48/52/55/2007* Claims Settlement Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcsea185821a22v1858n76474* Revenue Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lraa185821a22v1858n67422* Annuity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/maa185821a22v1858n44341* Shipping Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msa185821a22v1858n39321* Circuit Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncca185821a22v1858n42388 Amended: 1862* Districts Regulation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ndra185821a22v1858n41446 Amended: 1862* Schools Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nsa185821a22v1858n65306* Territorial Rights Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ntra185821a22v1858n80431* College Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nca185821a22v1858n38282 Amended: 1954* College Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncta185821a22v1858n51375* Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/npa185821a22v1858n70308* Revenue Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ora185821a22v1858n33336* Villages Sale of Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pvsora185821a22v1858n9497* Sessions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/psa185821a22v1858n26349* Office Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poa185821a22v1858n15261 Amended: 1960/61/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/72/73/74/75/77/78/80/81/82/83/85* Elections Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pea185821a22v1858n59359* Lawsuits Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pla185821a22v1858n60382* Reserved Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/prba185821a22v1858n16403* Debt Apportionment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pdaa185821a22v1858n68404* of Electors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qoea185821a22v1858n53389* of Electors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/roea185821a22v1858n54408* of Elections Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/roea185821a22v1858n56381 Amended: 1863* Magistrates Courts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmca185821a22v1858n35454* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa185821a22v1858n24239* Partnerships Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spa185821a22v1858n13366* Court Judges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/scja185821a22v1858n22379* Revenues Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sra185821a22v1858n66377* Elections Writs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tewa185821a22v1858n11364* Law Practitioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlpa185821a22v1858n23374* Province of Taranaki Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpota185821a22v1858n45367* Instruments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/uia185821a22v1858n6422* and Oil Securities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/waosa185821a22v1858n12385Plus 5 Acts amended 1860s  1860 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1860.html * Pipe Patent Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/appa186024v1860n5335* Harbour Debenture Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahda186024v1860n7361* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/awa186024v1860n6343* and Solicitors Admission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/basaa186024v1860n18499* Seamen Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fsa186024v1860n4259* Trustees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fta186024v1860n5372* Disability Removal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hdra186024v1860n33386* Stock Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jsca186024v1860n13353 Amended: 1869* for compensation Nelson and Marlborough Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lfcnama186024v1860n26544* Registry Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lra186024v1860n27281 Amended: 1861* Expenditure Confirmation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/leca186024v1860n39434* and Christchurch Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lacra186024v1860n1499* Womens Property Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mwppa186024v1860n9535* Franchise Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mfa186024v1860n23287* Council Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nca186024v1860n43276* and Military Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/namsa186024v1860n35411* and Marlborough Public Debt Apportionment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nampdaa186024v1860n25596* Rowan Catholic Endowments Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrcesa186024v1860n3498* Wesleyan Schoolmasters Land Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nwslsa186024v1860n4524* Documents Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odea186024v1860n20358* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa186024v1860n14229 Amended: 1972/76/92/94/96/99/2002* Bills Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pbea186024v1860n1333* Domains Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pda186024v1860n32266* and Ninnis Flax Patent Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/panfpa186024v1860n2418* Estate Administration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/reaa186024v1860n15389* of Penalties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ropa186024v1860n6364* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ra186024v1860n12306* Proceedings Improvement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spia186024v1860n7487* Settlers Relief Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tsra186024v1860n36367* Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tia186024v1860n29275* and Commerce Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/taca186024v1860n8267* Hawkes Bay and Taranaki Land Regulations Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbatlra186024v1860n37588Plus 7 Acts amended 1861 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1861.html * to Agents Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ataa186124a25v1861n3311* Act Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aaca186124a25v1861n17333* Immigration Certificate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aica186124a25v1861n21421* Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ara186124a25v1861n29381* Remission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bra186124a25v1861n12345* of New South Wales Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bonswa186124a25v1861n2372 Amended: 1951* of New Zealand Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bonza186124a25v1861n1295 Amended: 1986/89* and Otago Boundary Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caoba186124a25v1861n2435* and Otago Boundary Act No 2 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caoban2a186124a25v1861n15483* Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cpa186124a25v1861n1405* Cattle Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dca186124a25v1861n23270* Mountain Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dmra186124a25v1861n3374* Bay Naval and Military Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbnamsa186124a25v1861n19513* Natives Succession Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/insa186124a25v1861n22461* Land Orders Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lloa186124a25v1861n13319* and Military Settlers Malborough Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/namsma186124a25v1861n6529* Administrators Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaa186124a25v1861n30376* and Southland Public Debt Apportionment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaspdaa186124a25v1861n18578* Costs Taxation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcta186124a25v1861n33464* Claims Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pca186124a25v1861n31332* Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra186124a25v1861n4310* of certain Animals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pocaa186124a25v1861n28426* Audit Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/paa186124a25v1861n24316* Orders for Private Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sofpba186124a25v1861n16479* Correction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sca186124a25v1861n35371Plus 16 Acts amended 1862 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1862.html * Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bpa186226v1862n9313* Defence Force Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdfa186226v1862n32291* of Acts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coaa186226v1862n41310* of Appeal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coaa186226v1862n24277* Grants No 1 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cgn1a186226v1862n17309* and Creditors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/daca186226v1862n37335* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mba186226v1862n20248* Supplies Customs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msca186226v1862n3452* Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mra186226v1862n10378* Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nla186226v1862n42251* Purposes Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/npaa186226v1862n27482* Route Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra186226v1862n16255* Magistrates Jurisdiction Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmjea186226v1862n36603* Navigation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sna186226v1862n22296* Procedure on Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spoba186226v1862n6416* Crown Grants Act No 2 1862 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcgan21862a186226v1862n18360* Delegations Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tdca186226v1862n19379* Sale for Non-payment for Rates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tsfnfra186226v1862n35461* Relief Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tra186226v1862n7309Plus 13 Acts amended 1863 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1863.html * And Drury Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aadra186327v1863n2379* of Otago Limited Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boola186327v1863n4302* Harbour and Invercargill Railway and Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bhairaea186327v1863n3607* into Wrecks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eiwa186327v1863n5370* Offenders Apprehension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/foaa186327v1863n22419* Clauses Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcca186327v1863n13396* Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/laa186327v1863n12334* College Trust Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nctla186327v1863n14404* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nwla186327v1863n39322* Zealand Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzsa186327v1863n8377 Amended: 1865* Waste Lands No 1 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owln1a186327v1863n31329* Waste Lands No 2 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owln2a186327v1863n32329* Compulsory Land Taking Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pclta186327v1863n10480* Councils Powers Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcpea186327v1863n9544* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/swla186327v1863n40354 Amended: 1867* Island Annexation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/siaa186327v1863n1418* Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sia186327v1863n6483* of Rebellion Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sora186327v1863n7403* Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tra186327v1863n27322* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/va186327v1863n33241* and Hawkes Bay Naval and Military Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wahbnamsa186327v1863n29634* Patent Slip Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpsa186327v1863n24384Plus 14 Acts amended and 1 Act repealed. 1864 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1864.html * Hall Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aha186428v1864n13222* of Auckland Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boaa186428v1864n3243* Great Northern Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cgnra186428v1864n1490* Great Sourthern Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cgsra186428v1864n2515* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cwla186428v1864n17366* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca186428v1864n15237* Water Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwwa186428v1864n6348* Customs Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncda186428v1864n1355* Mail Service Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pmsa186428v1864n10286* Works Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwla186428v1864n5324* Arms Act Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/taaca186428v1864n8347* Fourth Session of the Third Parliament of New Zealand Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tfsottponza186428v1864635* Rate of Interest Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/troia186428v1864n2332* Registration of Deeds Validation Act Otago 1864 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/trodvao1864a186428v1864n9536* Wild Birds Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twbpa186428v1864n11387Plus 6 Acts amended 1865 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1865.html * of Sheep and Cattle Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bosacpa186529v1865n50473* Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bca186529v1865n9305* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca186529v1865n74295* Lands Nelson Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clnla186529v1865n65387* Nest Dam Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dnda186529v1865n1263* Telegraph Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eta186529v1865n37291* Bay Military and Colonial Defence Corps Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbmacdcsa186529v1865n33639* by Dogs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ibda186529v1865n21304* Estates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iea186529v1865n56327 Amended: 1870* and Sales of Settled Estates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lasosea186529v1865n3442* Road Mill Dam Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lrmda186529v1865n2304* Allocation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/laa186529v1865n69271* Licenses and Leases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/llala186529v1865n42352* Funds Investment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mfia186529v1865n25382* and Apprentice Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/maaa186529v1865n45324 Amended: 1920/24* Companies Limited Liability Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mclla186529v1865n26442* Commission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nca186529v1865n12325* Rights Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nra186529v1865n11281* Plymouth Exchanges Commission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/npeca186529v1865n32498 Amended: 1866* Municipal Corporations Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/omcea186529v1865n55549* Public Offices Site Trusts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oposta186529v1865n5467* Districts Police Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odpa186529v1865n23422* and Blenheim Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pabra186529v1865n3370* Office Savings Banks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/posba186529v1865n40371 Amended: 1869* of Certain Animals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pocaa186529v1865n57410* Offences Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/roa186529v1865n22288* Provincial Debt Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spda186529v1865n68382* Armitage Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tapa186529v1865n7322* Commencement of Acts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcoaa186529v1865n10340* Howards Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thpa186529v1865n19337* Legislative Council Quorum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlcqa186529v1865n20450* Mayne Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmpa186529v1865n29309* New Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnpa186529v1865n34322* Nixon Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnpa186529v1865n47327* Prisoners Removal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpra186529v1865n30374* Private Estates Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpeba186529v1865n27386* Provincial Constabulary Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpca186529v1865n36419* Provincial Corporations Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpca186529v1865n44431* Provincial Lawsuits Act Declaratory Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tplada186529v1865n63528* Provisional Jury List Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpjla186529v1865n39436* Taranaki Naval and Military Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ttnamsa186529v1865n60508* Volunteers Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tvla186529v1865n62339* West Coast Gold Field Provincial Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twcgfpra186529v1865n14626* Force Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/vfa186529v1865n53306* Hospital Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whra186529v1865n15457* Supreme Court House Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wschsa186529v1865n64536Plus 17 Acts amended 1866 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1866.html * of Food Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aofa186630v1866n55324* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa186630v1866n17195 Amended: 1957/65/67* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa186630v1866n63324* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/awla186630v1866n23308 Amended: 1862/63* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca186630v1866n49224 Amended: 1962* Service Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csa186630v1866n59265 Amended: 1861/1908* Law Procedure Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clpa186630v1866n1341* Debts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda186630v1866n7254* Lands Sales Extortion Prevention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clsepa186630v1866n21564* Tariff Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cta186630v1866n43298* Courts Jurisdiction Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dcjea186630v1866n5580* on Bonded Warehouses Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dobwa186630v1866n41396* Coast Land Titles Investigation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ecltia186630v1866n27492* Natives Contracts Confirmation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fncca186630v1866n16538* Offences Trials Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iota186630v1866n8348* Liability Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ila186630v1866n50337* Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jpa186630v1866n48364* Expenditure Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/leia186630v1866n34413* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma186630v1866n52195* Pensions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpa186630v1866n6343 Amended: 1903* Cobden and Westport Railway Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncawrla186630v1866n33504* Against the Person Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oatpa186630v1866n19381* Southern Trunk Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ostra186630v1866n3467 Amended: 1867* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owla186630v1866n22302* Fisheries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ofa186630v1866n57326* Church of Otago Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcoola186630v1866n2453* of Poisons Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sopa186630v1866n13293 Amended: 1900* Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sda186630v1866n42277 Amended: 1908/09/10/13/24/25/26/27/31/52/53/55/56/57/58/60/61/63/64/65/66/67/68* Affirmations in lieu of Oaths in Criminal Proceedings Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tailooicpa186630v1866n65627* Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/taa186630v1866n82326* Gold Fields Members Qualification Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tgfmqa186630v1866n81446* Loan Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlaa186630v1866n35364* Newcastle Crown Grants Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tncgva186630v1866n15502* Privileges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpa186630v1866n73283* Superintendents Election Disallowance Signification Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tsedsa186630v1866n58662* Supreme Court Judges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tscja186630v1866n4393* Treasury Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ttba186630v1866n37339* Williams Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twca186630v1866n69393* Marks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tma186630v1866n9241 Amended: 1972/76/85/87/90/94/96/99/2003/05* Bills Regulation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbra186630v1866n36421* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/va186630v1866n10217* Land Purchase Loan Sanction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlplsa186630v1866n40497* Loan Sanction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlsa186630v1866n39387Plus 22 Acts amended and 2 Acts repealed. 1867 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1867.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa186731v1867n7246* from Justices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/afja186731v1867n12350* Constabulary Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aca186731v1867n37316* and Drury Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aadra186731v1867n72379* and Onehunga Native Hostelries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aaonha186731v1867n42478* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ba186731v1867n18262 Amended: 1927/55/56/60* of Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bosa186731v1867n23242* Mail Services Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bmsa186731v1867n75466* Offences Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coa186731v1867n2253* Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cla186731v1867n44274* of Westland Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cowa186731v1867n25342 Amended: 1869* and Matrimonial Causes Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/damca186731v1867n94402 Amended: 1912/13/19/20/21/30/53/58* of Judgments against Real Estate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eojarea186731v1867n20531* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fa186731v1867n4228* Delegations Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gda186731v1867n74365* of Convicts Prevention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iocpa186731v1867n15535* Jones Land Claims Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jjlcsa186731v1867n60443* Claims Arbitration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcaa186731v1867n53335* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/la186731v1867n3212* Injuries to Property Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mitpa186731v1867n6489* Real Estate Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mrema186731v1867n40371* Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mra186731v1867n47357* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mwla186731v1867n63368* and Victualling Stores Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/navsa186731v1867n9411* and Criminal Children Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nacca186731v1867n14359* Zealand Institute Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzia186731v1867n36364 Amended: 1920/30* against the Person Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oatpa186731v1867n5381* Metal and Marine Store Dealers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/omamsda186731v1867n10414* Church Land Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pclsa186731v1867n62396* Estates Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/peba186731v1867n17356* of Animals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poaa186731v1867n35347* and Industrial Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/paisa186731v1867n28483* Buildings Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pbra186731v1867n56389* Debts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pda186731v1867n89243* Offenders Disqualification Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poda186731v1867n49434* Revenues Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra186731v1867n84299 Amended: 1912/13/14/15/52/56/57/58/60/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/72/73/74/75/76* Stores Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/psa186731v1867n83288* and Trout Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sata186731v1867n34314* Electoral Rolls Revision Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/serra186731v1867n50569* Revenue Adjustment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sraa186731v1867n87460* Naval and Military Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnamsa186731v1867n55478* District Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tdla186731v1867n46355* Auckland Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tawla186731v1867n59338* Bartley Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbpa186731v1867n86332* Canterbury Public Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcpra186731v1867n57448* Commissioners Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcpa186731v1867n73419* Consolidated Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcla186731v1867n90318* Diseased Sheep Fines Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tdsfaa186731v1867n91480* Governors Salary Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tgsa186731v1867n93365* Hokitika Greymouth and Okarita Town Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thgaotla186731v1867n58567* Imprest Supply Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tisa186731v1867n1367* Legislative Officers Salaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlosa186731v1867n85430* Otago Gold Fields Judicial Officers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/togfjoa186731v1867n70441* Provincial Acts Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpava186731v1867n79416* Resident Magistrates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/trma186731v1867n13378* and Gladstone Board of Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tagbowa186731v1867n26456 Amended: 1870* Racecourse Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrea186731v1867n61377* Lands Boards Appeal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlbaa186731v1867n67347* Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wra186731v1867n48396 Amended: 1868Plus 23 Acts amended and 2 Acts repealed. 1868 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1868.html * of New Zealand Trusts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bonzta186832v1868n7429* and Westland Public Debt Apportionment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cawpdaa186832v1868n59611* Rivers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cra186832v1868n21343* Forces Courts-Martial Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cfca186832v1868n36431* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/%(pdf)s Amended: 1902/10/19/20/21/22/23/28/52/59/60/63/64/65/66/67/69/70/71/73/75/76/77/78/80/81/82/83/85/86/87/88/89/90/93/98/99/2004/06/07* Land Revenue Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clraa186832v1868n79494* Loan Provincial Charges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clpca186832v1868n78451* of Law Trust Moneys Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coltma186832v1868n77461* Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dra186832v1868n51316 Amended: 1863* and Replevin Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dara186832v1868n25355 Amended: 1913/36/50/67/2004* Coast Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eca186832v1868n56235* Telegraph Reserves Release Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/etrra186832v1868n64452* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ea186832v1868n24195* Mining Claims Drainage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gmcda186832v1868n37337* House Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghsa186832v1868n66376* and Spencer Land Claims Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gaslca186832v1868n62352* Bay and Marlborough Rivers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbamra186832v1868n40447* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ia186832v1868n42258 Amended: 1965/66/68/69/76/77/78/79/80/88/89/90/91/92/93/96/99/2002/03/04/06* of Stock Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mosra186832v1868n11462* and Cobden Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nacra186832v1868n14349* Reference Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrva186832v1868n32381* Education Reserves Abandonment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oeraa186832v1868n43472* Surveys Correction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/osca186832v1868n68426* and Newspapers Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/panra186832v1868n17537* Acts Validation Act Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pavaca186832v1868n57515* Appropriations Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pava186832v1868n29520* Debts Sinking Funds Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pdsfa186832v1868n74378* Domains Acts Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pdaea186832v1868n67421* Magistrates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rma186832v1868n46348* Military Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmga186832v1868n39394* Bridges and Ferries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbafa186832v1868n8317* Conveyancing Charges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcca186832v1868n28345* Interest on Money Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tioma186832v1868n3367* Marlborough Reserve Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmrla186832v1868n41435* Mete Kingi Paetahi Election Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmkpea186832v1868n1383* Otago Road Boards Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/torbea186832v1868n44415* Pawnbrokers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpa186832v1868n4302* Public Houses Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpha186832v1868n6309* Treason-Felony Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tta186832v1868n5327* Trigonometrical Stations and Survey Marks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ttsasma186832v1868n9621* Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tba186832v1868n76309* Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/uea186832v1868n65397* and Hawkes Bay Public Debt Apportionment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wahbpdaa186832v1868n58611* Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wca186832v1868n45390Plus 20 Acts amended 1869 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1869.html * Society of Southland Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/asosga186932a33v1869n65566* Gold Fields Proclamations Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/agfpva186932a33v1869n10539* of Stock and Chattels Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bosacra186932a33v1869n34564* Garden Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bga186932a33v1869n66257* Temporary Mining Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctmra186932a33v1869n27559* of Crown Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cocla186932a33v1869n33447* Loan Application Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/claa186932a33v1869n73409* Diseases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda186932a33v1869n52344* Bonds and Securities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cbasa186932a33v1869n62408* Goods Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dga186932a33v1869n36307 Amended: 1963/64/67/75/78/79/83/89* of Goods and Lien for Freight Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dogalffa186932a33v1869n35477* Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dda186932a33v1869n20362* and Prisoners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gapa186932a33v1869n54367* Fields Officers Salaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gfosa186932a33v1869n49389* Annuities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gaa186932a33v1869n60383* Quays Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gqa186932a33v1869n42358* Practitioners Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpra186932a33v1869n51494* Shipping Acts Adoption Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msaaa186932a33v1869n5446* Contribution Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mca186932a33v1869n17404* Zealand Commissioners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzca186932a33v1869n59410* Zealand Cross Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzcea186932a33v1869n32425* Zealand Law Societys Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzlsa186932a33v1869n63392* Town Reserves Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/otrma186932a33v1869n41474* Hundreds Regulation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohra186932a33v1869n22407* Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/osa186932a33v1869n11351* Acts Validation Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pavca186932a33v1869n47510* Libraries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pla186932a33v1869n67298* Payments without Probate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ppwpa186932a33v1869n7498* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ra186932a33v1869n19257* on Marine Re-assurance Removal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/romrra186932a33v1869n4569* Beach Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sba186932a33v1869n24273* Hugo Max Bucholz Naturalization Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thmbna186932a33v1869n64516* Nelson Marriages Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnma186932a33v1869n8342* Poverty Bay Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpbga186932a33v1869n31399* Provincial Councils Legislation Appeal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpclaa186932a33v1869n46541* Wellington and Hawkes Bay Public Debt Apportionment Acts Exte Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twahbpdaaea186932a33v1869n15746* Powers Delegation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpda186932a33v1869n56448* and Others Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/waopa186932a33v1869n69395* Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpa186932a33v1869n68341Plus 26 Acts amended 1870s  1870 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1870.html * Produce Lien Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/apla187033a34v1870n46399* Gas Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cga187033a34v1870n2307 Amended: 1971* Reciprocity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cra187033a34v1870n99360* Persons Estates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dpea187033a34v1870n5376* and other Purposes Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/daopla187033a34v1870n81428* Superintendent of Wellington Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsowa187033a34v1870n28552* Courts Criminal Jurisdiction Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dccjea187033a34v1870n12667* Inspectors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fia187033a34v1870n33319* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gla187033a34v1870n61265* Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gda187033a34v1870n20263* Officers Guarantee Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/goga187033a34v1870n85436* Summary Prosecutions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gspa187033a34v1870n38545* Land Claims Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/glcsa187033a34v1870n72402* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hba187033a34v1870n41286* Bay Crown Lands Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbclsa187033a34v1870n58389* Bay Renewal of Licenses Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbrola187033a34v1870n59411* and Public Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iapwa187033a34v1870n77428* and Public Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iapwla187033a34v1870n80466* Native Industrial School Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/knisga187033a34v1870n69515* Transfer Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lta187033a34v1870n51277 Amended: 1902/13/25/39/50/58/59/60/61/63/66/72/82/85/86/91/93/94/95/97/2005* Liability Companies Winding-up Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/llcwa187033a34v1870n26506* Sale of Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msora187033a34v1870n65431* Ships Officers Examination Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msoea187033a34v1870n43484* and Others Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/maopa187033a34v1870n49411* and Waikare District Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mawda187033a34v1870n60371* Lands Frauds Prevention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlfpa187033a34v1870n75458* Zealand and Australian Submarine Telegraph Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzaasta187033a34v1870n84550* Zealand Government Insurance and Annuities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzgiaaa187033a34v1870n86589* Zealand University Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzua187033a34v1870n90404 Amended: 1912/14/15/19/23/26/28/29/30/50/53/54/56/57/58/59/60* and Southland Union Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oasua187033a34v1870n93399* Districts Sale of Spirits Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odsosa187033a34v1870n39539* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa187033a34v1870n6270* to Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ptpa187033a34v1870n82407* of High Treason Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pohta187033a34v1870n1418* of Electors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qoea187033a34v1870n16407* Magistrates Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmea187033a34v1870n24423* Land Sales Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rlsa187033a34v1870n62311* for Non-Payment of Rates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sfnora187033a34v1870n19430* by Mortgagees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sbma187033a34v1870n30333* Sea Islands Drawbacks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ssida187033a34v1870n83401* Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tla187033a34v1870n95317* Aliens Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/taa187033a34v1870n40241* Canterbury Gauge Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcga187033a34v1870n79340* Johnston Land Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tjlga187033a34v1870n71376* Provincial Reserved Bills Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tprba187033a34v1870n11433* Treasury Bills Extended Currency Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ttbeca187033a34v1870n96527* Wellington and Hawkes Bay Public Debt Apportionment Act Exten Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twahbpdaaea187033a34v1870n10741* Land Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlga187033a34v1870n70347* Boards Suits Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ubsa187033a34v1870n35452* Indictments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/via187033a34v1870n7403* Town Lands Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wtlma187033a34v1870n64432* Valley Road Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wvra187033a34v1870n66329* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wgca187033a34v1870n3382* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wwla187033a34v1870n53386 Amended: 1865* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wwla187033a34v1870n56355Plus 27 Acts amended 1871 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1871.html * from Provincial Rating Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/afpra187135v1871n11424* Burial-Ground Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aba187135v1871n27330* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/agca187135v1871n1304 Amended: 1963/68/69* Harbour Docks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahda187135v1871n29323* Military Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/amra187135v1871n28402* Mineral Leases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/amla187135v1871n13320* and Millers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bama187135v1871n52288* in New Zealand Trusts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/binzta187135v1871n33449* Allowance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/baa187135v1871n67276* Land Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clga187135v1871n65332* Funds Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cfaa187135v1871n56424* Lands Building Leases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clbla187135v1871n34366* of Christchurch Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cocla187135v1871n71377* of Dunedin Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/codba187135v1871n73389* Trade Regulation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctra187135v1871n62376* Debts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda187135v1871n50321* Forfeitures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cfa187135v1871n48369* Redress Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cra187135v1871n49290* and Port Chalmers Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dapcra187135v1871n6439* Coast District Land Titles Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ecdltva187135v1871n70532* Trees Planting Encouragement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ftpea187135v1871n32493* Mines Drainage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gmda187135v1871n40281* Mining Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gmda187135v1871n39347* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hba187135v1871n8268* Public Gardens Reserves Alienation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ipgraa187135v1871n31570* Grant Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kgva187135v1871n66380* and Whitaker Claims Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lawca187135v1871n68369* and Greytown Lands Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/maglma187135v1871n25520* Districts Road Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ndrba187135v1871n9405* Act 1870 Fees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/na1870fa187135v1871n47360* City Gas Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncga187135v1871n2291* City Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncla187135v1871n72305* Supreme Court Offices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oscoa187135v1871n58412* Maintenance Expenses Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pmea187135v1871n46452* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa187135v1871n41268 Amended: 1952/57/67/81/88/94/96* Education Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tera187135v1871n21394* Juries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tja187135v1871n44247* Otago Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tosa187135v1871n15365* City Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcra187135v1871n23418* Debts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wda187135v1871n74307* Education Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wera187135v1871n22448* Reclaimed Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrla187135v1871n24350* Special Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wssa187135v1871n77461* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wwa187135v1871n3405Plus 27 Acts amended 1872 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1872.html * Mechanics Institute Site Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/amissa187236v1872n60476* Temperance Hall Site Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/athssa187236v1872n61401* of Wanganui Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bowba187236v1872n64433* Public Domains Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cpda187236v1872n19383* Ratepayers Rolls Revision Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/crrra187236v1872n20550* of England Lands Buildings Lease Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coelbla187236v1872n50435* Tunnel Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctca187236v1872n1387* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da187236v1872n10214* Gas and Water Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dgawwla187236v1872n55426* Contractors Arbitration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gcaa187236v1872n17515* Harbour Works Advance Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghwava187236v1872n7561* Bay Native Lands Alienation Commission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbnlaca187236v1872n44546* Bay Special Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbssa187236v1872n43426* Supply Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/isa187236v1872n6337* Liability Joint Stock Companies Dissolution Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lljscda187236v1872n34654* Harbour Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lhwla187236v1872n63470* Rights Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mrea187236v1872n36404* Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mca187236v1872n33287* Corporations Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mcwa187236v1872n54524* Reserve Disposal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrda187236v1872n51414* Dunedin Cemetery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ndca187236v1872n3361* Otago District Public Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nodpwla187236v1872n56534* Dock Trust Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odtla187236v1872n11353* Dock Trust Debt Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odtda187236v1872n57343* Health Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pha187236v1872n68246 Amended: 1901/02/03/04/10/15/18/19* Trust Office Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ptoa187236v1872n26329 Amended: 1905/07/12/13/17/19/21/48/51/56/67/68/71/72/75/77/78/82/83/86/90/94* Machines Regulation and Inspection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qmraia187236v1872n35635* McGuire, and Others Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/smaopa187236v1872n70443* of Marlborough Election Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/somea187236v1872n69542* New Zealand Companys Land Claims Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnzclca187236v1872n48479* Service of Notices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tsona187236v1872n12395* Auckland Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tawa187236v1872n58373* Clerk of Parliaments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcopa187236v1872n2351* Gold Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tgda187236v1872n15277* Highway Boards Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thbea187236v1872n38413* Nelson Special Settlements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnssa187236v1872n42443* Payments to Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tptpa187236v1872n24421* Public Revenues Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpra187236v1872n25329* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ta187236v1872n22253 Amended: 1910/11/13/15/20/30/59/69/73/76/78/79/88* Bridge and Wharf Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wbawa187236v1872n65329* Hospital Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wha187236v1872n66315* Courts Proceedings Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcpva187236v1872n31509* College Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wca187236v1872n67314Plus 25 Acts amended 1873 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1873.html * on Constables Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aoca187337v1873n12372* Supreme Court Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ascsa187337v1873n25411* Holidays Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bha187337v1873n6250* Land Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/blga187337v1873n22334* Public Library Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cpla187337v1873n24393* Cathedral Square Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ccsa187337v1873n10405* of Females Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eofa187337v1873n71342* Purposes Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gpla187337v1873n54355* Salary and Allowances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gsaaa187337v1873n80446* Island Branch Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gibra187337v1873n28360* Patene Claim Rehearing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hpcra187337v1873n59348* Tareha Matangi Grant Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/htmgva187337v1873n47430* Passengers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ipa187337v1873n70304* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ila187337v1873n53281* Assurance Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/laca187337v1873n18347* Residence Lease and Lowry Bay Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mrlalbsa187337v1873n78531* Grantees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nga187337v1873n58287* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nla187337v1873n56233 Amended: 1912/13/14/15/16/17/18/19/20/21/22/23/24/25/26/27/28/29/30/32/36* Land Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlda187337v1873n57305* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nra187337v1873n60309 Amended: 1858/62* Childrens Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nca187337v1873n68290* Zealand Extradition Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzea187337v1873n81364* Hundreds Proclamations Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohpva187337v1873n66519* Oaths Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poa187337v1873n17356* of Westland Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/powa187337v1873n35344* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qra187337v1873n61387* Regulation and Inspection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rraia187337v1873n52483* Crown Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcga187337v1873n26461* of Land for Mining Purposes Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rolfmpa187337v1873n40544* Island Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/siga187337v1873n43366 Amended: 1876* of Hawkes Bay Election Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sohbea187337v1873n14509* Cables Subsidy Agreement Ratification Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcsara187337v1873n36544* Gas Companys Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tgca187337v1873n3323* Port Chalmers Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpcwa187337v1873n9450* Superintendent of Taranaki Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tsotea187337v1873n13542* Floating Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tfa187337v1873n39278* of Geraldine Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toga187337v1873n32342* River Foreshore Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrfga187337v1873n30445* and Pleasant Point Railway Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wappra187337v1873n11476* College Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcla187337v1873n21352* College Vote in Aid Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcviaa187337v1873n20404* Drainage and Sewerage Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wdaswla187337v1873n63523* Harbour Reserves Mortgage Release Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whrmra187337v1873n62577* Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wla187337v1873n55269Plus 24 Acts amended 1874 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1874.html * Harbour Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aha187438v1874n34276* of Thames Tramways Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/botta187438v1874n41411* Closing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bca187438v1874n58343* Marriages Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cma187438v1874n70340* Water Supply Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cwsa187438v1874n31423* of Christchurch Drainage Debentures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cocdda187438v1874n43493* of Dunedin Gasworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/codga187438v1874n44382* River Trust Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/crtra187438v1874n40463* Bank of New Zealand Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cbonza187438v1874n1352* of the Westport Borough Proceedings Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cotwbpva187438v1874n52765* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cwa187438v1874n42377* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwa187438v1874n45348* Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eda187438v1874n8272* Insurance and Annuities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/giaaa187438v1874n62478* Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hwa187438v1874n32298* Mayors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hma187438v1874n49302* for Debt Abolition Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ifdaa187438v1874n14445* of Machinery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ioma187438v1874n61361 Amended: 1894/1908/10/14/27/31* Gas Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/igla187438v1874n46321* Gas Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lga187438v1874n2299* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mra187438v1874n39333* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhba187438v1874n36309 Amended: 1887/89/99/1912* Training Schools Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ntsa187438v1874n56354* Plymouth Exchanges Completion Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/npeca187438v1874n67491* Zealand Forests Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzfa187438v1874n24331* Harbour Board Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbla187438v1874n37342* Hospital Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohra187438v1874n57399* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ora187438v1874n54297* Waste Lands Administration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owlaa187438v1874n20454* Districts Sale of Spirits Act 1870 Orders in Council Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/odsosa1870oicva187438v1874n80805* Bay Lands Titles Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pblta187438v1874n76404* Fencing Laws Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pflea187438v1874n85467* Public Works Advances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ppwaa187438v1874n28449* Estate Descent Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/reda187438v1874n84300* of Mines Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/roma187438v1874n60327* and Waimahana Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tawga187438v1874n77362* Iron Smelting Works Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tiswla187438v1874n48477* Waste Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twla187438v1874n21316* David Lewis Retiring Allowance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tdlraa187438v1874n72438* New Plymouth Harbour Board Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnphbea187438v1874n35547* Otago Provincial Public Works Advances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toppwaa187438v1874n29532* Wilson Gray Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twgpa187438v1874n74389* Mayors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wma187438v1874n51308* Hospital Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whla187438v1874n7392* Land Payments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlpa187438v1874n30394* Mayors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wma187438v1874n50347* Waterworks Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wwla187438v1874n47443* Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wga187438v1874n78290Plus 29 Acts amended 1875 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1875.html * of Provinces Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aopa187539v1875n21360* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa187539v1875n42223* Hood Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahga187539v1875n46264* City Endowments and Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aceara187539v1875n34494 Amended: 2001* Harbour Foreshore Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahfga187539v1875n62431* Institute Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aia187539v1875n10328* Athenaeum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caa187539v1875n27344* District Drainage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdda187539v1875n26412 Amended: 1911/14/20/22/23/24/26/27/28/31/32/35/44/48/54/57/60/66/67/69/70/71/75/79/85* Land Purchase Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clpa187539v1875n47303* River Conservators Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/crcba187539v1875n55459* Waterworks Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cwea187539v1875n33443* of the Supreme Court Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cotsca187539v1875n82510* Succession Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsa187539v1875n90315* Corporation Borrowing Powers Extension and Debentures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dcbpeada187539v1875n58775* Waterworks Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwea187539v1875n5464 Repealed: 1978* Debtors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fda187539v1875n80329* Apprentices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gaa187539v1875n38379* and Masterton Public Park and Cemetery Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gamppacra187539v1875n56678* and Public Works Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iapwaa187539v1875n98567* Expenditure Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ieia187539v1875n2492* Municipal Council Empowering and Waterworks Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/imceawla187539v1875n66730* Public Offices Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iposa187539v1875n72421* Railway and Coal Company Limited Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kracclea187539v1875n2601* Franchise Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lfa187539v1875n76288* Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mga187539v1875n91265* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mhba187539v1875n64317* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ngca187539v1875n3302 Amended: 1936* Municipal Council Empowering and Waterworks Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nmceawla187539v1875n32669* Swamp Nuisance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nsna187539v1875n4343* River Harbour Board Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrhbla187539v1875n16385* Zealand Presbyterian Church Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzpca187539v1875n9431* Zealand University Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzura187539v1875n60491* Gasworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oga187539v1875n30309* Town Hall and Gasworks Sites Recreation Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/othagsrra187539v1875n59690* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owa187539v1875n29347* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ora187539v1875n61321* Harbour Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbea187539v1875n63420* University Site Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ousea187539v1875n7454* Electric Telegraph Station Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oetsra187539v1875n71549* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwa187539v1875n15407* of Towns Regulation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/potra187539v1875n35415* Church of Otago Corporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcooca187539v1875n5541* Appropriations Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/paea187539v1875n97539* Libraries Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/plpa187539v1875n88372* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qwa187539v1875n4427* Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rca187539v1875n86309* of Births and Deaths Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/robada187539v1875n23440 Amended: 1892* of Mining Companies Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/romcva187539v1875n13546* Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rga187539v1875n92253* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa187539v1875n73205* Fee Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sfa187539v1875n74218* Kakanui Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tkhba187539v1875n17343* New Zealand Presbyterian Church Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnzpca18752a187539v1875n85509* Wellington Reclaimed Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twrla187539v1875n52380* Municipal Council Waterworks Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmcwla187539v1875n31557* of Otago Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/uoosa187539v1875n6414* Athenaeum and Mechanics Institute Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/waamiia187539v1875n11705* Rivers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wra187539v1875n54347* Toll Gates Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wtga187539v1875n49364* Municipal Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wmra187539v1875n45443Plus 32 Acts amended 1876 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1876.html * Importation Prohibition Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aipa187640v1876n61466* Beach Road Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/abrga187640v1876n73321* Public Buildings Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/apba187640v1876n72345* Athenaeum Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bara187640v1876n32390* Recreation Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/brra187640v1876n33409* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bhba187640v1876n89294* Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bsa187640v1876n64306 Amended: 1856/1951/55/70/78/80/82/83/87/89/93/2004/07* Educational Reserves Sale and Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cersala187640v1876n10564* New Brighton Bridge Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cnbba187640v1876n39421* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/chba187640v1876n93375* of Wellington Loans Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cowlca187640v1876n53527* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/crra187640v1876n77417* Sheep Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsa187640v1876n62247* Special Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dssa187640v1876n56394* Drill-shed Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ddra187640v1876n75372* Reserves Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/drea187640v1876n20367* Wharves and Quays Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwaqra187640v1876n74491* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eba187640v1876n42277* and Forsyth Reclamation and Akaroa Railway Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eafraarta187640v1876n85678* Councillors Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ecia187640v1876n16480* Arrangements Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/faa187640v1876n48324* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fhba187640v1876n91340 Amended: 1917* Bay Rivers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbra187640v1876n11312 Amended: 1912/17/20/30/32/33/34/36* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hhba187640v1876n96328* Native Succession Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/insa187640v1876n68427* Athenaeum and Mining Institute Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/laamira187640v1876n22582* Recreation Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lrra187640v1876n23397* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lhba187640v1876n98386* Public Reserves Vesting Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lprva187640v1876n21524* Athenaeum Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mara187640v1876n81382* Municipality Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mmea187640v1876n36474* Flat School Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mfsra187640v1876n34353* Athenaeum and Mechanics Institute Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/naamiia187640v1876n31641* Borough Endowments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nbea187640v1876n79399 Amended: 1999* Hospital Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhsa187640v1876n80339* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nwa187640v1876n6344* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohba187640v1876n95315* Gold Field Agricultural Leases Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ogfalva187640v1876n84592* and Wellington Tolls Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oawta187640v1876n58404* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohba187640v1876n94305* Presbyterian Church Conveyance Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/opccva187640v1876n9583* Athenaeum and Public Library Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaaplra187640v1876n78551* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/phba187640v1876n99290* Molyneux Reserves Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pmrla187640v1876n30490* Works Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwa187640v1876n50279 Amended: 1901/04/05/08/09/10/11/13/14/23/24/25/27/28/35/47/48/52/53/54/55/56/58/60/61/62/63/64/65/67/70/71/72/73/74/75/76/77/82/83/87/88/91* Commonage Reserve Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qcrma187640v1876n76529* Nuisance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rna187640v1876n63265 Amended: 1918/20/21/35/47/49/52/53* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ra187640v1876n49204 Amended: 1910/11/13/15/22/24/35/50/54/57/60/62/65/69/70/72/73/74/76/77/78/80/81* of Local Elections Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rolea187640v1876n26403* Lease and Conveyance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rlaca187640v1876n29367* Catholic Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcla187640v1876n38305* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rra187640v1876n37349* Dunedin and St Kilda Municipalities Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sdaskmva187640v1876n7611* Botanic Garden Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbga187640v1876n24308* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thba187640v1876n87312* Water Supply Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twsa187640v1876n59366* Imprest Supply Act No 2 1876 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tisan21876a187640v1876n15415* Maori Representation Acts Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmraca187640v1876n44534* Gas Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tga187640v1876n1241* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thba187640v1876n97328 Amended: 1906* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whba187640v1876n88354* Athenaeum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/waa187640v1876n83309* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whba187640v1876n90318* Church of England Site Crown Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcoescga187640v1876n12517* Native Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wnga187640v1876n40359* Harbour and River Conservators Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wharcba187640v1876n86574* Goods Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wga187640v1876n25305* Lands Administration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlaa187640v1876n51401* Corporate Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcla187640v1876n54391* Hospital and College Reserves Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whacrea187640v1876n57584* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wra187640v1876n14365Plus 14 Acts amended 1877 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1877.html * and Pastoral Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aapsa187741v1877n12477 Amended: 1903/12/20/33/61/73/77/79/93* Public Library Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aplsa187741v1877n35366* College and Grammar School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/acagsa187741v1877n51398* Highway Districts Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahdva187741v1877n1483* Athenaeum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/baa187741v1877n80311* Books Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bbea187741v1877n16320* Harbour Endowment and Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bheaba187741v1877n66491* of New Plymouth Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bonpra187741v1877n67503* Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cma187741v1877n46316* City Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ccra187741v1877n78423 Amended: 1929/32* Trust Property at Little River Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctpalrea187741v1877n53631* of Dunedin Loans Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/codlca187741v1877n50470* Public Reserves Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cprga187741v1877n44400* Athenaeum Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cara187741v1877n33416* Lands Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clsa187741v1877n28287* Railways Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dra187741v1877n40335 Amended: 1920/88* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da187741v1877n53203* Gaol Street Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dgsa187741v1877n43317* Gas and Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dgawa187741v1877n23388* School Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsra187741v1877n21356* Town Hall Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dthsa187741v1877n11351* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/era187741v1877n22327 Amended: 1910/11/13/14/15/24/27/31/34/48* Arts Copyright Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/faca187741v1877n17337* Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fpa187741v1877n45304* Native Land Purchases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gnlpa187741v1877n30457* Pension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gpa187741v1877n75323* Athenaeum and Mechanics Institute Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/haamiia187741v1877n30653* Commonage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hca187741v1877n12287* Crown Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hcga187741v1877n37355* Education Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hera187741v1877n83381* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hgca187741v1877n46321* County Offices Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hcosa187741v1877n85403* and Provident Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iapsa187741v1877n11483 Amended: 1919/23/52/57/64/65/67/73/77/79/81/83/93/94/2003/07* Bay Road District Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jbrda187741v1877n58378* Cemetery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kca187741v1877n28282* Native Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/knra187741v1877n22364* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/la187741v1877n29168 Amended: 1950/51/52/53/54/56/58/59/60/61/62/63/64/65/67/68/70/71/72/74/75/77/79/81/82/84/98* Athenaeum and Mining Institute Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/laamia187741v1877n19497* Municipal Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lmwa187741v1877n39446* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lra187741v1877n24317* and Heathcote Recreation Ground Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lahrga187741v1877n79538* Harbour Board Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lhbla187741v1877n26413* Harbour Works Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lhwca187741v1877n87564* Public Domain Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lpda187741v1877n3382* Land Orders Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mloa187741v1877n69327* Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mra187741v1877n34294* Island Half-Caste Crown Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mihcga187741v1877n84442* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma187741v1877n42196* Cook Road District Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mcrda187741v1877n59387* Swamp Nuisance Act Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nsnaca187741v1877n70472* Gas and Waterworks Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ngawsa187741v1877n72430* River Harbour Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrhma187741v1877n40406* Zealand Consolidated Stock Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzcsa187741v1877n33408* Athenaeum and Mechanics Institute Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaamira187741v1877n5596* Endowments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oea187741v1877n63340* Boys and Girls High Schools Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/obaghsa187741v1877n52439* Museum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oma187741v1877n56280* County Libraries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcla187741v1877n25419* Highway District Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/phda187741v1877n18421* Chalmers Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcca187741v1877n47409* Chalmers Mechanics Institute Incorporation and Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcmiiara187741v1877n6744* Laws Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/plea187741v1877n8360* Libraries Subsidies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/plsa187741v1877n47380* Reserves Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/prsa187741v1877n25334* Athenaeum Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qaa187741v1877n38363* of Food and Drugs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sofada187741v1877n48309 Amended: 1915/24* and Seamen Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sasa187741v1877n54298 Amended: 1909/10/11/12/13/22/24/25/29/36/46/48/50/54/56/57/59/61/62/63/64/65/66/67/68/69/70/71/72/75/76/77/82/85/87/88/90/91* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa187741v1877n14324* Agricultural and Pastoral Association Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/saapara187741v1877n15686* Boys and Girls High Schools Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sbaghsa187741v1877n82491 Amended: 1951/71* Contracts Confirmation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/scca187741v1877n13428* Agricultural and Pastoral Exhibition Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/taapera187741v1877n20647* County Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcra187741v1877n48403* and Gladstone Board of Works Property Vesting Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tagbowpva187741v1877n76670* Mechanics Institute Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmia187741v1877n4411* Farmers Club Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tfcra187741v1877n14466* and Others Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/vaola187741v1877n15422* Hospital Reserves Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whrea187741v1877n60468* Athenaeum Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wala187741v1877n55356* School Glebe Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wsgsa187741v1877n10339* Telegraph Station Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wtssa187741v1877n32441* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wgca187741v1877n45327* Harbour Endowment and Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wheaba187741v1877n29531* Lands Boards Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlbca187741v1877n26410* Harbour Mayoralty Election Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whmeva187741v1877n81573* and Nelson Coal Fields Administration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wancfaa187741v1877n73548 Amended: 1881* Port Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpa187741v1877n86283* Recreation Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrra187741v1877n57405 Amended: 1915/23Plus 41 Acts amended 1878 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1878.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa187842v1878n49293 Amended: 1911/35/44/51/57/58/60/64/65/67/70/73/75/79/81/82/85/87/93/94/98/2001/03/05* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahsa187842v1878n49344* Girls High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aghsa187842v1878n55354* Harbour Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bhea187842v1878n15363* of Christchurch Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bocra187842v1878n59468* Boys High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cbhsa187842v1878n30418* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/crra187842v1878n29450* to Animals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctaa187842v1878n7333* Law Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dlsa187842v1878n36363* Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fra187842v1878n41332* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/grra187842v1878n32447* Volunteer Hall Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hvhsa187842v1878n44426* Harbour Board Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hhbea187842v1878n33432* Clutha Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ica187842v1878n22230* of Campbelltown Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ioca187842v1878n12438* Water Works Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iwwla187842v1878n11440* Tax Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lta187842v1878n18210 Amended: 1977/78/81/82/83/85/86/88/89* Waterworks Transfer Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lwta187842v1878n48511 Amended: 1979* Water-race Transfer Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mwta187842v1878n25397* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mhba187842v1878n56322* Athenaeum Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/maea187842v1878n16401* Cook Reserve Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mcrsa187842v1878n36377* Ida Water-race Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/miwta187842v1878n13408* Licensing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nla187842v1878n32289* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhba187842v1878n58325 Amended: 1901/02* Plymouth High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nphsa187842v1878n52396 Amended: 1966/70* River Harbour Endowment and Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrheaba187842v1878n46555* Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nra187842v1878n45327* Mechanics Institute Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nmisa187842v1878n38503* Otago Benevolent Society Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nobsa187842v1878n19457* Athenaeum and Mechanics Institute Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaamia187842v1878n7493* Market Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/omra187842v1878n60351* Military Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/omga187842v1878n35386* and Southland Education Reserves Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaserla187842v1878n47561* School Commissioners Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oscea187842v1878n20533* University Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oua187842v1878n21346* Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pra187842v1878n43297* Harbour Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pha187842v1878n37255 Amended: 1919* Hall Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/phsa187842v1878n9310* Construction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rca187842v1878n45400* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ra187842v1878n28210* of Statutes Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rosa187842v1878n5370* Harbour Endowment and Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rheaba187842v1878n17562* Bank Profits Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sbpa187842v1878n11345* Fisheries Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sfpa187842v1878n43406* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sa187842v1878n31189* Powers and Contracts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spaca187842v1878n64409* County Council Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tccla187842v1878n34408* Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpa187842v1878n29353* Boys and Girls High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbaghsa187842v1878n54428 Amended: 1960/63* Catlins River Cemetery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tcrca187842v1878n3395* Harbour Board Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thbea187842v1878n31432* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thsa187842v1878n26311 Amended: 1958* Post and Telegraph Offices Site Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpatossa187842v1878n10520* Union Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tua187842v1878n8252* Crown Lands Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wclsa187842v1878n37360* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whba187842v1878n57313* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whsa187842v1878n18302 Amended: 1954/63* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whsa187842v1878n42317* City Boundaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcba187842v1878n51413* College Reserves Confirmation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcrca187842v1878n50542* Local Boards Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wlbea187842v1878n8468* Grants Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wgva187842v1878n62386* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whsa187842v1878n63312 Amended: 1959/66* Cemetery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wca187842v1878n14308Plus 30 Acts amended 1879 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1879.html * Corporation Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/acra187943v1879n32430* County Council Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/accwa187943v1879n25555* Free Public Library Aid Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/afplaa187943v1879n4376* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahba187943v1879n2311* Improvement Commissioners Transfer of Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aictopa187943v1879n5699* Shearing Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/asra187943v1879n21365* Drill-shed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda187943v1879n24349* of Auckland Loans Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coalca187943v1879n1465* Lands Inquiry and Maori Prisoners Trials Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cliampta187943v1879n25644* Courts Proceedings Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dcpva187943v1879n13526* Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eva187943v1879n10331* Probate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ipa187943v1879n38345* and Wangaloa Athenaeums Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kawara187943v1879n34498* Education Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kera187943v1879n23368* Prisoners Trials Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpta187943v1879n3389* River Districts Union Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mrdua187943v1879n19507* River Pilot Station Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrpsra187943v1879n36490* Water Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/owra187943v1879n6383* Grant Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ogea187943v1879n7406* Bridge and Ferry Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/obafra187943v1879n37428* University Reserve Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ourla187943v1879n29491* Assessment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/paa187943v1879n17390* Tax Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pta187943v1879n18308* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/qrra187943v1879n33467* of Statutes Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rosa187943v1879n36380* Drill-shed Reserve Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rdrma187943v1879n38504* for Working-mens Clubs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sfwca187943v1879n37433* Bluff Harbour Foreshore Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tbhfea187943v1879n35493* Imbecile Passengers Act Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tipaea187943v1879n39471* Land-Tax Collection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlca187943v1879n19338* Oamaru Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tohba187943v1879n30345* Palmerston North Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tpnra187943v1879n17467* Timaru Harbour Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tthbea187943v1879n26473* Triennial Parliaments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ttpa187943v1879n43381* Waterworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twa187943v1879n27360* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ta187943v1879n16193 Amended: 1910* Racecourse Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wra187943v1879n16318* Harbour Board Land and Borrowing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whblaba187943v1879n12473* Recreation Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrra187943v1879n9404* Bridge Debentures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wbda187943v1879n18365* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whba187943v1879n13373* Provincial District Highway Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpdhba187943v1879n14592* Clive Public Hall Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcphsa187943v1879n11385Plus 25 Acts amended and 1 Act repealed. 1880s  1880 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1880.html * Prevention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/apa188044v1880n20354* Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/apa188044v1880n18285 Amended: 1903/10/20/62/64/71/78/83/87/93* and Bankers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/baba188044v1880n22219* Duty Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bda188044v1880n44190 Amended: 1913* of Exchange Procedure Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boepa188044v1880n23321* Harbour Foreshore Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bhfla188044v1880n2376* and Branding Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/baba188044v1880n25227* Boroughs Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cbia188044v1880n19430* Securities Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csa188044v1880n19278* by Accidents Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dbaca188044v1880n15375 Amended: 1950/56/64/2005* Wifes Sister Marriage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dwsma188044v1880n57341* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da188044v1880n34200 Amended: 1910/11/21/26* Cattle Proclamations Validations Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dcpva188044v1880n29469* Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dra188044v1880n24264* against Real Estate Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/earea188044v1880n31365* School Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hsra188044v1880n35295* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hhbla188044v1880n22323* Drill-Shed Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/idsa188044v1880n9347* Bay Settlement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/jbsa188044v1880n16330* Goods Protection Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lgpa188044v1880n49351* Prisoners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpa188044v1880n4273* Prisoners Detention Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mpda188044v1880n6370* Law Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mla188044v1880n12221 Amended: 1922/94* Land Court Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlca188044v1880n38262* Schools Sites Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nssa188044v1880n50314* Road Rates Validity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/orrva188044v1880n10337* Officers Salaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/posa188044v1880n53344* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa188044v1880n26175 Amended: 1912/22/54/57/59/62/65/68/73/75/77/79/82/85/94/99* Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pva188044v1880n1338* Borough Council Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sbcea188044v1880n4443* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tla188044v1880n1301* Water Supply Transfer Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twsta188044v1880n7416* Confiscated Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcla188044v1880n40304* Harbour and River Conservators Board Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wharcbga188044v1880n15586* Harbour Board and Corporation Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbacla188044v1880n21506Plus 21 Acts amended 1881 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1881.html * of Children Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aoca188145v1881n9268* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahsa188145v1881n16233* Reserves Exchange and Change of trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/areacota188145v1881n6479* Islands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cia188145v1881n26216* Immigrants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cia188145v1881n47267 Amended: 1907* Suits Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csa188145v1881n8249 Amended: 1910* and Excise Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caeda188145v1881n40348* Persons Estate Duties Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dpeda188145v1881n41371* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da188145v1881n27149* of Females and Others Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eofaoa188145v1881n23394* and Lotteries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gala188145v1881n10273 Amended: 1979/80/81/82/83/87/88/89/91/92/94/96/2000* Race-course Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/grra188145v1881n19347* Water-race Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hwa188145v1881n2271* Gasworks Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/igsa188145v1881n24370* Succession Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nsa188145v1881n16280* University Reserves Vesting Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ourva188145v1881n21495* Chalmers Cemetery Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcca188145v1881n4320* Chalmers Dock Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcdta188145v1881n22356* Chalmers Drill-Shed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcda188145v1881n3316* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa188145v1881n39265* Authorization Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/raa188145v1881n36362* Construction and Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcala188145v1881n37400 Amended: 1913* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rhsa188145v1881n15267 Amended: 1960/63* Recreation-ground Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rrma188145v1881n23457* Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tda188145v1881n20375* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thbla188145v1881n13323 Amended: 1937* Water-Race Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twra188145v1881n11344* Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tda188145v1881n35278* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/va188145v1881n24221* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbla188145v1881n10349* and Temuka Public Schools Sites Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/watpssa188145v1881n17452* Race-course Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrra188145v1881n18346* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbla188145v1881n7313* Queens Wharf and Store Sales Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wqwassa188145v1881n2484* Coast Settlement Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcsra188145v1881n19440 Amended: 1913/14/15/23/48Plus 27 Acts amended 1882 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1882.html * Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa188246v1882n70188* County Council Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/accea188246v1882n3484* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/arra188246v1882n21390* Harbour Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahbea188246v1882n1383 Amended: 1973* Museum Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/amea188246v1882n6347* Railway-station Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ara188246v1882n4330* University College Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/auca188246v1882n3361 Amended: 1912/23/47* Harbour Foreshore Reclamation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bhfra188246v1882n26416* of Hamilton Boundaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bohba188246v1882n7378* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ca188246v1882n39190 Amended: 1912/22/26/50/53/59* Law Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cla188246v1882n32202* and Native Lands Rating Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/canlra188246v1882n41355* Duties Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdca188246v1882n56410* Laws Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/clca188246v1882n55389* Southern Market Reserve Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dsmrla188246v1882n27481* Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eda188246v1882n54293* Liability Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ela188246v1882n20307* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ea188246v1882n61234 Amended: 1958/62/73/75/78/83/89/2000* Companies and Consumers Liability Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gcacla188246v1882n21432* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghba188246v1882n10290 Amended: 1903/20* Schools Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/isa188246v1882n25299 Amended: 1909* Companies Registration Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mcrva188246v1882n48484* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhsa188246v1882n11249 Amended: 1916/60* Land Division Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlda188246v1882n28283* Zealand Colonial Inscribed Stock Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzcisla188246v1882n73441* Island Main Trunk Railway Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nimtrla188246v1882n74453* Timaru Cemetery Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ntcsa188246v1882n20363* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbla188246v1882n25310* and Eyreton Domain Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oaedbea188246v1882n22454* Native Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/onra188246v1882n5301* Harbour Board Further Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbfea188246v1882n24466* Harbour Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/phla188246v1882n13239* Road Board Enabling Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/prbea188246v1882n28343* and Local Bills Costs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/palbca188246v1882n24356* Tramways Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pta188246v1882n38294 Amended: 1891* of Telegrams Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pota188246v1882n19333* Domain Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rdbea188246v1882n23373* Agreement Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rava188246v1882n12469* and Endowments in Mining Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/raeimda188246v1882n26532* Estate Duty Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/reda188246v1882n30291* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rba188246v1882n43185 Amended: 1914/21* and Bridges Construction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rabca188246v1882n42382* Birds Nuisance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sbna188246v1882n14275* Aroha Township Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tata188246v1882n8275* Examination Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tea188246v1882n62235* Reclamation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tra188246v1882n14298* Executors and Agency Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/teaaca188246v1882n4483* Coast Peace Preservation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcppa188246v1882n5389Plus 34 Acts amended 1883 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1883.html * Hospital Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahra188347v1883n11352* of Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boea188347v1883n8225 Amended: 1963/71/79/95/2002* South Dunedin and St Kilda Streets Improvement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csdasksia188347v1883n24644* Gifts Duties Exemption Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cgdea188347v1883n46407* of Auckland Additional Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/coaala188347v1883n9346* and Annexation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caaa188347v1883n50337* Executions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cea188347v1883n7312* Offenders Jurisdiction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/foja188347v1883n4411* Courts Proceedings Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gcpva188347v1883n1470* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghsa188347v1883n21315* Trust, and Executors Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gtaeca188347v1883n2475 Amended: 1911* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hhsa188347v1883n7268* Societies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/isa188347v1883n16310 Amended: 1926/63/87* of Machinery Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iomea188347v1883n12434* Reserves Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/irea188347v1883n26378* Township Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ktsa188347v1883n12294* Boards Inquiry Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lbia188347v1883n33284* Frauds Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mfia188347v1883n3341* Island Half-caste Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mihga188347v1883n22331* Native Reserves Grants Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mnrga188347v1883n5441* Committees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nca188347v1883n19275* River Harbour Endowments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrhea188347v1883n4402* Dock Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oda188347v1883n23180* Witnesses Indemnity Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwia188347v1883n3466* Law Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/plca188347v1883n29393* Island Native Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sinra188347v1883n23397* Johns College Auckland Removal Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sjcara188347v1883n1386* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tla188347v1883n3183* Native Commonage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tnca188347v1883n25350* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/trra188347v1883n8357* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ta188347v1883n30199 Amended: 1901/14/24/33/35/46/55/57/60/62/68/69/74/77/82/83/86/88/2005* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whsa188347v1883n19257* Bridge Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wba188347v1883n14219* College Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcla188347v1883n16298* Harbour Board Land and Reclamation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whblara188347v1883n15473* Coast Peace Preservation Act 1882 Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcppa1882ca188347v1883n25518* Education District Subdivision Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wedsa188347v1883n6497Plus 30 Acts amended 1884 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1884.html * in lieu of Oaths Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ailooea188448v1884n7474* Sugar Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bsa188448v1884n39251* Drainage Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cda188448v1884n16230* Islands Animals Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ciaa188448v1884n13278* of Dunedin Leasing Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/codlpa188448v1884n17384* Moth Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cma188448v1884n44201* Stock Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csa188448v1884n41270* of Mines Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/doma188448v1884n35223* Lines Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ela188448v1884n32219* Notice of Birth, Marriage, and Death Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fnobmada188448v1884n18380* Conservation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fca188448v1884n48330* Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fca188448v1884n27251* Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ggca188448v1884n3283* Harbour Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gha188448v1884n4255 Amended: 1910* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghba188448v1884n11332 Amended: 1920/35/45/48/62* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hrra188448v1884n14357* Steam Tug Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hsta188448v1884n15272* Reserves Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/irla188448v1884n23379* Domain Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kdbea188448v1884n8353* Domain Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kdbea188448v1884n9352* Assurance Policies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lapa188448v1884n31298* Womens Property Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mwpa188448v1884n10367 Amended: 1961* Harbour Board Empowering and Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhbeala188448v1884n5435 Amended: 1920* Land Alienation Restriction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlara188448v1884n51419* Zealand Government Insurance Association Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzgiaa188448v1884n30525* Harbour Board Loans Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohblca188448v1884n20455* Honorarium and Privileges Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/phapa188448v1884n11488* Trustees, Estate, and Agency Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pteaaca188448v1884n1531 Amended: 1971* Offences Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/poa188448v1884n24217 Amended: 1901/03/04/06/13/19/24/26/35/50/51/52/53/54/55/56/58/60/65/67/69/70/74/76/79* of Births Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/robea188448v1884n9446* Charitable, and Educational Trust Boards Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcaetbia188448v1884n26683* Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rba188448v1884n49218 Amended: 1910/13/14/17/34/52/56/58/68/71/74/75/76/78/80/88* of New Zealand Private Acts Deemed to be Public Acts http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sonzpadtbpa188448v1884568* School Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tssa188448v1884n3288* Recreation Reserve Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/trrsa188448v1884n2374* Market Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tmra188448v1884n13321* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ta188448v1884n36235* Harbour Board Loans Consolidation and Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whblcaea188448v1884n7654* Harbour Borough Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbea188448v1884n22431* Harbour Board Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whba188448v1884n10337* Wages Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wwa188448v1884n19258Plus 31 Acts amended and 1 Act repealed. 1885 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1885.html * Railway Land Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/arlca188549v1885n35398* University College Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aucra188549v1885n1464 Amended: 1928* of Invercargill Loans Consolidation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/boilca188549v1885n20507* and Otago Marriages Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/caoma188549v1885n3366* College, Canterbury Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ccca188549v1885n3356* Market Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cmra188549v1885n12389* Public Works Loan Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cpwlva188549v1885n11497* Union Incorporation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cuia188549v1885n2447* Training Institution Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctia188549v1885n3433 Amended: 1975/79* Duties Interpretation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdia188549v1885n58443* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da188549v1885n23203* Railways Purchasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/drpa188549v1885n52398* Cattle-market Reserve Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dcrla188549v1885n19424* of Judgments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eoja188549v1885n45328* Encouragement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fea188549v1885n16315* High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ghsa188549v1885n8273 Amended: 1909/56/63/66* and Charitable Institutions Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hacia188549v1885n46470 Amended: 1910/13/15/19/20/23/25/28/29/32/36/47* Bodies Contractors Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lbca188549v1885n48319* Bodies Finance and Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lbfapa188549v1885n49335* Debentures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mda188549v1885n51279* Harbour Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhbea188549v1885n7381* Zealand State Forests Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzsfa188549v1885n30348* Harbour Board Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbla188549v1885n16322* North Burgess Roll Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pnbra188549v1885n6428* Church Property Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcpa188549v1885n33418 Amended: 1930/61/63/70/74/96* Nuisance Act 1882 Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rna1882ca188549v1885n31351* Magistrates Courts Proceeding Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rmcpva188549v1885n24578* Marys Convent Property Leases Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/smcpla188549v1885n1472* Public Works Loan Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/spwlva188549v1885n13452* Plains Railway Rating Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wprra188549v1885n53354* Corporation Leaseholds Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcla188549v1885n9442* Public Street-closing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpsa188549v1885n10429* and Grey Education Boards Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wageba188549v1885n15391* Enabling Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wea188549v1885n13257Plus 35 Acts amended 1886 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1886.html * Act Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aaea188650v1886n20387* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/aa188650v1886n4261* Harbour Board Loan Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahbla188650v1886n1306* of Mornington Boundaries Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bomba188650v1886n11423* Parnell, Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cpla188650v1886n2341* Trusts Extension Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ctea188650v1886n5394* of Christchurch Municipal Offices Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cocmoa188650v1886n5441* of Dunedin Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/codla188650v1886n10294* Service Reform Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csra188650v1886n33291* Mines Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cma188650v1886n31180 Amended: 1950/53/59/60/61/64/68/70/71/72/74/80/82/83/85/86/87/88* Branch Registers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cbra188650v1886n29335* and Instruments Registration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/daira188650v1886n28450* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/da188650v1886n17133 Amended: 1908/10/12/14/15/31/73/74/76/80/82/85/86/87/88/92/97/98/99/2000/01/03/04/05/07* Offenders Probation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/fopa188650v1886n22349 Amended: 1903* Auction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/faa188650v1886n10212* Public Prison Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gppa188650v1886n9321* Life Insurance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/glia188650v1886n35344 Amended: 1912/48/51/54/59/62/64/67/68/70/72/77/82* Loans to Local Bodies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gltlba188650v1886n48396 Amended: 1900* Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hrra188650v1886n8354* and Petone Gas Company Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hapgca188650v1886n4352* Bodies Loans Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lbla188650v1886n47240 Amended: 1902/03/08/10/12/21/22/24/51/55* Debentures Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lda188650v1886n3263* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma188650v1886n51158 Amended: 1910/11/13/14/15/19/20/22/24/27/31/34/35/37/41/47/48/53/60/61/62/63/65/72/73/75/78/81/85/87* Equitable Owners Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/neoa188650v1886n16334* Land Administration Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nlaa188650v1886n23342* Reserves Titles Grant Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nrtgea188650v1886n15515* Zealand Bible, Tract, and Book Society Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzbtabsa188650v1886n1419* Island Main Trunk Railway Loan Application Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nimtrlaa188650v1886n42558 Amended: 1891* Timaru Cemetery Sale or Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ntcsoea188650v1886n6453* Hill Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohra188650v1886n3295* Harbour Bridge Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohba188650v1886n13266* and Kaimanawa-Oruamatua Reinvestigation of Title Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oakrota188650v1886n52614* Force Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pfa188650v1886n18194 Amended: 1919/24/51/52/54/55/56* Chalmers Fire-brigade Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pcfsa188650v1886n14356* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pa188650v1886n54265* Bodies Leaseholds Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pbla188650v1886n37293* Works Appropriation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pwaa188650v1886n55391* Authorization and Management Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/raama188650v1886n44461* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/sla188650v1886n27203 Amended: 1915/22* Racecourse Trustees Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrtea188650v1886n7495* and Manawatu Railway Companys Additional Capital and Debentures Val Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wamrcacadva188650v1886n3786* and Wanganui Education Districts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/waweda188650v1886n12512* Harbour Board Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/whbla188650v1886n4390* Show-ground Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wsra188650v1886n15398Plus 23 Acts amended 1887 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1887.html * Borough Council Reserves Vesting and Reclamation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/abcrvara188751v1887n8596* Naval Defence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/anda188751v1887n39302* and Hastings Boroughs Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cahba188750v1887n2353* Drainage Board Reserves Sale and Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdbrsaea188751v1887n11521* Hospital Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cha188751v1887n10316 Amended: 1928/44/79* Railways Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gra188751v1887n37321 Amended: 1910/11/12/13/19/20/21/22/24/25/27/28/31/32/36/44/50/52/53/54/55/56/57/59/61/62/63/64/67/68/71/72/73/74/76/78/80* Fencing-Claims Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hfca188751v1887n9393* Guardianship and Contracts Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/igaca188750v1887n4409* Waterworks Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/iwra188751v1887n15444* Islands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kia188750v1887n1221* Railway Contract Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mrca188751v1887n38316* Salaries and Allowances Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msaaa188751v1887n25402 Amended: 1900* Plymouth Borough and Harbour Board Street and Reserve Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/npbahbsarea188751v1887n6706* Plymouth Recreation and Racecourse Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nprarra188751v1887n5556 Amended: 1910/20/42Plus 19 Acts amended 1888 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1888.html * Zealand Loan Act 1887 Repeal http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nzla1887r1888205 1887 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1887.html * in Council Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oicva188751v1887n18341* Assurance Company of London Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pacola188751v1887n2441* Bodies Powers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pbpa188751v1887n34293* Borough Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pba188751v1887n21261* within the Harbour of Wellington Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rwthowa188750v1887n2521* County Hospital Representation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/schra188751v1887n16533* West Licensing District Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/twlda188751v1887n20387* North County Council Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wnccea188751v1887n18524* Conservation of Rights Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcora188750v1887n3377* College and Girls High School Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcaghsa188751v1887n17441* Methodist Church Property Trust Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wmcpta188751v1887n4571* and Grey Education Boards Act Continuance Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wagebaca188750v1887n9520* and Nelson Native Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wannra188751v1887n29445Plus 11 Acts amended 1888 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1888.html * Harbour Improvement Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ahia1888295* Rifle-range Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cra1888232* Domain and Recreation-ground Grant Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cdarga1888357* of the Crown Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/dotca1888187* Lake Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ella1888176* Corporation Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/icea1888387* Drill-shed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kda1888158* Bodies Audit Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lbaa1888157* Courts Proceedings Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/lcpa1888253* Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mla1888126* Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ma1888174* Somers Road Board Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/msrbea1888366* Contracts and Promises Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncapa1888312* and Military Forces Discipline Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/namfda1888331* and Military Settlers and Volunteers Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/namsavla1888475* Hospital Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhra1888289* Cemetery Reserve Leasing Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ncrla1888345* Municipal and Education Reserves Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/omaerea1888434* Education Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oera1888240* Harbour Board Indemnity and Lands Vesting Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ohbialva1888439* Recovery and Remission Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/prara1888344* Settlers Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/psa1888195* Compensation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rca1888220* Drill-sheds and Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/vdala1888305* Agricultural College Model Farm Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wacmfa1888355* Asylum, Home, Hospital, and Orphanage Reserves Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wahhaora1888551* Corporation and College Land Exchange Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcaclea1888429* Drill-shed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wda1888180Plus 16 Acts amended and 1 Act repealed. 1889 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1889.html * of Brunner Enabling Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/bobea1889260* Society of Arts Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csoara1889385 1890s  1891 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1891.html * Society of Arts Reserve Act 1889 Extension http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/csoara1889e1891501 1880s  1889 http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/toc-1889.html * of Title Issue Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cotiea1889390* Transfer Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cta1889194 Amended: 1922/23/25/31/50/52/53/61/63/67/69/70/73/74/85/90/96* Evidence Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/cea1889151* Endowments Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/eea1889237* and Marine Insurance Companies Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/famica1889306* Public School Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/gpssa1889259* Borough Endowment Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/hbea1889254* Supply No 2 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/isn2a1889244* Supply No 3 Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/isn3a1889244* Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/kra1889165* Sludge-channel Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/ksa1889192* Trust Lands Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/mtla1889275 Amended: 1930/35/80* High School Board Leases Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nhsblva1889359* Odd Fellows Lodge Site Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/noflsa1889270* and Military Settlers and Volunteers Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/namsavla1889475* Foreshore Reserve Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nfra1889279* and Waipiro Further Investigation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/nawfia1889414* Title Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/otea1889281* Marriages Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/oma1889156* Designs and Trade-marks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pdata1889295* Jurisdiction Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/pja1889287* Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rva1889281* Corporation Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/rcea1889382* Lands Revaluation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/slra1889300* Harbour Board Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/thbla1889235* Licensing Committees Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/tlca1889309* Public Library Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpla1889221* Public Reserve Sale Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wprsa1889261* Riverworks Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wra1889215* Order in Council Validation Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/woicva1889309* River Bed Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wrba1889174* and Manawatu Railway Companys Drainage Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wamrcdea1889590* City Empowering Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wcea1889310* Pere Land Act http://www.nzlii.org/nz/legis/hist_act/wpla1889118Plus 15 Acts amended See also The above list may not be current and will contain errors and omissions. For more accurate information try:* Walter Monro Wilson, The Practical Statutes of New Zealand, Auckland: Wayte and Batger 1867* The Knowledge Basket: Legislation NZ* New Zealand Legislation Includes some Imperial and Provincial Acts. Only includes Acts currently in force, and as amended.* Legislation Direct List of statutes from 2003 to order
5055205
Mount_Wilson_(Colorado)
scramble)(Louis W. Dawson, Dawsons Guide to Colorados Fourteeners, Vol. 2, Blue Clover Press, 1996, ISBN 0-9628867-2-6, pp. 160-165.)Mount Wilson is a fourteen thousand foot mountain peak in the state of Colorado.  It is located in the Head Wilderness in Dolores County approximately 10 miles (16 km) north of Rico and 10 miles (16 km) southwest of Telluride.  It is the highest peak in the Miguel Mountains, a subrange of the Juan Mountains. It is not to be confused with the lower, nearby Peak.The peak was named for A. D. Wilson, a topographer with the Survey. He was in the first ascent party, which climbed the peak on September 13, 1874, via the south ridge (a difficult route, not often climbed today).(Walter R. Borneman and Lyndon J. Lampert, A Climbing Guide to Colorados Fourteeners (3rd ed.), Pruett Publishing, 1994, ISBN 0-87108-850-9, pp. 231-239.)ClimbingMount Wilson is ranked among the top ten hardest of the Colorado fourteeners to climb.(( The standard climbing route ascends the North Face from Navajo Basin. Some permanent snowfields exist high in the basin (sometimes termed Navajo Glacier) and the climb usually involves snow travel, with axe and crampons recommended. Scrambling on rock then leads to the summit.A popular, though long, outing for expert climbers is the mile-long ridge connecting Mount Wilson to Diente Peak. The ridge is sharp and rocky, and requires difficult scrambling and often a small amount of rappelling.Geology and historyMount Wilson, and the rest of the San Miguel Mountains, are made up of a large, irregular tertiary igneous intrusion.(Halka Chronic, Roadside Geology of Colorado, Mountain Press, 1980, ISBN 0-87842-105-X, p. 245.)The Mount Wilson region became the site of intense mining activity, particularly for silver, in the early 1880s. The most famous of these mines was the Silver Pick Mine, which gave its name to Silver Pick Basin, just north of Navajo Basin.Pop cultureMount Wilson is most recognizable as a staple icon on many Coors beer products.See also* of Colorado fourteeners* peaks of Colorado* ranges of ColoradoReferencesExternal links* Mt. Wilson on 14ers.com* Photo Journal from a trip up Mount Wilson and El Diente
5060540
9th_Engineer_Support_Battalion
The 9th Engineer Support Battalion (9th ESB) is a general and direct engineering support unit of the States Marine Corps and is headquartered at Hansen, Okinawa, Japan.  The unit is subordinate to the Marine Logistics Group and the Marine Expeditionary Force.MissionProvide General and Direct Engineering Support of a Deliberate Nature to the MAGTF, to include survivability, countermobility and mobility enhancements, and explosive ordnance disposal; and general supply support incident to the handling, storage and distribution of bulk water and bulk fuel.Subordinate units* Headquarters and service company* Engineer Company A* Engineering support company* Bulk fuel company* 3rd Explosive Ordnance Disposal CompanyHistoryVietnam WarThe 9th Engineer Support Battalion of the 3rd Marine Logistics Group was once titled the 9th Engineer Battalion. The 9th Engineer Battalion was activated on 1 November 1965 at the Corps Base Camp Pendleton and was under the operational control of the Commanding General Force Troops, located at Corps Air Ground Combat Center Twentynine Palms.On 2 May 1966, elements of the battalion began deploying to the of Vietnam and by 17 June 1966 all of the battalion had arrived in the country and were located in and around Lai. There they repaired vital road networks and reconstructed many villages south of Chu Lai. 29 June 1966 found Alpha Company departing for Nang under the operational control of the 7th Engineer Battalion.While in Vietnam the 9th Engineer Battalion was responsible for the repair and mine sweeps of many of the major highways and bridges, for camp construction, for building ferries and for supporting the army and many foreign units on the battlefront. The Battalion participated in operations such as Colorado, Fresno, Nappa, and Golden Fleece.On 2 March 1970; Hawaii became the next duty station for Company A. while the rest of the battalion was returned to Camp Pendleton by 11 September 1970. At Camp Pendleton the battalion became part of the 5th Marine Amphibious Brigade until it was deactivated and retired its colors on 30 October 1970.The 9th Engineer Support Battalion was activated on 1 May 1976 on Okinawa, Japan. Since activated, Hansen has served as home for the battalion.The 1990sCompany A, 9th ESB was the lead element in planning and conducting humanitarian construction operations in Timor from September to December 2000. Additionally, they have completed several Habitat for Humanity projects in Bangladesh and Korea.Global War on Terror9th ESB provided real-world operational support to Joint Task Force 510 (Special Operation Command), Island, Philippines in support of Enduring Freedom from April to July 2002. By improving 81 kilometers of roads, creating helicopter landing zones, and opening an overgrown airfield, the Battalion improved the mobility of U.S. forces on the island during the Global on Terrorism.Explosive Ordnance Disposal Platoon continues to supports de-mining efforts throughout the Pacific Theater and provides technician in support of Presidential Operations as required. 9th Engineer Support Battalion earned the Marine Corps Engineer Association award for the best engineer support battalion of the year for 2000, 2001, and 2007.9th ESB deployed in support of Operation Iraqi Freedom (OIF) from February 2006 until March 2007.  During this deployment, they were based out of Taqaddum in Anbar Province and built/repaired roads, cleared the roads of Explosive Devices, repaired buildings and constructed observation posts and command outposts for the Army and Coalition Forces.( )In September 2008, 9th ESB deployed for a second tour in support of Operation Iraqi Freedom (seven months long); they returned in March 2009.  During the deployment, the battalion repaired roads, built working spaces and performed force protection construction and upgrades.  9th ESBs most recent deployment was to Helmand Province in Afghanistan in support of Operation Enduring Freedom (OEF) which occurred from May 2010 until November 2010.  During this deployment, the battalion continued to perform its assigned missions.                                                                                               (From 9th ESB Marines from Okinawa return to warm welcome retrieved from: http://www2.marines.mil/unit/mcbjapan/Pages/2009/Apr%2003/9thESBMarinesfromOkinawareturntowarmwelcome.aspx on 091105.)See also* of United States Marine Corps battalions* of the United States Marine CorpsReferences;Notes: ;Web* 9th ESBs official website* Unofficial website of 9th Engineer Support Battalion
5067002
William_Botsford_Jarvis
William Botsford Jarvis (May 4, 1799 &ndash; July 26, 1864) was an important member of the Compact and Sheriff of the Home District. His estate in what was then Upper Canada gave its name to Toronto. Street was named for his cousin, Samuel. BirthBorn in New Brunswick, he was the son of United Empire Loyalists from Connecticut and named for his fathers friend, Botsford. His father, Colonel Stephen Jarvis (17561840) of the 17th Regiment of Light Dragoons, became to the Forces in Canada and Usher of the Black Rod to the of Canada. Colonel Jarvis had fought with the British during the Revolutionary War, but was captured by the Americans in his home town at Connecticut. He escaped in a canoe to Island, rejoining the British forces there. After the war he joined some cousins in Brunswick, where William was born, before being persuaded to move to Upper Canada in 1809 by one of them, the incompetent and dishonest Jarvis (Upper Canada official).Business and politicsWilliam Botsford Jarvis had a gregarious and outgoing personality. He founded Toronto with the entrepreneur Bloor, and he was involved in the incorporation of a number of companies in the Toronto area including the Victoria Mining Company in 1856.In 1827 he was the choice of the Compact to be Sheriff of the Home District, and was duly elected. In 1837, as sheriff, he stopped Lyon Mackenzie and his rebels during Canada Rebellion from entering Upper Canada, forcing them back to engage at the of Montgomerys Tavern. After the rebellion was repressed he presided over the executions of Peter Matthews and Lount, even though it was Lount who had stopped the rebels burning Jarviss home. Mackenzie and Jarvis were bitter enemies and he was intent on burning Rosedale to the ground, but Jarvis wife and two of her sick children were in the house, and it was Lount who declared to the rebels that he was not there to fight women and sick children. Jarvis served as sheriff until 1856.In 1830, he was elected to the Parliament of Upper Canada for the town of Upper Canada; he was defeated in 1834.  He was elected to the town council for Toronto in 1841, but resigned the following year. Jarvis died at his home, Rosedale, in 1864.RosedaleThe Rosedale district of Toronto was named after Jarvis residence, Rosedale House, that formerly occupied that space. The house, which overlooked Castle Frank Brook, a tributary of the Don River, was a wonderful rambling villa perched on the edge of a ravine... with a wildflower garden, a conservatory full of hothouse flowers, and, the envy of Toronto, a magnificent curving double staircase that descended to a foyer panelled in richest walnut. Two new wings were added to either side of the house c.1830 containing a peach house, a grape house, bedrooms, a morning room and a large verandah. Orchards, quiet arbours, rose gardens and masses of flowers surrounded the house, which was named by Jarvis wife Mary, granddaughter of Dummer Powell, for the wild roses that grew so abundantly throughout the estate.FamilyWilliam Jarvis married Mary Boyles Powell (18031852), in 1828. She was brought up by her grandfather, Chief Justice Dummer Powell, and his wife. The Jarvis were the parents of five children: (1) Anne Frances Jarvis (18301919), married Allen Meredith, for whom Meredith Crescent in Rosedale is named (2) Louisa Jarvis (b.1831), married (Daniel) Augustus Nanton (d.1873), the parents of Sir Augustus Meredith Nanton, father-in-law of Trustram Eve, 1st Baron Silsoe (3) Lt.-Colonel William Dummer Jarvis (18341914) of the 12th York Rangers and the Canadian Mounted Police married Margaret, daughter of William Parker Ranney H.E.I.C.S., of Devon (4) Sarah Harriet Jarvis (b.1836), married in 1854 Lewis William Ord, a first cousin of Sir Ord, and the son of Major Robert Hutchinson Ord (17891829) D.L., of Greenstead Hall, Essex, formerly of the Kings Hussars (5) Lt.-Colonel Robert Edward Colborne Jarvis (b.1842) of the 67th Leinster Regiment). He was attached to the Staff College at Military Academy Sandhurst. He then served with the Red Cross Ambulance Corps throughout the War, and was awarded by the French government in recognition of his services with one of only two gold crosses made. He served on the staff of Roberts, 1st Earl Roberts during the Anglo-Afghan War, and was one of the lucky few to survive the infamous withdrawal through the Pass. He later served in South Africa. Though an elegant young man, a very lady-killer, he died unmarried.External links*A Brief History of Rosedale*Biography at the Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online
5080311
The_Badlanders
 followed_by     The Badlanders (1958) is a film directed by Daves and starring Ladd and Borgnine.(Variety film review; July 16, 1958, page 6.)(Harrisons Reports film review; July 19, 1958, page 114.) It was written by Richard Collins, based upon the novel The Asphalt Jungle by Burnett. PlotTwo men are released from the Arizona Territorial Prison at Yuma in 1898. One, Peter Van Hoek (Alan Ladd), called the Dutchman, is out to get both gold and revenge from the people of a small mining town who had him imprisoned unjustly. The other, McBain (Ernest Borgnine), is just trying to go straight, what proves difficult when the Dutchman involves him in his scheme.Cast*Ladd as Peter Van Hoek*Borgnine as John McBain*Jurado as Anita*Claire Kelly as Ada Winton*Smith as Cyril Lounsberry*Persoff as Vincente*Emhardt as Sample*Anthony Caruso as Comanche*Adam Williams as Leslie*Rainey as Prison Warden*John Daheim as LeeReferences(External links** * pres federalGolddu HollandaisBadlanders
5093532
Cotacachi_Cayapas_Ecological_Reserve
 established  1968Cotacachi Cayapas Reserve contains  of land and is located in the Imbabura  and Esmeraldas provinces of Ecuador  from Quito. This reserve is partly rainforest. The park is mix of many zones but, the Andeean (average 15 C) and Sub-tropical (average 25) zones are most common. The symbol of the reserve is a condor. This is one of the many protected areas in EcuadorThis reserve is a part of the Ecuadorian system of reserves and preserve and extends from the mountains of the Sierra to the western edge of the coastal rain forest in the Esmeraldas region. This region has not been extensively farmed and replanted with eucalyptus or pine trees, as so much of the interandean highlands have been, so the preservation of the plant species here is a very important effort. The plants here have evolved adaptations to high altitude (reduced water availability, low temperatures and high winds), but since the conditions here are not as severe as those at higher altitudes, the adaptations these plants are not as extreme as those of the paramo, at 36004800 meters.EcosystemsThe reserve is particularly important because it safeguards one of the few remaining examples of Ecuadors coastal rainforest, a much threatened ecosystem which forms part of the Choco; an internationally recognised bio-region which extends from Southern Panama to northern Peru and has been rated as a global biodiversity hotspot.FaunaBecause of the size of the park, there is a large selection of fauna located within the reserve. 500 species of bird along with anteaters, sloths, ocelots, raccoons, fox, parmo wolves and deer are commonly found in the park. Due to lakes and rivers of the park, many aquatic and amphibious animals are found there.FloraMany herbaceous species of plants are contained in the park. Shrubs along with a wide variety of trees, vines and ferns live here. There are over 2000 identified types of Flora in general.Cuicocha LakeThis lake lies in a Volcanic crater and is 200 m deep. Three volcanic domes emerge from the lake at various spots.Attractions and OthersThis reserve has volcanic lakes and waterfalls along with rapids. A tribe of Cayapa Indians lives here. You can book 8-day walks in the park with a guide. The elevation of the park ranges from 30 to 4990 meters. The Cotacachi Volcano is located in the park and can be climbed however it is recommended that any person climbing to the peak have some experience in climbing. This lake does contain some springs.ThreatsDespite its status as a protected area and the international recognition of its ecological importance, the reserve is under threat from a number of different areas. The responsibility for the protection of the reserve lies with a small team of park rangers who are charged with patrolling the reserves borders and preventing illegal incursions by loggers, poachers and colonists. The pressures on the reserve by these groups have grown in recent years as a result of population growth and natural resource depletion in the areas bordering the reserve boundaries. Unfortunately it is often the case that the park rangers struggle to patrol the long borders of the reserve and are ill equipped to manage conflicts when they arise.During the early 1990s areas of the reserve and its buffer zone were included in a mineral surveying program called PRODEMINCA which was partially funded by the Bank and aimed to support the development of extractive industries in Ecuador. This program has resulted in protests from communities living in the surveyed areas who are concerned that the publication of maps of mineral deposits will attract independent miners to the area. To date these protests have been successful in preventing publication of the project data and have also resulted in the withdrawal of international mining interests from Intag, an area of forest which lies to the southeast of the reserve. Following a request by DECOIN a grassroots organisation working in Intag the Bank launched an investigation into the project which concluded that several of the banks guidelines related to environmental assessment had been breached.See also* Cotacachi* of national parks in EcuadorExternal links*http://www.cayapas-adventures.com/reserve.htm- http://www.cayapas-adventures.com/reserve.htm*http://www.planetecuador.net/reserves.htm - http://www.planetecuador.net/reserves.htmEcolgica Cotacachi CayapasKayapas kawsaykuska amachasqa allpa
5100865
RapidMiner
 RapidMiner, formerly YALE (Yet Another Learning Environment), is an environment for learning, mining, mining, analytics, and analytics. It is used for research, education, training, rapid prototyping, application development, and industrial applications. In a poll by KDnuggets, a data-mining newspaper, RapidMiner ranked second in data mining/analytic tools used for real projects in 2009() and was first in 2010.()  It is distributed under the AGPL open source license and has been hosted by SourceForge since 2004.The RapidMiner project was started in 2001 by Ralf Klinkenberg, Ingo Mierswa, and Simon Fischer at the Artificial Intelligence Unit of the University of Dortmund. In 2006 Ingo Mierswa and Ralf Klinkenberg founded the company Rapid-I that is now the main contributor to the further development of RapidMiner as well as more than 30 developers world-wide.PurposeRapidMiner provides data mining and machine learning procedures including: data loading and transformation (ETL), data preprocessing and visualization, modelling, evaluation, and deployment. The data mining processes can be made up of arbitrarily nestable operators, described in XML files and created in RapidMiners user interface (GUI).  RapidMiner is written in the Java programming language. It also integrates learning schemes and attribute evaluators of the Weka machine learning environment and statistical modelling schemes of the R-Project.The Community Edition of RapidMiner is a toolkit for data mining. It is able to define analytical steps (similar to R), and in generating graphs like MS Excel. It is also used for analyzing data generated by high-throughput instruments used in processes such as genotyping, proteomics, and mass spectrometry.Example applications:* Bypassing its data mining functions and have RapidMiner generate figures.* Exploring data in Microsoft Excel fashion (knowledge discovery).* Constructing custom data analysis workflows.* Calling RapidMiner functions from programs written in other languages/systems (e.g. Perl).Features:* Broad collection of data mining algorithms such as decision trees and self-organization maps.* Overlapping histograms, tree charts and 3D scatter plots.* Many varied plugins, such as a text plugin for doing text analysis. Applications RapidMiner can be used for text mining, multimedia mining, feature engineering, data stream mining and tracking drifting concepts, development of ensemble methods, and distributed data mining. RapidMiner was rated as the fifth most used text mining software (6%) by Annual Data Miner Survey in 2010.(http://www.rexeranalytics.com/Data-Miner-Survey-Results-2010.html)RapidMiner is found in the: electronics industry, energy industry, automobile industry, commerce, aviation, telecommunications, banking and insurance, production, IT industry, market research, pharmaceutical industry and other fields. Properties Some properties of RapidMiner are:* written in Java* discovery processes are modeled as operator trees* internal XML representation ensures standardized interchange format of data mining experiments* scripting language allows for automatic large-scale experiments* multi-layered data view concept ensures efficient and transparent data handling* user interface, line mode (batch mode), and API for using RapidMiner from other programs* plugin and extension mechanisms, several plugins already exist* plotting facility offering a large set of high-dimensional visualization schemes for data and models* applications include mining, multimedia mining, feature engineering, data stream mining and tracking drifting concepts, development of ensemble methods, and distributed data mining.GUIRapidMiner provides a GUI to design an analytical pipeline (the operator tree). The GUI generates an XML (eXtensible Markup Language) file that defines the analytical processes the user wishes to apply to the data. This file is then read by RapidMiner to run the analyses automatically.While these are running the GUI can also be used to interactively control and inspect running processes.Other uses can involve calling RapidMiner from other programs and processes, for example from a Perl program. The Java application programming interface (API) provides clear interfaces for applying operators individually, i.e. there is no need to create an operator tree, providing the ability to bypass the GUI and control analytical processes directly. Individual RapidMiner functions can be called directly from the command line. Software Versions RapidMiner is open-source and is offered free of charge as a Community Edition although there is also an Enterprise Edition which offers more functions. RapidMiner code is also offered under a proprietary commercial license, to allow integration into closed-source solutions.() Extensions The Rapidminer can be extended with additional plugins. The program suite contains around 15 extensions which advance its applicability to: text mining, image processing, time series processing, web mining, statistics, visualization, semantics, paralleling of computation process, automatic process design (PaREn Automatic System Construction Wizard) and others. Several of the extensions can be found directly in the application in an extension manager. The other extensions can be downloaded from their respective developers. See also * Weka - machine learning algorithms that can be integrated into RapidMiner* R-Project - statistical framework that can be integrated into RapidMiner References * Mierswa, Michael Wurst, Klinkenberg, Martin Scholz, and Timm Euler: YALE: Rapid Prototyping for Complex Data Mining Tasks, in Proceedings of the 12th ACM SIGKDD International Conference on Knowledge Discovery and Data Mining (KDD-06), 2006. External links * RapidMiner project home page* YALE becomes RapidMiner* Stanford University Lane Medical Library article What is RapidMiner? - one of the sources of this Wikipedia pagede:RapidMineres:RapidMiner
5115017
Etropole
Etropole () is a town in western Bulgaria, part of Province. It is located close to the northern slopes of the Mountains in the valley of the Malki Iskar  from Sofia.HistoryThe area was first settled by the Thracian tribe of the Triballi in the 7th-6th century BC due to its position as an important crossroad connecting the Danube with Macedonia and Thrace close to two key Balkan passes. The forces of II of Macedon (339 BC), the Great (335 BC), the Celts and the legions passed through the valley in the Antiquity. The region developed as a centre of trade and economy, as evidenced by findings of Macedonian and Greek coins, Greek ceramics, luxurious items and decorations.The ore ledges brought Saxon miners to the town in the 16th century. They introduced the samokov hammer technology and helped for the areas establishment as a centre of craftsmanship and mining, with gold, copper, silver and iron being extracted in the 16th and 17th century. Handicrafts such as iron-, gold- and coppersmithing and cutlery prospered. The economic upsurge of the settlement aided the development of culture and education in the nearby Monastery in the period, where biblical and books were copied in a specific original calligraphic style, of which 76 hand-written volumes were preserved.A monastery school was established in 1613 and a public one (yet still monastery) followed in 1811. One of the first school buildings in Bulgaria was constructed in 1828-1830 by merchants and rich craftsmen from Etropole. A revolutionary committee part of Levskis Revolutionary Organization was founded in Etropole in 1870 in order to help the of Bulgaria from Ottoman rule. The town was liberated on 24 November 1877 by Russian forces under Vladimirovich Gourko during the War of 1877-78 and served as a governing centre for the 40-day winter march of the Balkan Mountains of the Russian Army.Peak on Island in the Shetland Islands, Antarctica is named after Etropole.Places of interestThe clockwork tower of Etropole built in 1710 is one of the oldest in Bulgaria. It originally served as a defensive structure until in 1821 a master builder by the name of Dido reconstructed it as a clock tower. With its height at about 20 meters it stands above most of the buildings in the small town. The clockwork tower is one of the Tourist Sites of Bulgaria along with the Monastery of the Holy Trinity and the History museum of Etropole.Notable people*Peev (18421904) - revolutionary*Yasenov (18891925) - poet*Marinova - singer of Roma descentGalleryFile:EtropoleMonastery NikolaGruev.JPG|Etropole Monastery ChurchFile:Etropole-historical-museum.jpg|Historical Museum (built 18531870)File:Etropole-courthouse.jpg|CourthouseFile:Etropole-monastery-gruev.JPG|Etropole Monastery of the Holy TrinityFile:Etropol-monastery-outside.jpg|Etropole Monastery of the Holy TrinityFile:EtropoleMonasteryChurch.jpg|Etropole Monastery ChurchFile:Etropole-elementary-school-Hristo-Botev.jpg|Botev school.File:Vodopad.varovitec.JPG|Varovitets WaterfallExternal links* Etropole municipality website* Etropole.net* Nikola Gruevs gallery of Etropole Monasterybg:he:lt:Etropolpl:Etropolept:Etropolero:Etropoleru:sr:war:Etropole
5125051
Ernie_Quinn
Ernest Ernie Quinn (3 June 1926  24 July 1992) was an Australian politician, elected as an Labor Party member of the South Wales Legislative Assembly for the western Sydney seat of Wentworthville.Early lifeQuinn was born in Lithgow into a coal mining family and was one of six children. He spent his early working life as a telecommunications technician.Parliamentary careerQuinn was elected as member for Wentworthville at the age of 36.  He held the seat for 26 years and was elected nine consecutive times in the period from 1962 until his retirement in 1988.()  Initially a member of the NSW Right-wing faction of the Labor Party, Quinn defected to the Left in 1978. Quinns parliamentary career was distinguished by a stint as Labors shadow spokesperson for labour and industry as well as involvement in parliamentary committees on electoral funding and liquor trading and his work on the parliamentary superannuation scheme. Much of his parliamentary work was focussed on the needs of his electorate, which at the time of his initial election was an unsewered semi-rural area without one single set of traffic lights. The development and implementation of better infrastructure in the working-class area was the prime focus of Quinns career.  Memorials within the electorate include a plaque commemorating his dedication of Ringrose Public School, and the public reserve named Ernie Quinn Village Green.()Quinn died in the Sydney suburb of Kogarah.  References
5133094
Quarrydale_School
Quarrydale School is a comprehensive school located in the ex-mining and textile community of in Ashfield, Nottinghamshire, England. In 2010 the school achieved its best results yet, with 56% or more A*-C grades in total. This has led to its specialism in science and mathematics .(DfES report)School dayUnder the revised timetable, the school day now starts at 8:35am, and finishes at 3:00pm, with 5 one hour lessons, a 15 minute break between first and second lessons, and a 40 minute dinner break between third and fourth lessons. Each year group has 6 tutor groups (with the exception being the lower years, with more tutor groups being added as the number of students increased), Q, U, A, R, Y and D. In years 7, 8, and 9, these years classes are split into two halfs. One half contains Q, U and A, while R, Y and D are in the other half. Each half has their classes together, but split into ability groups for various subjects. For years 10 and 11, the halfs are joined for their GCSEs.( )Sixth formThe form is relatively small, with 20 students in year 13, and around 60 in year 12. There is a range of AS/A2 level courses available to take, and the classes are small. As of September 2006, the Quarrydale form have entered into a programme where several of their students travel to College for some of their courses (e.g. Chemistry), and vice versa, were students from College travel to Quarrydale for various courses (e.g. Biology). The sixth form is a close community, with the students having spent five years in mainstream school together, and now an additional two more in the sixth form. Everyone knows everyone else, and old groups have disappeared after the rest of the students leaving in year 11. The school has recently received a grant in order to refurbish the ground floor of the sixth form block. In order with the rest of the school to keep its smart apparel the sixth form has a uniform: shirt, shoes, and trousers.  There is still choice as to what type they are.SchoolThe school has recently undergone redecoration in several areas. The science block has had its classrooms refurnished, and modernised. And other classrooms have been converted into new computer rooms. Several of the subject blocks have been moved around, with only English, P.E, Science, Technology and the form building being exempted from this re-arrangement.The school has 6.9% authorised absences which is marginally above the national average. It also experiences 3% unauthorised absences which is over three times the national level. Sutton Centre school often under-performs to Quarrydale in the league tables and general image.(BBC education table)Notable alumniKris Commons - Professional football player for Celtic.References
5135218
Juan_Vicente_de_Gemes,_2nd_Count_of_Revillagigedo
thumb|Juan Vicente de Gemes Padilla Horcasitas y Aguayo, 2nd Count of Revillagigedo, Viceroy of New SpainJuan Vicente de Gemes Padilla Horcasitas y Aguayo, 2nd Count of Revillagigedo (Spanish, with variant name: Juan Vicente de Gemes Pacheco de Padilla y Horcasitas, segundo conde de Revillagigedo) (1740, Havana &ndash; May 2, 1799, Madrid) was a Spanish military officer and viceroy of Spain from October 17, 1789 to July 11, 1794. He is known as a great reformer and one of the finest administrators of the Spanish colonial era&mdash;perhaps the last able viceroy of New Spain.Youth and military careerFrom a young age, Gemes Padilla Horcasitas served in the army, and distinguished himself fighting the British in the siege of Gibraltar. He rose to the rank of lieutenant colonel. He was a knight of the military Order of Charles III, baron of Benilova y Rivarroja and lord of the bedchamber to his majesty.First days as viceroyHe arrived at Veracruz on October 8, 1789 and took up the offices of viceroy, captain general and president of the Audiencia on the seventeenth. He became the third Criollo viceroy. His father, Juan Francisco de Gemes y Horcasitas, 1st Count of Revillagigedo was captain general of the island of Cuba, where the son was born, and later viceroy of New Spain (1746&ndash;55). The son was said to sleep only three to four hours a night, arising at 1 a.m. to begin a days work.Within a week of Gemes Padilla taking office, a gang of outlaws murdered Joaqun Dongo, a merchant and principal citizen of the capital, and ten of his employees. Gemes Padilla took only 13 days to have the gang located, tried and executed for the murders. Blanco, Aldama and Quintero, all Spaniards, were garroted for the murders on November 7, on a scaffold in the Plaza de Mexico. For this, he was often called the Vindicator of Justice.Two other prominent murders occurred during his term. The first was that of the prefect of the monastery of Merced, killed by a priest of his order September 23, 1790. The other was the murder on June 25, 1792 of de Glvez, governor and captain general of Yucatn.The challenges of his administrationHe found the capital run down and dirty&mdash;the streets, the markets, the promenades. Most of the people appeared in public wearing nothing but thin robes and battered straw hats. Houses were badly made and badly cared for. Public education had deteriorated. There were no free primary schools and other public schools were deficient. Most streets had not been maintained, and were fit for travel only by foot or by mule. The state of the army was shocking.His reformsHe immediately ordered the cleaning of the viceroys palace, banishing the food-sellers stalls. He prohibited the population from throwing trash in the streets. He removed stray animals from the streets. He ordered that no building be constructed without a license from the authorities. He continued the cobblestone paving of the streets outside of the city center.He did much to lessen the bribery and corruption among government employees. He implemented a new administrative system of intendancies in the government (begun by a previous viceroy, Nez de Haro y Peralta). He reorganized the courts and founded schools for Indigenous in various cities. He hired competent teachers for the Academy of San Carlos, and founded a chair in mathematics. He also set up a chair in anatomy at the General Hospital of the Natives.He ordered plans be created for the principal cities, stimulated the establishment of factories, and continued the work on the drainage system of City. He stimulated the cultivation of plants for textiles&mdash;cotton, hemp, flax and mulberry&mdash;and regulated the cutting of wood.Gemes Padilla cleaned up Mexico City and continued to install street lights there and in various other cities. All of the principal streets of Mexico City were lighted by the end of his term. He intensified the construction of highways to Veracruz, Acapulco, Guadalajara, San Blas and Toluca and established biweekly mail service to the capitals of the intendencies. He promoted the construction of needed public buildings and aqueducts. He instituted night patrols and fire brigades. He also established the general archives of the colony, bring together old and important documents. He ordered that cemeteries be outside the city. He had new ships built for the protection of the coasts.As a reaction to the French Revolution, he prohibited the importation of books and periodicals expressing the new ideas. Spains war with France was very expensive, and Gemes Padilla sent three million pesos to the mother country, in addition to the usual remittances.He initiated excavations in the Plaza de Armas in Mexico City, during which the Aztec calendar stone was discovered (1790). (This was part of a project to level the streets.) In 1792 he founded the Royal College of Mining. He aided the botanical investigations of Sess y Lacasta, which were to result in the Flora mexicana (1894). He ordered that a census be taken of the colony. There were 4,484,000 inhabitants.On November 14, 1789, for the first time on record the Borealis was seen in Mexico City. This caused much consternation; people believed that the heavens were on fire, and the end of the world was approaching.On December 27, 1789 the new king, Charles IV was proclaimed in Mexico. The famous Mexican engraver and medalist Antonio Gil cast a series of medals for the event.On February 21, 1794, Lpez de Santa Anna, many-time president of the Republic of Mexico, was born in Jalapa, Veracruz.ExplorationsMalaspina, commander of the corvettes Descubierta and Atrevida, arrived in Mexico in 1791 during his scientific and political voyage throughout the Spanish colonies. Malaspina assigned several of his officers to investigate the colonial archives and records. This was one of the political tasks of the Malaspina expedition, for which Malaspina and his officers had royal authority above that of the viceroy, authorizing access to any and all documents they might think relevant. Alcal Galiano was in command of the party of Malaspinas officers. While in Mexico Malaspina received orders from the king of Spain to investigate a rumored Passage in Alaska. While returning to Acapulco Malaspina learned of the discovery of the entrance to the of Georgia, a result of the expedition of de Eliza sent by Gemes Padilla in 1791 to the Northwest. Gemes Padilla had been preparing another expedition to explore the Strait of Juan de Fuca since 1791. It was to be under the command of Antonio Mourelle, using two newly built schooners, Mexicana and Sutil. But Malaspina was able to take control of the schooners, replace Mourelle with Alcal Galiano, and sent the ships to explore the Strait of Georgia. Galianos expedition took place in 1792. Because Malaspina was imprisoned for political reasons upon his return to Spain in 1794 the account of his expedition was never published. Galianos exploration account was published in 1802, but with all mention of Malaspina removed. It was instead said that Galiano operated under the direction of Gemes Padilla instead of Malaspina. This fiction continues to be widely cited to the present day.()(Dionisio Alcal Galiano: The Canadian Adventure of a Spanish Naval Hero, Malaspina University-College) Because of his sponsorship of exploration, several places in America bear his name, such as Juan Island, Island, and Island, among others.  When he took the office of viceroy in 1789, the Spanish claims in North America had reached their widest extent. Although he sponsored exploration, he did not see the Pacific Northwest as being worth what it would cost to maintain possession of it and he resisted his predecessors efforts to build up the army there.End of his administrationIn 1794 complaints from the Ayuntamiento (city government) led to a de residencia against the viceroy before the of the Indies. (He had made enemies by his fight against corruption.) The viceroy was ordered to return to Spain to mount a defense against the various charges. He was absolved and the councilmen were ordered to pay costs.Despite his good work and popularity with the people he ruled, Gemes Padilla lasted only five years in office. Although King Charles IV was the nominal ruler of Spain, his queen, Louisa of Parma, and her lover, de Godoy, held most of the power. Godoy was not in agreement with Gemes Padillas reforms and lack of territorial ambitions in the Pacific Northwest. Godoy replaced him as soon as he could.Death and legacyIsland, in the Archipelago of southeast Alaska was named for him, as were the Juan Islands in what is now the States state of Washington and the Islands, southwest of the California peninsula in Mexico. There is also a Revilla-Gigedo Palace in Spain. He died on May 2, 1799 (some sources say May 12) in Madrid. He was greatly mourned in New Spain. In his honor, Charles IV made his descendants grandees of Spain.References* Gemes Pacheco de Padilla, Juan Vicente de, Enciclopedia de Mxico, v. 6. Mexico City: 1987.* Garca Puron, Manuel, Mxico y sus gobernantes, v. 1. Mexico City: Joaqun Porrua, 1984.* Orozco L., Fernando, Fechas Histricas de Mxico. Mexico City: Panorama Editorial, 1988, ISBN 968-38-0046-7.* Orozco Linares, Fernando, Gobernantes de Mxico. Mexico City: Panorama Editorial, 1985, ISBN 968-38-0260-5.NotesbeforeafterbeforeafterVicente de GemesVicente de Gemes Padilla Horcasitas y AguayoVicente de Gemes Padilla Horcasitas y AguayoVicente de Gemes Pacheco y Padilla, graaf van Revilla GigedoVicente de Gemes Pacheco y PadillaVicente de Gemes Padilla Horcasitas y Aguayo, 2. hrabia Revillagigedo
5144152
Yamana_Gold
 intl               Yamana Gold Inc. is a Canadian-based gold producer that began operations in 2003 with significant gold production, gold development stage properties, exploration properties, and land positions in Brazil, Argentina, Chile, Mexico and Colombia.Yamana added several mining properties with the purchase of other gold companies in 2006, namely Desert Sun and RNC Gold. Further exploration and development is planned, including a goal of including significant levels of copper mining activity in 2007.Yamana added several mining properties with the purchase of other gold companies in 2005, 2006 and 2007, namely Viceroy, Desert Sun, RNC Gold, Northern Orion and Meridian Gold.   The companys portfolio includes: (i) seven operating gold mines, namely Chapada, El Pen, Jacobina, Gualcamayo, Minera Florida, Fazenda Brasileiro and a 12.5% indirect interest in the Alumbrera mine, and (ii) various advanced and near development stage projects and exploration properties in Brazil, Chile, Argentina, Mexico and Colombia.The principal corporate members of Yamana Gold are:* Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Peter Marrone (also the Founder of Yamana Gold)* President and Chief Operating Officer, Ludovico Costa* Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President of Finance, Charles B. MainMining operations* Brazil** Fazenda Brasileiro** Chapada** Jacobina** Alto Horizonte** Pilar de Gois** Crixs** Guarinos* Chile** El Penon** Minera Florida* Argentina** Gualcamayo** Alumbrera (12.5% indirect interest)See also* as an investmentReferences(External links* Yamana Gold official websiteGoldGoldGold
5150707
History_of_the_United_Kingdom_(1945present)
This article details the of the United Kingdom from the end of the Second World War in 1945, to the Present Day.When Britain emerged victorious from World War II, the Labour Party under Attlee came to power and created a comprehensive state, with the establishment of the Health Service, entitling free healthcare to all British citizens and other reforms included the introduction of old-age pensions, free education at all levels, sickness benefits and benefits, most of which was covered by the newly introduced insurance, paid by all workers. The of England, railroads, heavy industry, coal mining and public utilities were all nationalised. During this time, British colonies such as India, Burma and Ceylon were granted independence and Britain was a founding member of NATO in 1949.The Conservatives returned to power in 1951, accepting most of Labours postwar reforms and presided over 13 years of economic stability. However the crisis of 1956 helped lower Britains reputation as a world power. Ghana, Malaya, Nigeria and Kenya were granted independence during this period. Labour returned to power under Wilson in 1964 and oversaw a series of social reforms including the decriminalisation of homosexuality and abortion, the relaxing of divorce laws and the banning of punishment. Heath returned the Conservatives to power from 1970 to 1974 and oversaw the decimalisation of British currency, the ascension of Britain to the Economic Community and the height of Troubles in Ireland. In the wake of the oil crisis and a miners strike, Heath introduced the three-day working week to conserve power.Labour made a return to power in 1974 but a series of strikes carried out by unions over the winter of 1978/1979 (known as the of Discontent) paralysed the country and as Labour lost its majority in parliament, a general election was called in 1979 which took Thatcher to power and began 18 years of Conservative government. Victory in the War (1982) and the governments strong opposition to trade unions helped lead the Conservative Party to another three terms in government. Thatcher initially pursued monetarist policies and went on to privatise many of Britains nationalised companies such as Telecoms, British gas, British Airways and British Steel. The controversial Community Charge (poll tax), used to fund local government attributed to Thatcher being ousted from her own party and replaced as Prime Minister by Major in 1990.Major replaced the Poll Tax with the tax and oversaw British involvement in the War. Despite a recession, Major led the Conservatives to a surprise victory in 1992. The events of Wednesday in 1992, party disunity over the Union and several scandals involving Conservative politicians led to Labour under Blair winning a landslide election victory in 1997. Labour had shifted its policies closer to the political centre, under the new name New Labour. The Bank of England was nationalised and Scotland and Wales were both given a devolved Parliament and Welsh Assembly respectively. A devolved power sharing Ireland Executive was established in 1998, believed by many to be the end of The Troubles.Blair led Britain into the controversial War, which contributed to his eventual resignation in 2007, when he was succeeded by his Chancellor Brown. A global reccession in the late 2000s led to Labour being defeated in the 2010 election and replaced by a Conservative-Liberal Democrat coalition, headed by Cameron, which has pursued a large series of public spending cuts to help reduce Britains budget deficit.Labour Government (1945-51)Image:Attlee BW cropped.jpg|thumb|AttleeAfter War II, the landslide 1945 Election returned the Labour Party to power and Attlee became Prime Minister of the Kingdom.(Butler (1989) p.5) The party had clear aims. The of England was nationalised along with railroads, coal mining, public utilities and heavy industry. A comprehensive state was created with the creation of a National Health Service, entitling all British citizens to free healthcare. Among the most important pieces of legislation was the National Insurance Act 1946, in which people in work paid a flat rate of insurance. In return, they (and the wives of male contributors) were eligible for flat-rate pensions, sickness benefit, unemployment benefit, and funeral benefit. Various other pieces of legislation provided for child benefit and support for people with no other source of income. Legislation was also passed to provide free education at all levels.Britain was in many respects unable to afford such radical changes and the government had to cut expenditures. This began with giving independence to many British oversea colonies, beginning with India in 1947 and Palestine, Burma and Ceylon during 1948-1949. Under the post-war Bretton Woods economic system, Britain had entered into a fixed rate of USD 4.03/ GBP. This rate reflected Britains sense of its own prestige and economic aspiration and optimism but was badly judged, and hampered growth. In 1949, Attlees government had little choice but to devalue to USD 2.80/ GBP, permanently damaging the administrations credibility.(Stephens (1997) p.xiv)Despite these problems, one of the main achievements of Attlees government was the maintenance of near full employment. The government maintained most of the wartime controls over the economy, including control over the allocation of materials and manpower, and unemployment rarely rose above 500,000, or 3% of the total workforce. In fact labour shortages proved to be more of a problem. One area where the government was not quite as successful was in housing, which was also the responsibility of Bevan. The government had a target to build 400,000 new houses a year to replace those which had been destroyed in the war, but shortages of materials and manpower meant that less than half this number were built.Britain became a founding member of the Nations during this time and also helped found NATO in 1949. During the onset of the War, Britain developed its own nuclear arsenal, although the first test was not carried out until 1952.The Labour Party was returned to power in the general election of 1950, its share of the popular vote holding up, much to the surprise of some commentators.  The large reduction that it suffered in its parliamentary majority was mostly due to the vagaries of the past the post voting system, plus a degree of Conservative opposition recovering support at the expense of the rapidly declining Liberal Party.(Butler (1989) p.9)Labour lost the General Election of 1951 despite polling more votes than in the 1945 election, and indeed more votes than the Conservative Party.(Butler (1989) p.11)Conservative Government (1951-64)Winston Churchill (1951-1955)Image:Churchill HU 90973.jpg|thumb|ChurchillFile:Elizabeth and Philip 1953.jpg|thumb|Newly crowned Queen II and her husband Philip.Churchill again became Prime Minister.  His third government  after the wartime national government and the short caretaker government of 1945  would last until his resignation in 1955. During this period he renewed what he called the special relationship between Britain and the United States, and engaged himself in the formation of the post-war order.His domestic priorities were, however, overshadowed by a series of foreign policy crises, which were partly the result of the continued decline of British military and imperial prestige and power.  Being a strong proponent of Britain as an international power, Churchill would often meet such moments with direct action.In February 1952, King George VI died and was succeeded by his eldest daughter Elizabeth. Her coronation on June 2, 1953 gave the British people a renewed sense of national pride and enthusiasm which had been lowered by the war. As of 2010, Elizabeth II has been the monarch for Anglo-Iranian Oil DisputeIn March 1951, the Iranian parliament (the Majlis) voted to nationalise the Anglo-Iranian Oil Company (AIOC) and its holdings by passing a bill strongly backed by the elderly statesman Mohammed Mossadegh, a man who was elected Prime Minister the following April by a large majority of the parliament.  The International Court of Justice was called in to settle the dispute, but a 50/50 profit-sharing arrangement, with recognition of nationalisation, was rejected by Mossadegh. Direct negotiations between the British and the Iranian government ceased, and over the course of 1951, the British ratcheted up the pressure on the Iranian government and explored the possibility of a coup against it. U.S. President Harry S. Truman was reluctant to agree, placing a much higher priority on the Korean War.Churchills return to power brought with it a policy of undermining the Mossadegh government. Both sides floated proposals unacceptable to the other, each side believing that time was on its side.  Negotiations broke down, and as the blockades political and economic costs mounted inside Iran, coup plots arose from the army and pro-British factions in the Majlis.The Mau Mau RebellionIn 1951, grievances against the colonial distribution of land came to a head with the Kenya Africa Union demanding greater representation and land reform.  When these demands were rejected, more radical elements came forward, launching the Mau Mau rebellion in 1952. On 17 August 1952, a state of emergency was declared, and British troops were flown to Kenya to deal with the rebellion. As both sides increased the ferocity of their attacks, the country moved to full-scale civil war.Malaya EmergencyIn Malaysia, a rebellion against British rule had been in progress since 1948.  Once again, Churchills government inherited a crisis, and once again Churchill chose to use direct military action against those in rebellion while attempting to build an alliance with those who were not. He stepped up the implementation of a hearts and minds campaign and approved the creation of fortified villages, a tactic that would become a recurring part of Western military strategy in South-East Asia. (See War).Sir Anthony Eden (1955-1957)Image:Eden, Anthony.jpg|thumb|EdenThe Suez crisisIn April 1955, Churchill finally retired, and Sir Anthony Eden succeeded him as Prime Minister. Eden was a very popular figure, as a result of his long wartime service and also his famous good looks and charm. On taking office he immediately called a general election, at which the Conservatives were returned with an increased majority. But Sir Anthony had never held a domestic portfolio and had little experience in economic matters. He left these areas to his lieutenants such as Butler, and concentrated largely on foreign policy, forming a close alliance with U.S. President Eisenhower. This alliance proved illusory, however, when in 1956 Sir Anthony, in conjunction with France, tried to prevent Abdel Nasser, President of Egypt, nationalising the Canal, which had been owned since the 19th century by British and French shareholders in the Suez Canal Company. Sir Anthony, drawing on his experience in the 1930s, saw Nasser as another Mussolini.  Sir Anthony considered the two men aggressive nationalist socialists determined to invade other countries.  Others believed that Nasser was acting from legitimate patriotic concerns.In October 1956, after months of negotiation and attempts at mediation had failed to dissuade Nasser, Britain and France, in conjunction with Israel, invaded Egypt and occupied the Suez Canal Zone. But Eisenhower immediately and strongly opposed the invasion.  The U.S. President was an advocate of decolonisation, because it would liberate colonies, strengthen U.S. interests, and presumably make other Arab and African leaders more sympathetic to the United States. Also, the Union threatened to drop nuclear bombs on Paris and/or London unless Britain and France withdrew. Eisenhower feared another global war. When Eden asked for financial help, Eisenhower stated that Britain would have to pull-out before the US would provide any more financial aid to Britain. Eden had ignored Britains financial dependence on the U.S. in the wake of World War II, and was forced to bow to American pressure to withdraw. The Crisis is widely taken as marking the end of Britain (along with France) as a World power.Harold Macmillan (1957-1963) Image:Macmillan cph.3b40592.jpg|thumb|MacmillanEden resigned in the wake of the Suez Crisis, and his Foreign Secretary Macmillan succeeded him as Prime Minister in January 1957. He brought the monetary concerns of the exchequer into office  the economy was his prime concern. However his approach to the economy was to seek high employment, whereas his treasury ministers argued that to support sterling required strict controls on money and hence a rise in unemployment. Their advice was rejected and in January 1958 all the Treasury ministers resigned. Macmillan brushed aside this incident as a little local difficulty. Macmillan supported the creation of the Incomes Commission as a means to institute controls on income as part of his growth without inflation policy, a further series of subtle indicators and controls were also introduced during his premiership.Macmillan also took close control of foreign policy. He worked to narrow the post-Suez rift with the U.S., where his wartime friendship with D. Eisenhower was useful, and the two had a pleasant conference in Bermuda as early as March 1957. The better relationship remained after the ascent of F. Kennedy. Macmillan also saw the value of a rapprochement with Europe and sought belated entry to the Economic Community (EEC) as well as exploring the possibility of a Free Trade Association (EFTA). In terms of the Empire Macmillan continued the divestment of the colonies, his wind of change speech (February 1960) indicating his policy. Ghana and Malaya were granted independence in 1957, Nigeria in 1960 and Kenya in 1963.  However in the Middle East Macmillan ensured Britain remained a force  intervening over Iraq in 1958 and 1960, and becoming involved in Oman. Immigrants from the Commonwealth flocked to England afterwards putting strain on housing, social services and the labour market.He led the Conservatives to victory in the October 1959 general election, increasing his partys majority from 67 to 107 seats. Following the technical failures of a British independent nuclear deterrent with the Blue Streak and the Blue Steel projects, Macmillan negotiated the supply of American missiles under the agreement in December 1962.  Previously he had agreed to base sixty missiles in Britain under joint control, and since late 1957 the American Act had been eased to allow Britain more access to nuclear technology. Britain, the U.S., and the Soviet Union signed the Test Ban Treaty in 1962. Britains application to join the EEC was vetoed by de Gaulle (29 January 1963), in part due to his fear that the end would be a colossal Atlantic Community dependent on America and in part in anger at the Anglo-American nuclear deal.Britains of payments problems led to the imposition of a wage freeze in 1961. This caused the government to lose popularity and led to a series of by-election defeats. He organised a major Cabinet change in July 1962 but he continued to lose support from within his party. In 1963, he resigned after being told that he had terminal cancer however he recovered and lived until 1986.Sir Alec Douglas-Home (1963-1964)Image:Alec Douglas Home Allan Warren cropped.jpg|thumb|Douglas-HomeHis successor became Earl Douglas-Home. To become member of parliament he disclaimed his Earldom and, as Sir Alec Douglas-Home, contested a by-election in the safe seat of Kinross & West Perthshire. Home duly won as (probably) the last peer to become Prime Minister and the only Prime Minister to resign the Lords to enter the Commons. That was his most important claim for entering the history books as his policy was not successful. Following the 1964 General Election, the Labour Party was returned to power under Wilson and Home became Leader of the Opposition. In July 1965, Heath defeated Maudling and Powell to succeed Home as Conservative Party leader. Enoch Powell was given the post of Shadow Defence Secretary and became a figure of national prominence when he made the controversial of Blood speech in 1968, warning on the dangers of mass immigration from Commonwealth nations. It is possible that the Conservatives success in the 1970 General Election was a result of the large public following Powell attained, even as he was sacked from the shadow cabinet.Labour Government (1964-70)Image:Dodwilson.JPG|thumb|WilsonHarold Wilson (1964-70)In 1964, Labour regained the premiership, as Wilson narrowly won the general election with a majority of five. This was not sufficient to last for a full term and, after a short period of competent government, in March 1966, he won re-election with a landslide majority of 99. As Prime Minister, his opponents accused him of deviousness, especially over the matter of devaluation of the pound in November 1967. Wilson had rejected devaluation for many years, yet in his broadcast had seemed to present it as a triumph. During his first period of office, Wilsons government set up the University which he would come to regard as his own greatest achievement.Overseas, Wilson was troubled by crises in several of Britains former colonies, especially Rhodesia and Africa. Wilson gave diplomatic support but resisted pressure for military support to the States in the War. In addition to the damage done to its reputation by devaluation, Wilsons Government suffered from the perception that its response to industrial relations problems was inadequate. A six-week strike of members of the Union of Seamen, which began shortly after Wilson re-election in 1966, did much to reinforce this perception, along with Wilsons own sense of insecurity in office.Conservative Government (1970-1974)Image:Heathdod.JPG|thumb|HeathEdward Heath (1970-1974)The premiership of his successor Sir Edward Heath was the bloodiest in the history of the Ireland Troubles. He was prime minister at the time of Bloody Sunday in 1972 when 14 unarmed men were killed by British soldiers during a banned rights march in Derry. In 2003, he gave evidence to the Saville Inquiry and claimed that he never promoted or agreed to the use of unlawful lethal force in Northern Ireland. In July 1972, he permitted his of State for Northern Ireland Whitelaw to hold unofficial talks in London with a Irish Republican Army delegation by Mac Stiofin. In the aftermath of these unsuccessful talks, the Heath government pushed for a peaceful settlement with the democratic political parties. In 1974, the Agreement was produced but fiercely repudiated by many Unionists and the Unionist Party ceased to support the Conservatives at Westminster. Heaths major achievement as prime minister was to take Britain into the Economic Community in 1973. Meanwhile, on the domestic front, galloping inflation led him into confrontation with some of the most powerful trade unions, and energy shortages related to the oil shock resulted in much of the countrys industry working a three-day week to conserve power. In an attempt to bolster his government, Heath called an election for 28 February 1974. The result was inconclusive: the Conservative Party received a plurality of votes cast, but the Labour Party gained a plurality of seats due to the Ulster Unionist MPs refusing to support the Conservatives. Heath began negotiations with leaders of the Liberal Party to form a coalition, but, when these failed, resigned as Prime Minister.Labour Government (1974-1979)Harold Wilson (1974-1976)Heath was replaced by Harold Wilson, who returned on 4 March 1974 to form a minority government. Wilson was confirmed in office, with a three-seat majority, in a second election in October of the same year.(BBC (2005)) It was a manifesto pledge in the general election of February 1974 for a Labour government to re-negotiate better terms for Britain in the EEC, and then hold a referendum on whether Britain should stay in the EEC on the new terms. After the House of Commons voted in favour of retaining the Common Market on the renegotiated terms, a referendum was held on 5 June 1975. A majority were in favour of retaining the Common Market. But he was not able to end the economic crisis either. Unemployment remained well in excess of 1,000,000, inflation peaked at 24% in 1975, and the national debt was increasing.James Callaghan (1976-79)Image:James Callaghan.JPG|right|thumb|CallaghanWilson announced his surprise resignation on 16 March 1976 and unofficially endorsed his Secretary Callaghan as his successor. His popularity with all parts of the Labour movement saw him through the ballot of Labour MPs. Callaghan was the first Prime Minister to have held all three leading Cabinet positions &mdash; Chancellor of the Exchequer, Home Secretary and Foreign Secretary &mdash; prior to becoming Prime Minister. Callaghans support for and from the union movement should not be mistaken for a left wing position. Callaghan continued Wilsons policy of a balanced Cabinet and relied heavily on the man he defeated for the job of party leader &mdash; the arch-Bevanite Foot. Foot was made of the House of Commons and given the task of steering through the governments legislative programme. Callaghans time as Prime Minister was dominated by the troubles in running a Government with a minority in the House of Commons; by-election defeats had wiped out Labours three-seat majority by early 1977. Callaghan was forced to make deals with minor parties in order to survive, including the pact. He had been forced to accept referendums on devolution in Scotland and Wales (the first went in favour but did not reach the required majority, and the second went heavily against). However, by the autumn of 1978 the economy was showing signs of recovery - although unemployment now stood at 1,500,000, economic growth was strong and inflation had fallen below 10%.(biz/ed) Most opinion polls were showing Labour ahead and he was expected to call an election before the end of the year. His decision not to has been described as the biggest mistake of his premiership.Callaghans way of dealing with the long-term economic difficulties involved pay restraint which had been operating for four years with reasonable success. He gambled that a fifth year would further improve the economy and allow him to be re-elected in 1979, and so attempted to hold pay rises to 5% or less. The Trade Unions rejected continued pay restraint and in a succession of strikes over the winter of 1978/79 (known as the of Discontent) secured higher pay, although it had virtually paralysed the country, tarnished Britains political reputation and seen the Conservatives surge ahead in the opinion polls.(Moher (2008)) He was forced to call an election when the House of Commons passed a of No Confidence by one vote on 28 March 1979. The Conservatives, with advertising consultants and Saatchi, ran a campaign on the slogan Labour isnt working. As expected, Thatcher (who had succeeded Edward Heath as Conservative leader in February 1975) won the general election held on 3 May, becoming Britains first female prime minister.Conservative Government (1979-1997)Margaret Thatcher (1979-1990)Image:Margaret Thatcher.png|thumb|ThatcherFile:ARA Belgrano sinking.jpg|thumb|The Sinking of the General Belgrano during the Falklands War.Thatcher formed a government on 4 May 1979, with a mandate to reverse the UKs economic decline and to reduce the role of the state in the economy. Thatcher was incensed by one contemporary view within the Service that its job was to manage the UKs decline from the days of Empire, and wanted the country to punch above its weight in international affairs. She was a philosophic soulmate with Reagan, elected in 1980 in the States, and to a lesser extent, Mulroney, who was elected in 1984 in Canada. It seemed for a time that conservatism might be the dominant political philosophy in the major English-speaking nations for the era.In May 1980, one day before she was due to meet the Irish Taoiseach, Haughey to discuss Ireland, she announced in the House of Commons that The future of the constitutional affairs of Ireland is a matter for the people of Northern Ireland, this government, this Parliament and no-one else.In 1981, a number of Provisional IRA and National Liberation Army prisoners in Irelands Maze prison  went on hunger strike to regain the status of prisoners, which had been revoked five years earlier. After 10 men had starved themselves to death and the strike had ended political status was restored to all paramilitary prisoners. This was a major propaganda coup for the IRA and is seen as the beginning of Fins electoral rise, as they capitalised on the gains made during the hunger strikes.Thatcher continued the policy of Ulsterisation of the previous Labour government and its of State for Northern Ireland, Mason, believing that the unionists of Ulster should be at the forefront in combating republicanism. This meant relieving the burden on the mainstream army and elevating the role of the Defence Regiment and the Ulster Constabulary. In economic policy, Thatcher started out by increasing interest rates to drive down the money supply. She had a preference for indirect taxation over taxes on income, and added tax (VAT) rose sharply to 15% with the result that inflation also rose. These moves hit businesses, especially in the manufacturing sector, and unemployment - which had stood at 1,500,000 by the time of the 1979 general election - was above 2,000,000 by the end of 1980. It continued to rise throughout 1981, passing the 2,500,000 mark during the summer of that year - although inflation was now down to 12% compared to 27% two years earlier. The economy was now in recession.Her early tax policy reforms were based on the monetarist theories of Friedman rather than the economics of Arthur Laffer and Wanniski, which the government of Reagan espoused. There was a severe recession in the early 1980s, and the Governments economic policy was widely blamed. In January 1982, the inflation rate dropped to single figures and rates were then allowed to fall. Unemployment continued to rise, peaking at a figure of more than 3.2 million() (estimated by the International Labour Organization).  Despite the preference of most UK Governments to use the smaller figure of claimant count, this number itself exceeded 3,000,000 by early 1982.() The recession of the early 1980s was the deepest in Britain since the depression of the 1930s and Thatchers popularity plummeted with most predicting she would lose the next election.British defence budget cuts, applying in the Atlantic, coupled with general disregard of the Falkland Islands, the removal of the ice patrol ship Endeavour, and immigration reform detrimental to the British citizenship rights of citizens of the Empires few remnants provoked the arguably most difficult foreign policy decision of Thatchers era. In Argentina, an unstable military junta was in power and keen on reversing its huge economic unpopularity. On 2 April 1982, it invaded the Islands, the only invasion of a British territory since War II. Argentina has claimed the islands since an 1830s dispute on their settlement. Thatcher sent a naval task force to recapture the Islands. The ensuing military campaign was successful, resulting in a wave of patriotic enthusiasm for her personally, at a time when her popularity had been at an all-time low for a serving Prime Minister. Opinion polls showed a huge surge in Conservative support which would be sufficient to win a general election. This Falklands Factor, as it came to be known, is regarded as crucial to the scale of the Conservative majority in the June 1983 general election, with a fragmented Labour Party enduring its worst postwar election result, while the Alliance (created two years earlier in a pact between the Liberal Party and the new Democractic Party formed by disenchanted former Labour MPs) trailed Labour closely in terms of votes if not seats.Thatchers strong opposition against communism and the Union as well as the decisive military victory against Argentina, re-affirmed Britains influential position on the world stage and bolstered Thatchers firm leadership. In addition the economy was showing positive signs of recovery thanks mainly to substantial oil revenues from the Sea. Also despite mass unemployment, it was implied to be transitory, and alongside it new laws had given trade union members democratic powers to restrain militant union leaderships. Additionally, Thatchers Right to Buy policy, whereby housing residents were permitted to buy their homes at a discount did much to increase her governments popularity in working-class areas.The 1983 election was also influenced by events in the opposition parties. Since their 1979 defeat, Labour was increasingly dominated by its left that had emerged from the 1970s union militancy, and in opposition its policies had swung very sharply to the left whst the Conservatives had drifted further to the right. This drove a significant number of right wing Labour members and MPs to form a breakaway party in 1981, the Social Democratic Party. Labour fought the election on  unilateral nuclear disarmament, which proposed to abandon the British nuclear deterrent despite the threat from a nuclear armed Soviet Union, withdrawal from the Community, and total reversal of Thatchers economic and trade union changes. Indeed, one Labour MP, Kaufman, has called the partys 1983 manifesto the longest suicide note in history. Consequently upon the Labour split, there was a new centrist challenge, the Alliance, from the Social Democrats in electoral pact with the Liberal Party, to break the major parties dominance and win representation. The British Electoral Study found that Alliance voters were preferentially tilted towards the Conservatives http://www.unlockdemocracy.org.uk/charter88archive/pubs/voting/av_apend1.html, but this possible loss of vote share by the Conservatives was more than compensated for by the past the post electoral system, where marginal changes in vote numbers and distribution have disproportionate effects on the number of seats won.  Accordingly, despite the Alliance vote share coming very close to that of Labour and preventing an absolute majority in votes for the Conservatives, the Alliance failed to break into Parliament in significant numbers and the Conservatives were returned in a landslide.Thatcher was committed to reducing the power of the unions but, unlike the Heath government, adopted a strategy of incremental change rather than a single Act. Several unions launched strikes that were wholly or partly aimed at damaging her politically.  The most significant of these was carried out by the National Union of Mineworkers (NUM). However, Thatcher had made preparations long in advance for an NUM strike by building up coal stocks, and there were no cuts in electric power, unlike 1972. Police tactics during the strike concerned civil libertarians: stopping suspected strike sympathisers travelling towards coalfields when they were still long distances from them, phone tapping as evidenced by Labours Benn, and a violent battle with mass pickets at Orgreave, Yorkshire. But images of massed militant miners using violence to prevent other miners from working, along with the fact that (illegally under a recent Act) the NUM had not held a ballot to approve strike action, swung public opinion against the strikeespecially in the south and the moderate Nottinghamshire coalfield. The Miners Strike lasted a full year, March 1984 until March 1985, before the drift of half the miners back to work forced the NUM leadership to give in without a deal. This aborted political strike marked a turning point in UK politics: no longer could militant unions remove a democratically elected government. It also marked to beginning of a new economic and political culture in the UK based upon small government intervention in the economy and reduced dominance of the trade unions and welfare state.Under Thatcher, the Sino-British Joint Declaration over the Question of Hong Kong was concluded with the Republic of China (PRC), which scheduled to transfer the sovereignty of Kong, the only remaining British territory in Asia, to the PRC in 1997.On the early morning of 12 October 1984, Thatcher escaped death (on the day before her 59th birthday) from the bomb planted by the Irish Republican Army in Brightons Grand Hotel during the Conservative Party conference. Five people died in the attack, including Roberta Wakeham (the first wife of the governments Whip John Wakeham) and the Conservative of Parliament (MP) Anthony Berry. A prominent member of the Cabinet, Tebbit, was injured, along with his wife Margaret, who was left paralysed. Thatcher insisted that the conference open on time the next day and made her speech as planned.On 15 November 1985, Thatcher signed the Hillsborough Agreement, the first acknowledgement by a British government that the Republic of Ireland had an important role to play in Northern Ireland. The agreement was greeted with fury by Irish unionists. The Unionists and Democratic Unionists made an electoral pact and on 23 January 1986, staged an ad-hoc referendum by re-fighting their seats in by-elections, and won with one seat lost to the nationalist Democratic and Labour Party (SDLP). Then, unlike the Sunningdale Agreement in 1974, they found they could not bring the agreement down by a general strike. This was another effect of the changed balance of power in industrial relations. The agreement stood, and Thatcher punished the unionists for their non-cooperation by abolishing a devolved assembly she had created only four years before, although unionists have traditionally been of two minds about political devolution (witness the Home Rule crisis that led to the War), and the politicians most affected by the abolishment of the assembly were the constitutional nationalists, i.e., the SDLP, not it must be noted, Sinn Fin, which was not interested in a devolved assembly at that time, nor would it be for many years to come. The Anglo-Irish Agreement therefore, enraged the Unionists and alienated moderate nationalists, while doing little to reduce IRA violence. The British Governments intention may have been to solidify support from Dublin. However, the British Government had proved an unreliable ally since de Valeras time, adopting the strategy of making conciliatory gestures or minor concessions with one hand and undermining Ireland with the other.Thatchers political and economic philosophy emphasised markets and entrepreneurialism. Since gaining power, she had experimented in selling off a small nationalised company, the National Freight Company, to its workers, with a surprisingly large response. After the 1983 election, the Government became bolder and sold off most of the large utilities which had been in public ownership since the late 1940s. Many in the public took advantage of share offers, although many sold their shares immediately for a quick profit. The policy of privatisation, while anathema to many on the left, has become synonymous with Thatcherism. In the War, Mrs Thatcher supported Ronald Reagans policies of deterrence against the Soviets. This contrasted with the policy of dtente which the West had pursued during the 1970s, and caused friction with allies still wedded to the idea of dtente. US forces were permitted by Mrs. Thatcher to station nuclear missiles at British bases, arousing mass protests by the for Nuclear Disarmament. However, she later was the first Western leader to respond warmly to the rise of reformist Soviet leader Gorbachev, declaring she liked him and We can do business together after a meeting three months before he came to power in 1985. This was a start in swinging the West back to a new dtente with the Soviet Union in his era, as it proved to be an indication that the Soviet regimes power was decaying. Thatcher outlasted the Cold War, which ended in 1989, and voices who share her views on it credit her with a part in the Wests victory, by both the deterrence and dtente postures.She supported the US bombing raid on Libya from bases in the UK in 1986 when other NATO allies would not. Her liking for defence ties with the United States was demonstrated in the affair when she acted with colleagues to prevent the helicopter manufacturer Westland, a vital defence contractor, from linking with the Italian firm Agusta in favour of a link with Aircraft Corporation of the United States. Defence Secretary Heseltine, who had pushed the Agusta deal, resigned in protest at her style of leadership, and thereafter became a potential leadership challenger.In 1986, the government controversially abolished the London Council (GLC), then led by left-winger Livingstone and six Metropolitan County Councils (MCCs). The government claimed this was an efficiency measure. However, it is widely believed to have been politically motivated, as all of the abolished councils were controlled by Labour, and had become powerful centres of opposition to her government and were in favour of higher public spending by local government.By winning the 1987 general election, on the economic boom (with unemployment finally falling below 3,000,000 that spring) and against a stubbornly anti-nuclear Labour opposition (now led by Kinnock after Michael Foots resignation four years earlier), she became the longest serving Minister of the United Kingdom since Lord Liverpool (18121827), and first to win three successive elections since Lord Palmerston in 1865. Most Kingdom newspapers supported her  with the exception of Daily Mirror and Guardian  and were rewarded with regular press briefings by her press secretary, Ingham. She was known as Maggie in the tabloids, which inspired the well-known Maggie Out! protest song, sung throughout that period by some of her opponents. Her unpopularity on the left is evident from the lyrics of several contemporary popular songs: Stand Down Margaret (The Beat), Tramp the Dirt Down (Costello), Mother Knows Best (Richard Thompson), and Margaret on the Guillotine (Morrissey).Many opponents believed she and her policies created a significant North-South divide from the Channel to Wash, between the haves in the economically dynamic south and the have nots in the northern rust belt.  Hard welfare reforms in her third term created an adult Employment Training system that included full-time work done for the dole plus a 10 top-up, on the workfare model from the US. The Social Fund system that placed one-off welfare payments for emergency needs under a local budgetary limit, and where possible changed them into loans, and rules for assessing jobseeking effort by the week, were breaches of social consensus unprecedented since the 1920s.The sharp fall in unemployment continued as the end of the decade neared. By the end of 1987, it stood at just over 2,600,000 - having started the year still in excess of 3,000,000. It stood at just over 2,000,000 by the end of 1988, and by the end of 1989 less than 1,700,000 were unemployed. However, total economic growth for 1989 stood at 2% - the lowest since 1982 - signalling an end to the economic boom. Several other countries had now entered recession, and fears were now rife that Britain was also on the verge of another recession.(Biz/ed) In the late 1980s, Thatcher, a former chemist, became concerned with environmental issues, which she had previously dismissed. In 1988, she made accepting the problems of warming, depletion and rain.(Thatcher (1988)) In 1990, she opened the Centre for climate prediction and research.(Thatcher (1990))At Belgium in 1988, Thatcher made a speech in which she outlined her opposition to proposals from the Community for a federal structure and increasing centralisation of decision-making. Although she had supported British membership, Thatcher believed that the role of the EC should be limited to ensuring free trade and effective competition, and feared that new EC regulations would reverse the changes she was making in the UK. We have not successfully rolled back the frontiers of the state in Britain, only to see them re-imposed at a European level, with a new super-state exercising a new dominance from Brussels. She was specifically against Economic and Monetary Union, through which a single currency would replace national currencies, and for which the EC was making preparations. The speech caused an outcry from other European leaders, and exposed for the first time the deep split that was emerging over European policy inside her Conservative Party.Thatchers popularity once again declined in 1989 as the economy suffered from high interest rates imposed to stop an unsustainable boom. She blamed her Chancellor, Lawson, who had been following an economic policy which was a preparation for monetary union; Thatcher claimed not to have been told of this and did not approve. At the Madrid European summit, Lawson and Foreign Secretary Howe forced Thatcher to agree the circumstances under which she would join the Rate Mechanism, a preparation for monetary union. Thatcher took revenge on both by demoting Howe, and by listening more to her adviser Sir Walters on economic matters. Lawson resigned that October, feeling that Thatcher had undermined him.That November, Thatcher was challenged for the leadership of the Conservative Party by Sir Meyer. As Meyer was a virtually unknown backbench MP, he was viewed as a horse candidate for more prominent members of the party.  Thatcher easily defeated Meyers challenge, but there were 60 ballot papers either cast for Meyer or abstaining, a surprisingly large number for a sitting Prime Minister.Thatchers new system to replace local government rates was introduced in Scotland in 1989 and in England and Wales in 1990. Rates were replaced by the Community Charge (more widely known as the Tax), which applied the same amount to every individual resident, with only limited discounts for low earners. This was to be the most universally unpopular policy of her premiership, and saw the Conservative government split further behind the Labour opposition (still led by Neil Kinnock) in the opinion polls. The Charge was introduced early in Scotland as the rateable values would in any case have been reassessed in 1989. However, it led to accusations that Scotland was a testing ground for the tax. Thatcher apparently believed that the new tax would be popular, and had been persuaded by Scottish Conservatives to bring it in early and in one go. Despite her hopes, the early introduction led to a sharp decline in the already low support for the Conservative party in Scotland.Additional problems emerged when many of the tax rates set by local councils proved to be much higher than earlier predictions.  Some have argued that local councils saw the introduction of the new system of taxation as the opportunity to make significant increases in the amount taken, assuming (correctly) that it would be the originators of the new tax system and not its local operators who would be blamed.A large London demonstration against the poll tax on 31 March 1990  the day before it was introduced in England and Wales  turned into a riot. Millions of people resisted paying the tax. Opponents of the tax banded together to resist bailiffs and disrupt court hearings of poll tax debtors. Mrs Thatcher refused to compromise, or change the tax, and its unpopularity was a major factor in Thatchers downfall.By the autumn of 1990, opposition to Thatchers policies on local government taxation, her Governments perceived mishandling of the economy (especially high interest rates of 15%, which were undermining her core voting base within the home-owning, entrepreneurial and business sectors), and the divisions opening within her party over the appropriate handling of integration made her and her party seem increasingly politically vulnerable.John Major (1990-1997)Image:John Major 1996.jpg|thumb|140px|MajorIn November 1990, Heseltine challenged Margaret Thatcher for leadership of the Conservative Party. Thatcher failed to gain enough votes for a majority in the first round and thus withdrew from the second round on 22 November, ending her 11 year premiership. Chancellor of the Exchequer Major contested the second round and defeated Michael Heseltine as well as Foreign Scretary Hurd, becoming prime minister on 27 November 1990.By this stage, however, Britain had slid into recession for the third time in less than 20 years. Unemployment had started to rise in the spring of 1990 but by the end of the year it was still lower than in many other European economies, particularly France and Italy.(Biz/ed)John Major was Prime Minister during British involvement in the War and he and his cabinet survived an assassination attempt by the IRA in 1991. The change of prime minister from Margaret Thatcher to John Major saw a turnaround in Conservative fortunes in the opinion polls, with the Conservatives managing to top many opinion polls over the next 17 months as a general election loomed. This was despite the recession deepening throughout 1991 and into 1992, with the economy for 1991 detracted by 2% and unemployment passing the 2,000,000 mark.(Biz/ed)Major called a general election for April 1992 and took his campaign onto the streets, famously delivering many addresses from an upturned soapbox as in his Lambeth days. This populist common touch, in contrast to the Labour Partys more slick campaign, chimed with the electorate and Major won an unexpected second period in office, albeit with a small parliamentary majority. The Conservative election win was something of a surprise to the pollsters, who had predicted a hung parliament or a narrow Labour win.(BBC News (2005))The narrow majority for the Conservative government proved to be unmanageable, particularly after the United Kingdoms forced exit from the Rate Mechanism on Wednesday (16 September 1992) just five months into the new parliament. From this stage onwards, Labour - now led by Smith - was ascendant in the opinion polls.(BBC News (2005))Major allowed his economic team to stay in place unchanged for seven months after Black Wednesday before forcing the resignation of his Chancellor, Norman Lamont, who he replaced with Clarke. This delay was indicative of one of his weaknesses, an indecisiveness towards personnel issues that was to undermine his authority through the rest of his premiership.At the 1993 Conservative Party Conference, Major began the Back to Basics campaign, which he intended to be about the economy, education, policing, and other such issues, but it was interpreted by many (including Conservative cabinet ministers) as an attempt to revert to the moral and family values that the Conservative Party were often associated with. A number of sleaze scandals involving Conservative MPs were exposed in lurid and embarrassing detail in tabloid newspapers following this and further reduced the Conservatives popularity. Despite Majors best efforts, the Conservative Party collapsed into political infighting. Major took a moderate approach but found himself undermined by the right-wing within the party and the Cabinet. In particular, his policy towards the Union aroused opposition as the Government attempted to ratify the Treaty. Although the Labour opposition supported the treaty, they were prepared to undertake tactical moves to weaken the government, which included passing an amendment that required a vote on the social chapter aspects of the treaty before it could be ratified. Several Conservative MPs (the Rebels) voted against the Government and the vote was lost. Major hit back by calling another vote on the following day (23 July 1993), which he declared a of confidence. He won by 40 but had damaged his authority. One of the few bright spots of 1993 for the Conservative government came in April when the end of the recession was finally declared after nearly three years.(BBC (2005)) Unemployment had touched 3,000,000 by the turn of the year, but had dipped to 2,800,000 by Christmas as the economic recovery continued.(Biz/ed) The economic recovery was strong and sustained throughout 1994, with unemployment falling below 2,500,000 by the end of the year.(Biz/ed) However, Labour remained ascendant in the opinion polls and their popularity further increased with the election of Blair - who redesignated the party as Labour - as leader following the sudden death of John Smith on 12 May 1994.() Labour remained ascendant in the polls throughout 1995, despite the Conservative government overseeing the continuing economic recovery and fall in unemployment.() It was a similar story throughout 1996, despite the economy still being strong and unemployment back below 2,000,000 for the first time since early 1991.()Few were surprised when Major lost the 1997 general election to Blair, though the immense scale of the defeat was not widely predicted. In the new parliament Labour won 418 seats, the Conservatives 165, and the Liberal Democrats 46, leaving the Labour party with a majority of 179 which was the biggest majority since 1931. In addition, the Conservatives lost all their seats in Scotland and Wales and several cabinet ministers including Norman Lamont, Portillo, Rifkind and Lang lost their seats. Major carried on as Leader of the Opposition until Hague was elected to lead the Conservative Party the month after the election.Labour Government (1997-2010)Tony Blair (1997-2007)Image:Tony Blair.jpg|thumb|Blairthumb|Tony Blair addresses Armagh in 1998.Sond Chara 02.jpg|thumb|British troops in the Afghan War.Tony Blair became Prime Minister in 1997 after a landslide victory over the Conservative Party. Under the title of Labour, he promised economic and social reform and brought Labour closer to the center of the political spectrum. Early policies of the Blair government included the wage and university fees. of the Exchequer Brown also gave the of England the power to set the base rate of interest autonomously. The traditional tendency of governments to manipulate interest rates around the time of General Elections for political gain is thought to have been deleterious to the UK economy and helped reinforce a cyclical pattern of and bust. Browns decision was popular with the City, which the Labour Party had been courting since the early 1990s. Blair presided over the longest period of economic expansion in Britain since the 19th century and his premiership saw large investment into social aspects in particular health and education, areas particularly under-invested during the Conservative government of the 1980s and early 1990s. The Human Rights Act was introduced in 1998 and the Freedom of Information Act came into force in 2000. Most hereditary peers were removed from the of Lords in 1999 and the Civil Partnership Act of 2005 allowed homosexual couples the right to register their partnership with the same rights and responsibilities comparable to heterosexual marriage.From the beginning, New Labours record on the economy and unemployment was strong, suggesting that they could break with the trend of Labour governments overseeing an economic decline while in power. They had inherited an unemployment count of 1,700,000 from the Conservatives, and by the following year unemployment was down to 1,300,000 - a level not seen since Callaghan was in power some 20 years previously. A minimum wage was announced in May 1998, coming into force from April 1999.() Unemployment would remain simlarly low for the next 10 years.()The long-running Ireland peace process was brought to a conclusion in 1998 with the Agreement which established a devolved Ireland Assembly and de-escalated the violence associated with Troubles. It was signed in April 1998 by the British and Irish governments and was endorsed by all the main political parties in Northern Ireland with the exception of Paisleys Unionist Party. Voters in Northern Ireland approved the agreement in a referendum in May 1998 and it came into force in December 1999. In August 1998, a car-bomb exploded in the Northern Ireland town of Omagh, killing 29 people and injuring 220. The attack was carried out by the Irish Republican Army who opposed the Belfast Agreement. It was reported in 2005, that the IRA had renounced violence and had ditched its entire arsenal.In foreign policy, following the 11th attacks in the United States, Blair greatly supported President W. Bushs new on Terror which began with the forced withdrawal of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan. Blairs case for war was based on Iraqs alleged possession of weapons of mass destruction and consequent violation of UN resolutions. He was wary of making direct appeals for regime change, since international law does not recognise this as a ground for war. A memorandum from a July 2002 meeting that was leaked in April 2005 showed that Blair believed that the British public would support regime change in the right political context; the document, however, stated that legal grounds for such action were weak. On 24 September 2002 the Government published a dossier based on the intelligence agencies assessments of Iraqs weapons of mass destruction. Among the items in the dossier was a recently received intelligence report that the Iraqi military are able to deploy chemical or biological weapons within 45 minutes of an order to do so. A further briefing paper on Iraqs alleged WMDs was issued to journalists in February 2003. This document was discovered to have taken a large part of its text without attribution from a PhD thesis available on the internet. Where the thesis hypothesised about possible WMDs, the Downing Street version presented the ideas as fact. The document subsequently became known as the Dodgy Dossier.Forty-six thousand British troops, one-third of the total strength of the Army (land forces), were deployed to assist with the invasion of Iraq. When after the war, no WMDs were found in Iraq, the two dossiers, together with Blairs other pre-war statements, became an issue of considerable controversy. Many Labour Party members, including a number who had supported the war, were among the critics. Successive independent inquiries (including those by the Foreign Affairs Select Committee of the House of Commons, the senior judge Lord Hutton, and the former senior civil servant Lord Butler of Brockwell) have found that Blair honestly stated what he believed to be true at the time, though Lord Butlers report did imply that the Governments presentation of the intelligence evidence had been subject to some degree of exaggeration. These findings have not prevented frequent accusations that Blair was deliberately deceitful, and, during the 2005 election campaign, Conservative leader Howard made political capital out of the issue. The new threat of international terrorism ultimately led to the 2005 July 7th bomb attacks in London which killed 52 people as well as the four suicide bombers who led the attack.The Labour government was re-elected with a second successive landslide in the general election of June 2001.() Blair became the first Labour leader to lead the party to three successive election victories when they won the 2005 general election, though this time he had a drastically reduced majority.()The Conservatives had so far failed to represent a serious challenge to Labours rule, with John Majors successor William Hague unable to make any real improvement upon the disastrous 1997 general election result at the next election four years later. He stepped down after the 2001 election to be succeeded by Duncan Smith, who did not even hold the leadership long enough to contest a general election - being ousted by his own MPs in October 2003() and being replaced by Howard, who had served as Secretary in the government of John Major. Howard failed to win the 2005 general election for the Conservatives but he at least had the satisfaction of narrowing the Labour majority, giving his successor (he announced his resignation shortly after the election) a decent platform to build upon.() However, the Conservatives began to re-emerge as an electable prospect following the election of Cameron as Howards successor in December 2005. Within months of Cameron becoming Conservative leader, opinion polls during 2006 were showing a regular Conservative lead for the first time since Black Wednesday 14 years earlier. Despite the economy still being strong and unemployment remaining low, Labours decline in support was largely blamed upon poor control of immigration and allowing Britain to become what was seen by many as an easy target for terrorists.()Devolution for Scotland and WalesBlair also came into power with a policy of devolution. A pre-legislative referendum was held in Scotland in 1997 with two questions:  whether to create a devolved Parliament for Scotland and whether it should have limited tax-varying powers. Following a clear yes vote on both questions, a referendum on the proposal for creating a devolved Assembly was held two weeks later. This produced a narrow yes vote. Both measures were put into effect and the Scottish Parliament and Welsh Assembly began operating in 1999. The first election to the Scottish parliament saw the creation of a Labour-Liberal Democrat coalition with Dewar as First Minister. In Wales, the Labour Party achieved a complete majority with Michael as the Welsh First Minister. In the 2007 Scottish Election, the National Party gained enough seats to form a minority government with its leader Salmond as First Minister.Devolution also returned to Northern Ireland, leaving England as the only country of the United Kingdom without a devolved administration. Within England, a devolved authority for London was re-established following a yes vote in a London-wide referendum.Gordon Brown (2007-2010)Image:GordonBrown1234 cropped .jpg|thumb|150px|BrownTony Blair tendered his resignation as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom to the Queen on 27 June 2007, his successor Brown assuming office the same afternoon. Gordon Brown took over as Prime Minister without having to face either a General Election or even a contested election for leadership of the Labour Party. Browns style of government differed from that of his predecessor, Tony Blair, who had been seen as presidential. Brown rescinded some of the policies which had either been introduced or were planned by Blairs administration. He remained committed to close ties with the United States and to the Iraq war, although he established an inquiry into the reasons why Britain had participated in the conflict. He proposed a government of all the talents which would involve co-opting leading personalities from industry and other professional walks of life into government positions. Brown also appointed Smith as the UKs first female Home Secretary, while Browns old position as Chancellor was taken over by Darling.His appointment as prime minister sparked a brief surge in Labour support as the party topped most opinion polls that autumn. There was talk of a snap general election, which it was widely believed Labour could win, but Brown decided against calling an election.()Browns government introduced a number of fiscal policies to help keep the British economy afloat during the financial crisis which occurred throughout the latter part of the 2000s and early 2010, although the United Kingdom saw a dramatic increase in its national debt. Unemployment soared through 2008 as the recession set in, and Labour standings in the opinion polls plummeted as the Conservatives became ascendant.()Several major banks were nationalised after falling into financial difficulties, while large amounts of money were pumped into the economy to encourage spending. Brown was also press ganged into giving Gurkhas settlement rights in Britain by the actress and campaigner Lumley and attracted criticism for its handling of the release of Abdelbaset Al Megrahi, the only person to have been convicted over the 1988 Lockerbie bombing.Initially, during the first four months of his premiership, Brown enjoyed a good lead in the polls. His popularity amongst the public may be due to his handling of numerous serious events during his first few weeks as Prime Minister, including two attempted terrorist attacks in London and Glasgow at the end of June. However, between the end of 2007 and September 2008, his popularity had fallen significantly, with two contributing factors believed to be his perceived change of mind over plans to call a snap general election in October 2007, and his handling of the 10p tax rate cut in 2008, which led to allegations of weakness and dithering. His unpopularity lead eight labour MPs to call for a leadership contest in September 2008, less than 15 months into his premiership. The threat of a leadership contest receded due to his perceived strong handling of the global financial crisis in October, but his popularity hit an all time low, and his position became increasingly under threat after the May 2009 expenses scandal and Labours poor results in the 2009 Local and European elections. Browns cabinet began to rebel with several key resignations in the run up to local elections in June 2009. In January 2010, it was revealed that Britains economy had resumed growth after a recession which had seen a record six successive quarters of economic detraction. However, it was a narrow return to growth, and it came after all of the other economies had come out of recession.()The 2010 General Election resulted in a parliament - Britains first for 36 years - with the Conservative Party controlling 306 Seats, the Labour Party 258 Seats and the Liberal Democrats 57 Seats. Brown remained as prime minister while the Democrats negotiated with Labour and the Conservatives to form a coalition government. He announced his intention to resign on 10 May 2010 in order to help broker a Labour-Liberal Democrat deal. However, this became increasingly unlikely, and on 11 May Brown announced his resignation as Prime Minister and as Leader of the Labour Party. This paved the way for the Conservatives to return to power after 13 years.()His deputy Harman became Leader of the Opposition until September 2010, when Miliband was elected Leader of the Labour Party.Coalition Government (2010-Present)David Cameron (2010-Present)The Conservative Party won the 2010 General Election but did not win enough seats to win an outright majority. Cameron, who has led the party since 2005 became Prime Minister on May 11, 2010 after the Conservatives formed a government with the Liberal Democrats. Clegg, leader of the Democrats was appointed Deputy Prime Minister and several other Liberal Democrats were given cabinet positions. Cameron promised to reduce Britains spiralling budget deficit by cutting back on public service spending and by transferring more power to local authorities. He committed his government to Britains continuing role in Afghanistan and stated that he hopes to remove British troops from the region by 2015. An emergency budget was prepared in June 2010 by Chancellor of the Exchequer Osborne which stated that VAT will be risen to 20% and there will be a large reduction in public spending. A key Liberal Democrat policy is that of voting reform, to which a referendum took place in May 2011 on whether or not Britain should adopt a system of Alternative Vote to elect MPs to Westminster. However, the proposal was rejected overwhelmingly, with 67.9% of voters in favour of retaining first-past-the-post.See also* of British society#Late 20th century* War II economic expansionFootnotesBibliography*************************Image of Margaret Thatcher provided by the Margaret Thatcher Foundation
5162898
Dynamic_network_analysis
Dynamic network analysis (DNA) is an emergent scientific field that brings together traditional network analysis (SNA), analysis (LA) and systems (MAS) within science and theory. There are two aspects of this field. The first is the analysis of DNA data. The second is the utilization of simulation to address issues of network dynamics.  DNA networks vary from traditional social networks in that they are larger, dynamic, multi-mode, multi-plex networks, and may contain varying levels of uncertainty. The main difference of DNA to SNA is DNA taken the domain of time into account. One of the most notable and earliest case of the use of DNA is in Sampsons monastery study, where he took snapshots of the same network from different intervals and observed and analyzed the evolution of the network.(Identity and control: a structural theory of social action By Harrison C. White) DNA statistical tools are generally optimized for large-scale networks and admit the analysis of multiple networks simultaneously in which, there are multiple types of nodes (multi-node) and multiple types of links (multi-plex). In contrast, SNA statistical tools focus on single or at most two mode data and facilitate the analysis of only one type of link at a time.DNA statistical tools tend to provide more measures to the user, because they have measures that use data drawn from multiple networks simultaneously. From a computer simulation perspective, nodes in DNA are like atoms in quantum theory, nodes can be, though need not be, treated as probabilistic.  Whereas nodes in a traditional SNA model are static, nodes in a DNA model have the ability to learn.  Properties change over time; nodes can adapt: A companys employees can learn new skills and increase their value to the network; Or, capture one terrorist and three more are forced to improvise. Change propagates from one node to the next and so on.  DNA adds the element of a networks evolution and considers the circumstances under which change is likely to occur.right|340px|thumb|An example of a multi-entity, multi-network, dynamic network diagramIllustrative problems that people in the DNA area work on* Developing metrics and statistics to assess and identify change within and across networks.* Developing and validating simulations to study network change, evolution, adaptation, decay. See simulation and organizational studies* Developing and testing theory of network change, evolution, adaptation, decay* Developing and validating formal models of network generation and evolution* Developing techniques to visualize network change overall or at the node or group level* Developing statistical techniques to see whether differences observed over time in networks are due to simply different samples from a distribution of links and nodes or changes over time in the underlying distribution of links and nodes* Developing control processes for networks over time* Developing algorithms to change distributions of links in networks over time* Developing algorithms to track groups in networks over time* Developing tools to extract or locate networks from various data sources such as texts* Developing statistically valid measurements on networks over time* Examining the robustness of network metrics under various types of missing data* Empirical studies of multi-mode multi-link multi-time period networks* Examining networks as probabilistic time-variant phenomena* Forecasting change in existing networks* Identifying trails through time given a sequence of networks* Identifying changes in node criticality given a sequence of networks anything else related to multi-mode multi-link multi-time period networksCarley, of Mellon University, is a leading authority in this field. Further reading *Kathleen M. Carley, 2003, Dynamic Network Analysis in Dynamic Social Network Modeling and Analysis: Workshop Summary and Papers, Ronald Breiger, Kathleen Carley, and Philippa Pattison, (Eds.) Committee on Human Factors, National Research Council, National Research Council. Pp. 133145, Washington, DC.*Kathleen M. Carley, 2002, Smart Agents and Organizations of the Future  The Handbook of New Media. Edited by Leah Lievrouw and Sonia Livingstone, Ch. 12, pp. 206220, Thousand Oaks, CA, Sage.*Kathleen M. Carley, Jana Diesner, Jeffrey Reminga, Maksim Tsvetovat, 2008, Toward an Interoperable Dynamic Network Analysis Toolkit, DSS Special Issue on Cyberinfrastructure for Homeland Security: Advances in Information Sharing, Data Mining, and Collaboration Systems. Decision Support Systems 43(4):1324-1347 (article 20)*Terrill L. Frantz, Kathleen M. Carley. 2009, Toward A Confidence Estimate For The Most-Central-Actor Finding. Academy of Management Annual Conference, Chicago, IL, USA, 711 August. (Awarded the Sage Publications/RM Division Best Student Paper Award) See also * dynamics* dynamical system* Carley* Keyhubs* science* INSNAReferences External links * Radcliffe Exploratory Seminar on Dynamic Networks* Center for Computational Analysis of Social and Organizational Systems (CASOS)
5168923
Render_unto_Caesar...
Image:JesusPharisees.jpg|right|thumb|220px|The Tribute Money by DoreRender unto Caesar is the beginning of a phrase attributed to Jesus in the gospels, which reads in full, Render unto Caesar the things which are Caesars, and unto God the things that are Gods (          ) (Matthew 22:21).This phrase has become a widely quoted summary of the relationship between Christianity and secular authority.  The original message, coming in response to a question of whether it was lawful for Jews to pay taxes to Caesar, gives rise to multiple possible interpretations about under what circumstances it is desirable for the Christian to submit to earthly authority.ContextThe Bible states that hostile questioners tried to trap Jesus into taking an explicit and dangerous stand on whether Jews should or should not pay taxes to the Roman occupation.  They anticipated that Jesus would oppose the tax, for Lukes Gospels explains their purpose was to hand him over to the power and authority of the governor.(http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?searchLuke%2020:20;&version31) The governor was Pilate, and he was the man responsible for the collecting of Romes taxes in Judea. At first the questioners flattered Jesus by praising his integrity, impartiality, and devotion to truth.  Then they asked him whether or not it is right for Jews to pay the taxes demanded by Caesar. In the of Mark, the additional, truly provocative question is asked, Should we pay or shouldnt we? (http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?searchmark%2012&versionNIV) Jesus first called them hypocrites, and then asked one of them to produce a Roman coin that would be suitable for paying Caesars tax.  One of them showed him a Roman coin, and he asked them whose name and inscription were on it.  They answered, Caesars, and he responded Give to Caesar what is Caesars, and give to God what is Gods.  His interrogators were flummoxed by this authoritative (though ambiguous) answer and left disappointed.The Pharisees and the HerodiansThe accounts in Matthew and Mark say that the questioners were Pharisees and Herodians (Luke says only that they were spies sent by teachers of the law and the chief priests).The coinImage:005 Tiberius.jpg|200px|right|thumb|A denarius featuring Tiberius.The inscription on a denarius of the period reads Tiberivs Caesar Divi Avgvsti Filivs Avgvstvs (Caesar Augustus Tiberius, son of the Divine Augustus), claiming that Augustus was a god.However, it has been suggested that denarii were not in common circulation in Judaea during Jesus lifetime and that the coin may have instead been an Antiochan tetradrachm bearing the head of Tiberius (with Augustus on the reverse).()Tax resistance in JudaeaThe taxes imposed on Judaea by Rome had led to riots.(Marshall, I.H. Gospel of Luke: A Commentary on the Greek Text p. 735; Gross, David (ed.) We Wont Pay!: A Tax Resistance Reader ISBN 1434898253 pp. 1-7)  New Testament scholar Willard Swartley writes:The tax denoted in the text was a specific tax It was a tax, a tax instituted in A.D. 6. A census taken at that time (cf. Lk. 2:2) to determine the resources of the Jews provoked the wrath of the country.  of Galilee led a revolt (Acts 5:37), which was suppressed only with some difficulty.  Many scholars date the origin of the Zealot party and movement to this incident.(Swartley, Willard M. The Christian and the Payment of Taxes Used For War 1980 http://peace.mennolink.org/articles/wartaxes.html)The Encyclopedia says, of the Zealots:When, in the year 5, of Gamala in Galilee started his organized opposition to Rome, he was joined by one of the leaders of the Pharisees, R. Zadok, a disciple of Shammai and one of the fiery patriots and popular heroes who lived to witness the tragic end of Jerusalem. The taking of the census by Quirinus, the Roman procurator, for the purpose of taxation was regarded as a sign of Roman enslavement; and the Zealots call for stubborn resistance to the oppressor was responded to enthusiastically.Accusations of tax resistance against JesusAt his trial before Pontius Pilate, Jesus was accused of promoting resistance to Caesars tax. (http://www.jesus-on-taxes.com/Page_7.html)Then the whole assembly rose and led him off to Pilate. And they began to accuse him, saying, We have found this man subverting our nation. He opposes payment of taxes to Caesar and claims to be Christ/Messiah, a king. ()One of the theses of an essay by Ned Netterville entitled, Jesus of Nazareth, Illegal-Tax Protester, is that the principal reason why Pilate crucifed Jesus was his opposition to Romes taxes.(Netterville, Ned, Jesus of Nazareth, Illegal-Tax Protester, Ulster Press, http://www.jesus-on-taxes.com/Page_7.html) Evidence of Jesus guilt could have been presented showing he had interfered with Romes collection of taxes by calling Matthew (a.k.a. Levi) away from his tax booth in the midst of his duties ().  Pilate may have known or could have been told that Jesus had induced one of his chief tax collectors, Zacchaeus, to repent and resign his leading position in a Roman territory where Pilate was personally responsible for tax collections (). Evidence could have been introduced showing that Jesus spoke disparagingly of tax collectors on several occasions (, ), even equating tax collectors with prostitutes ().  Jesus was known to enjoy the company of tax collectors, for instance at dinners in the homes of Matthew and Zacchaeus, so he may have influenced others to quit their profession to follow him.  Jesus showed compassion for tax collectors as he did to other vilified groups, such as prostitutes.InterpretationsFile:Tizian 014.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Tribute Money by Titian depicts Jesus being shown the penny.The gospels say that when Jesus gave his response, his interrogators marvelled, and left him, and went their way.  They were unsuccessful in getting Jesus to unambiguously come out either in favor of paying the tribute to Rome or in favor of resistance.  Advocates for either argument could interpret his words in either way.Time has not resolved this ambiguity, and people continue to interpret this passage to support positions that are poles apart.False dichotomy, adroit avoidance of trapJesus was asked the question about paying taxes in hope that he would answer yes or no.  Answering yes would have left him open to the accusation that he was in opposition to Jewish resistance to the Roman occupation and therefore (given the assumption by the Jews that they still held privileged nation status with God at this time) against God too.  Answering no would have given those present an opportunity to report him to the Roman authorities as someone who was trying to incite a revolt.  His questioners had assumed that there was an inevitable (and hazardous) dichotomy between discharging ones obligations to the state and discharging ones obligations to God, but Jesus refused to confront the dichotomy as framed by his hostile questioners and instead pointed to the assumptions behind it.Some people consider this parable as not primarily instructional but as an example of Jesuss skill in thinking on his feet.(Brown, John The law of Christ respecting civil obedience, especially in the payment of tribute (London: William Ball, 1839) 3rd. ed, p. 182 Some interpreters have supposed that these words of our Lord were not intended to be a reply to the question at all, and that they arc indeed, what is ordinarily called, a dexterous go-by  an evasion of a question which it is felt not to be wise or safe to answer.)  His questioners tried to trap him between the horns of a dangerous either/or question, and he deftly gave an answer that seemed to meet the question head-on but actually avoided taking a position.In another incident (Matthew 21:23-27, Luke 20:1-8, Mark 11:27-33), Jesus reverses the roles  putting his critics between the horns of a dilemma when he asks Johns baptism  was it from heaven, or from men?:They discussed it among themselves and said, If we say, From heaven, he will ask, Why didnt you believe him? But if we say, From men, all the people will stone us, because they are persuaded that John was a prophet. So they answered, We dont know where it was from.At this non-committal answer, Jesus takes the opportunity to refuse to answer his interrogators question.Separation of church and stateJesus responds to Pilate about the nature of his kingdom: My kingdom is not of this world. If my kingdom were of this world, my servants would have been fighting, that I might not be delivered over to the Jews. But now (or as it is) my kingdom is not from the world (John 18:36);  i.e., his religious teachings were separate from earthly political activity. This reflects a traditional division in Christian thought by which state and church have separate spheres of influence.Justification for obeying authority, paying taxesSome read the phrase Render unto Caesar that which is Caesars as unambiguous at least to the extent that it commands people to respect state authority and to pay the taxes it demands of them.  the Apostle also states in Romans 13 that Christians are obliged to obey all earthly authorities, stating that as they were introduced by God, disobedience to them equates to disobedience to God.In this interpretation, Jesus asked his interrogators to produce a coin in order to demonstrate to them that by using his coinage they had already admitted the de facto rule of the emperor, and that therefore they should submit to that rule.(Brown, John The law of Christ respecting civil obedience, especially in the payment of tribute (London: William Ball, 1839) 3rd. ed, p. 183 It is as if our Lord had said, The common circulation of Caesars coin among you, shows that you stand in a certain relation to him as your ruler. Perform all the duties which are due to him in that relation)For example, one Mennonite explained why he was not a war tax resister this way:We are against war and do not wish to aid the war effort by conscription or by paying war taxes to the government. Doing so only helps to strengthen and perpetuate the war machine. Matthew 22:21 Jesus said Render to Caesar the things that are Caesars; and to God the things that are Gods. Romans 13:1 Let every person be in subjection to the governing authorities. For there is no authority except from God and those which exist are established by God. If the law of the land is that everyone must pay war taxes then that is what we must do. It is the law! We should however, work and pray extremely hard to change the law. The ideal situation would be to have the law abolished. The alternative would be to have a choice of designating our portion of the war tax towards efforts of peacemaking. This route would be a more lawful, constructive and positive effort.(Sawatzky, Anne, quoted in Peachey, Titus Silence and Courage: Income Taxes, War and Mennonites 1940-1993 MCC Occasional Paper #18, August 1993, p. 34)Giving God the benefit of the doubtMennonite pastor K. Stoner spoke for those who interpret the parable as permitting or even encouraging resistance: We are war tax resisters because we have discovered some doubt as to what belongs to Caesar and what belongs to God, and have decided to give the benefit of the doubt to God.(Taxpayers who fail to file federal income tax returns: hearing before the Subcommittee on Oversight of the Committee on Ways and Means, House of Representatives, One Hundred Third Congress, first session, October 26, 1993, Volume 4. p. 154)Devote your life to GodTertullian, in De Idololatria, interprets Jesus as saying to render the image of Caesar, which is on the coin, to Caesar, and the image of God, which is on man, to God; so as to render to Caesar indeed money, to God yourself. Otherwise, what will be Gods, if all things are Caesars?(from The Writings of Tertullian. vol. I, ed. by Alexander Roberts and James Donaldson (Edinburgh: T.&T. Clark, 1869) p. 164. http://books.google.com/books?id0OIYAAAAYAAJ&lpgPA164&otsc4GQ78oVfN&dqtertullian%20the%20image%20of%20Caesar%2C%20which%20is%20on%20the%20coin%2C%20to%20Caesar%2C%20and%20the%20image%20of%20God%2C%20which%20is%20on%20man%2C%20to%20God&pgPA164#vonepage&q&ffalse)Tolstoy wrote: Not only the complete misunderstanding of Christs teaching, but also a complete unwillingness to understand it could have admitted that striking misinterpretation, according to which the words, To Csar the things which are Csars, signify the necessity of obeying Csar. In the first place, there is no mention there of obedience; in the second place, if Christ recognized the obligatoriness of paying tribute, and so of obedience, He would have said directly, Yes, it should be paid; but He says, Give to Csar what is his, that is, the money, and give your life to God, and with these latter words He not only does not encourage any obedience to power, but, on the contrary, points out that in everything which belongs to God it is not right to obey Csar.(from Tolstoys Drzhzhins Life And Death, as found in We Wont Pay!: A Tax Resistance Reader (2008) ISBN 1434898253, p. 223)Highlighting the dangers of cooperating with the stateSome see the parable as being Jesuss warning to people that if they collaborate too closely with state, as distinct from Gods, authority (for instance, by using its legal tender), they become beholden to it. David Thoreau writes in Civil Disobedience:Christ answered the Herodians according to their condition.  Show me the tribute-money, said he;  and one took a penny out of his pocket;  If you use money which has the image of Caesar on it, and which he has made current and valuable, that is, if you are men of the State, and gladly enjoy the advantages of Caesars government, then pay him back some of his own when he demands it;  Render therefore to Caesar that which is Caesars and to God those things which are Gods  leaving them no wiser than before as to which was which; for they did not wish to know.Mennonite Dale Glass-Hess wrote:It is inconceivable to me that Jesus would teach that some spheres of human activity lie outside the authority of God. Are we to heed Caesar when he says to go to war or support war-making when Jesus says in other places that we shall not kill? No! My perception of this incident is that Jesus does not answer the question about the morality of paying taxes to Caesar, but that he throws it back on the people to decide. When the Jews produce a denarius at Jesus request, they demonstrate that they are already doing business with Caesar on Caesars terms. I read Jesus statement, Give to Caesar as meaning Have you incurred a debt in regard to Caesar! Then you better pay it off. The Jews had already compromised themselves. Likewise for us: we may refuse to serve Caesar as soldiers and even try to resist paying for Caesars army. But the fact is that by our lifestyles weve run up a debt with Caesar, who has felt constrained to defend the interests that support our lifestyles. Now he wants paid back, and its a little late to say that we dont owe anything. Weve already compromised ourselves. If were going to play Caesars games, then we should expect to have to pay for the pleasure of their enjoyment. But if we are determined to avoid those games, then we should be able to avoid paying for them.(in Peachey, Titus Silence and Courage: Income Taxes, War and Mennonites 1940-1993 MCC Occasional Paper #18, August 1993, p. 29)K. Gandhi shared this perspective.  He wrote:Jesus evaded the direct question put to him because it was a trap. He was in no way bound to answer it. He therefore asked to see the coin for taxes. And then said with withering scorn, How can you who traffic in Caesars coins and thus receive what to you are benefits of Caesars rule refuse to pay taxes? Jesuss whole preaching and practice point unmistakably to noncooperation, which necessarily includes nonpayment of taxes.(originally from Young India 27 March 1930, as found in Gross, David (ed.) We Wont Pay!: A Tax Resistance Reader (2008) ISBN 1434898253)It has often been a scriptural source for Christian support for government.Money is not for the peoples benefitJim Whitescarver, arguing for an extreme form of reform, considers that the current monetary system is corrupt and is designed only to benefit the few rich and powerful by enslaving the common man,(http://sites.google.com/a/monetaryreformact.org/monetary-reform-act/being-free) and considers the Render unto Caesar... phrase to suggest that we ought happily use any money that belongs to the people, and render to the money changers all their money that has no value.American Quaker war tax resistersAs American Quaker war tax resistance developed during the 17th through 19th centuries, the resisters had to find a way to reconcile their tax resistance with the Render unto Caesar verse and other verses from the New Testament that encourage submission to the government.  Here are a few examples:Around 1715, a pseudonymous author, Philalethes, published a pamphlet entitled Tribute to Csar, How paid by the Best Christians... in which he argued that while Christians must pay general taxes, a tax that is explicitly for war purposes is the equivalent to an offering on an altar to a pagan god, and this is forbidden.(Philalethes (pseud.) Tribute to Csar, How paid by the Best Christians, And to what Purpose; With Some Remarks on the late vigorous Expedition against Canada. Of Civil Government, How Inconsistent it is with the Government of Christ in his Church. Compared with the Ancient Just and Righteous Principles of the Quakers, and their Modern Practice and Doctrine. With some Notes upon the Discipline of their Church in this Province, especially at Philadelphia (1715?) as found in Gross, David M. (ed.) American Quaker War Tax Resistance (2008) ISBN 9781438260150 pp. 23-42)In 1761, Joshua Evans put it this way:Others would term it stubbornness in me, or contrary to the doctrine of Christ, concerning rendering to Caesar his due. But as I endeavored to keep my mind in a state of humble quietude, I was favored to see through such groundless arguments; there being nothing on the subject of war, or favorable to it, to be found in that text. Although I have been willing to pay my money for the use of civil government, when legally called for; yet have I felt restrained by a conscientious motive, from paying towards the expense of killing men, women and children, or laying towns and countries waste.(Evans, Joshua A Drop in the Ocean as found in Gross, David M. (ed.) American Quaker War Tax Resistance (2008) ISBN 9781438260150 pp. 90-91)In 1780, Sameul Allinson circulated a letter on the subject of tax resistance, in which he insisted that what was due to Caesar was only what Caesar would not use for antichristian purposes:the question put to our Savior on the point was with evil intention to ensnare and render him culpable to one of the great parties or sects then existing, who differed about the payment of taxes, his answer, though conclusive, was so wisely framed that it left them still in doubt, what things belonged to Csar and what to God, thus he avoided giving either of them offence which he must inevitably have done by a determination that tribute indefinitely was due to Csar. Our first and principle obedience is due to the Almighty, even in contradiction to man, We ought to obey God rather than men (Acts 5:29). Hence, if tribute is demanded for a use that is antichristian, it seems right for every Christian to deny it, for Csar can have no title to that which opposes the Lords command.(Allinson, Samuel Reasons against War, and paying Taxes for its support (1780) as found in Gross, David M. (ed.) American Quaker War Tax Resistance (2008) ISBN 9781438260150 pp. 154-171)In 1862, Joshua Maule wrote that he felt that the Render unto Caesar instruction was compatible with war tax resistance, as there was no reason to believe for certain that the tax referred to in that episode had any connection to war:The words of Christ, Render to Csar the things that are Csars, and to God the things that are Gods, have often been brought forward as evidence that He approved of paying all taxes; it being said, in connection, that Csar was then engaged in war. The distinction, however, is sufficiently clear: the things that were Csars were, doubtless, those which appertain to the civil government; the things which belong to God are, surely, a clear and full obedience to His commands and to His laws. We know that all the precepts and commands of Christ which can be applied in reference to this subject are of one tendency, enjoining peace on earth and good-will to men. We do not know, after all, however, what was the exact nature and use of the tribute collected in those days, nor what were the situation and circumstances in which Christians or others were then placed in regard to such things.(Maule, Joshua He Could Not Have the Money for ThatPurpose (~1862) as found in Gross, David M. (ed.) American Quaker War Tax Resistance (2008) ISBN 9781438260150 pp. 369-378)Christian anarchist tax resistersHennacy was on trial for disobedience and was asked by the judge to reconcile his tax resistance with Jesus instructions.  I told him Caesar was getting too much around here and some one had to stand up for God.  Elsewhere, he interpreted the story in this way:Jesus was asked if He believed in paying taxes to Caesar.  In those days different districts had different money and the Jews had to change their money into that of Rome, so Jesus asked, not for a Jewish coin, but for a coin with which tribute was paid, saying Why tempt me? Looking at the coin He asked whose image and superscription was there inscribed and was told that it was Caesars.  Those who tried to trick Him knew that if He said that taxes were to be paid to Caesar He would be attacked by the mobs who hated Caesar, and if He refused to pay taxes there would always be some traitor to turn Him in.  His mission was not to fight Caesar as Barabbas had done, but it was to chase the moneychangers out of the Temple and to establish His own Church.  Whether He winked as much as to say that any good Jew knew that Caesar did not deserve a thing as He said, Render unto Caesar what is Caesars and unto God what is Gods, or not, no one knows.Despite what anyone says each of us has to decide for himself whether to put the emphasis upon pleasing Caesar or pleasing God. We may vary in our reasons for drawing the line here or there as to how much we render unto Caesar.  I make my decision when I remember that Christ said to the woman caught in sin, Let him without sin first cast a stone at her. I remember His Forgive seventy times seven, which means no Caesar at all with his courts, prisons and war.(Hennacy, Ammon The Book of Ammon (5th printing, Feb. 1970), p. 393-4)Other anarchist interpretations for this passage include freeing oneself from material attachment and implying that Caesar has rights over the money he produces, but not things that are made by God. As Ellul puts it:(Ellul, Jacques Anarchism and Christianity p.20)VersionsThe extracanonical of Thomas also has a version, which reads in the Scholars Version  100:(http://www.misericordia.edu/users/davies/thomas/Trans.htm)They showed Jesus a gold coin and said to him, The Roman emperors people demand taxes from us. He said to them, Give the emperor what belongs to the emperor, give God what belongs to God, and give me what is mine.The fragmentary Gospel in the Scholars Version translation (found in The Complete Gospels) 3:1-6 reads:They come to him and interrogate him as a way of putting him to the test. They ask, Teacher, Jesus, we know that you are God, since the things you do put you above all the prophets. Tell us, then, is it permissible to pay to rulers what is due them? Should we pay them or not? Jesus knew what they were up to, and became indignant. Then he said to them, Why do you pay me lip service as a teacher, but not do what I say? How accurately Isaiah prophesied about you when he said, This people honors me with their lips, but their heart stays far away from me; their worship of me is empty, they insist on teachings that are human commandments See also* and politics* of the two kingdoms* of JesusReferencesExternal links* Who Would Jesus Tax? Data mining the Bible for Jesus & Taxes, Tribute, Money* What belongs to God? by Marcus Borg, Beliefnet* Render Unto Caesar: The Place of Politics in Modern Christianity  a conservative American Christian viewpoint* The Picket Line: 16 Jan. 04  A tax resisters point-of-view* Render to All What Is Due Them: What Every Christian Needs to Know about Honoring Civil Authority and Paying Taxes, Part 2 by David G. Hagopian  advancing the argument that Jesus commanded people to pay taxes to their de facto rulers* Jesus of Nazareth, Illegal-Tax Protester by Ned Netterville and others - A comprehensive analysis of everything Jesus said or did relative to taxes and tax collectors as recorded in the canon and non-canon gospels.* Render Unto Caesar by R.J. Rushdoony  Christian Reconstructionist perspective.a Cesare quello che  di Cesare e a Dio quello che  di Diomeg a csszrnakcaru carevocaru carevo
5174668
Mhlau
Mhlau is a village and a former municipality in Wittenberg district in Saxony-Anhalt, Germany. Since 1 January 2011, it is part of the town Grfenhainichen. It was part of the administrative community (Verwaltungsgemeinschaft) of zur Dbener Heide.GeographyThe community lies on the southern edge of Wittenberg district about 9 km west of the former district seat of Grfenhainichen and about 18 km southeast of Dessau, right on the border with Saxony.GeologyThe municipal area is strongly marked by coal mining. Most of the old pits have flooded since they were shut down and are now used as bathing ponds.SubdivisionsMhlau consists of the subdivisions of Golpa, Rothehaus, Gromhlau, and Kleinmhlau.HistoryMhlau is said to have been settled originally by Slavs. It had its first documentary mention on 12 December 1200 when a church was consecrated in Wrlitz, about 25 km away.Referencesde:Mhlaueo:Mhlauit:Mhlaunl:Mhlaupt:Mhlauro:Mhlauru:sr:vi:Mhlauvo:Mhlauwar:Mhlau
5181032
St_Agnes,_Cornwall
St Agnes (Cornish Breanek) is a civil parish and a large village on the north coast of Cornwall, Kingdom. The village is situated approximately five miles (8 km) north of Redruth and ten miles (16 km) southwest of Newquay.( and )Historically, St Agnes and the surrounding area relied on fishing, farming and mining for copper and tin. At their height about 100 mines employed 1000 miners. Mining came to an end in the 1920s and many of these mines are still on view for any tourists.()St Agnes is a popular tourist destination. Much of the and West Devon Mining Landscape ( a Heritage Site) is in the parish. The coastal area is maintained by the National Trust and is designated part of the Cornwall Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty (AONB). There are beaches at Cove and Porth and the area has many way-marked coastal and country walks.The St Agnes area has a heritage of industrial archeology and much of the landscape is of considerable geological interest. There are also stone-age remains in the parish. The manor of Tywarnhaile was one of the 17 maneria of the Duchy of Cornwall. Statistics St Agnes civil parish had a population of 7,257() in April 2006; this includes nearby Porthtowan, Hawke, Blackwater and Mithian as well as St Agnes village itself. The 2001 census figure for St Agnes village was 2,230() in 1,013 households. Unemployment at 3.8% (2001 census) compares to a national average of 3.4%. The retired population represented 20.8% (national average 13.6%), those in full time employment were 28.6% (40.6%), and those self-employed were 14.9% (8.3%). These and other factors put St Agnes in 15,862nd position in the most deprived scale out of 32,482, thus approximately in the middle (in 2001). Community organisations and social life The people of St Agnes are predominantly Christian or of no religion and there are three churches: Anglican, Methodist and Catholic. The churches also act as centres of social gathering as do the Miners and Mechanics Institute, the many pubs, bistros and restaurants and several sports clubs (including union, football and surfing).In medieval and early modern times St Agnes was part of the parish of Perranzabuloe and the church of St Agnes was a chapel-of-ease only (St Agnes was made into a parish in 1846). The parish church is 15th century in date but has been much restored in recent times.() The Roman Catholic Church of Our Lady Star of the Sea was built in 1882 to the designs of Cowell, Drewitt & Wheatly, architects.(Pevsner, N. (1970) Cornwall; 2nd ed. Penguin; p. 155) Harbour The Tonkin family, lords of the manor of Trevaunance, attempted unsuccessfully to create a harbour in 1632, 1684, 1699, 1709; leaving the family in debt.() A harbour was built in 1710 and washed away in 1730. A new harbour constructed in 1798 allowed for the export of copper ore and the import of coal from South Wales for the smelters at the mines.(In 1802, a pilchard fishing industry was established from the harbour, reaching its peak in 1829 and 1830 before declining.( However the new harbour was also destroyed in a storm in 1915/16 and only remains of it still exist.(Clegg, David (2005) Cornwall & the Isles of Scilly. Leicester: Matador; p. 89) St Agnes remained a busy port until the collapse of the harbour wall in 1916, which ultimately made post-war reinvestment in the mines unattractive.( Economy St Agnes is unusual, for a village of its size, in being relatively self-sufficient with local shops and business enterprises being promoted actively by the chamber of commerce() and Bolster, a local free newspaper named after the legendary Bolster giant.It is also the home of FM, which broadcasts across the whole of Cornwall from its studios at the Wheal Kitty Workshops.It is connected by bus services with the chief nearby towns. Places of interest around St Agnes  St Agnes Beacon The Beacon, a local landmark now owned by the National Trust, rises 629 feet in isolation from the surrounding landscape with the sea at its feet. St Agnes derives its old Cornish name, Bryanick (pointed or prominent hill) from this dominant landmark. The top of the Beacon offers a panoramic view of the cliffs from St Ives in the south to Padstow in the North, as well as inland views over much of Carrick and the eastern part of Penryn. On a clear day, 23 miles of coast and 32 church towers can be seen from the top. Bolster & Chapel Porth Bolster & Chapel Porth is a large earthen bulwark believed to date from the Dark Ages. It originally ran from Chapel Porth to Trevaunance Cove. According to legend, Bolster was a giant who fell in love with a young maiden called Agnes. As proof of his love, Agnes demanded that the giant fill a small hole at the edge of the cliff with his blood. Being such a small hole the giant willingly did so. However, he was unaware that the hole was bottomless and opened into a sea cave. Bolster continued to fill the cave until he was so weak that he fell into the sea to his death; the blood-stained cave can be found at Chapel Porth. St Agnes Parish Museum The St Agnes Parish Museum offers an opportunity to study in more detail the landscape and the history of St Agnes. The Museum is run by volunteers and is a registered charity established to promote the heritage of St Agnes. The mining and seafaring history of St Agnes is explained in displays and on film. The natural history display includes a 700-pound leatherback turtle.() Wheal Coates and Stippy Stappy Image:Tin mine near St Agnes 2.JPG|thumb|right|Towanroath engine house, Wheal CoatesCoates is one of the best known and most picturesque groups of cliff-top mine buildings in Cornwall, offering superb coastal views. The buildings are owned by the National Trust.Stippy Stappy is a row of 18th century cottages on a very steep incline. Blue Hills Tin Streams These traditional workings are situated in Jericho Valley. The process by which tin is extracted is demonstrated and explained. The Blue Hills area is also host to the Motor Cycling Clubs Lands End Classic Trial, for both cars and bikes. 2008 marked the events centenary - the first run being held in 1908 http://www.themotorcyclingclub.org.uk/. Heritage Coast The Heritage landscape around St Agnes is promoted and cared for by the St Agnes to Newquay Countryside Management Service. The service strives to balance the differing needs of the many users of the countryside and focuses on building an understanding between all those who live, work and visit the area so that all are working towards a common goal of protection and appreciation of the environment. See also * Mimetite* Opie, notable painter, born at Trevellas References  External links and references ** World Heritage Listing for St. Agnes* Cornwall Record Office Online Catalogue for St AgnesAgnes (Cornwall)kw:BreanekAgnes (Cornwall)Agnes (Kornwalia)Agnes (Cornwall)
5190859
Cradley,_West_Midlands
Cradley is a village in the Country of Dudley, near Halesowen and the banks of the river Stour. It is unofficially known locally as Gate, however Colley Gate is the name of the short road in the centre of Cradley. It was part of the ancient parish of Halesowen, but (unlike much of the rest of that parish, which was an exclave of Shropshire) was always in Worcestershire, until the creation of the West Midlands County in 1974.  This meant that for civil administrative purposes, Cradley formerly had the officers which a parish would have had.There are two villages named Cradley in the Midlands of England; the other Cradley lies about 30 miles to the southwest, near to the Hills in south Worcestershire, but just across the county boundary in Herefordshire.In the 19th century a new settlement grew up in heathland on the other side of the river, and became known as Heath.  This was in the ancient parish of Regis.  Previously the residents of Cradley had had the right to graze their animals on that heath, subject to a small annual payment to the lord of the manor.HistoryWithgar, the last of the Saxons, was the last lord to live within the manor. His house, which was very likely on the site of the old Farther Leys Barn (Fatherless Barn) was no doubt a timber built structure like a barn, his family living at one end while his servants and ceorls occupied the other where they slept on straw.Cradley appears in the Book thus::CRADELEIE. Pagan holds it under William son of Ansculf. Withgar held it. There is one hide, no part in Demesne, 4 villagers and 11 smallholders with 7 ploughs. The value was 40 shillings; now 24 shillings.The manor of Cradley was bought and sold over the centuries, and also changed hands as a result of forfeiture and political favours. In 1473, following the forfeiture of it by Butler, 5th Earl of Ormond, it passed to the Crown, and King Edward IV gave the largest part of it to his Queen. She had built a chapel, dedicated to Erasmus, the Dutch humanist, adjoining the abbey church at Westminster, and endowed it with the manors of Cradley and Hagley, but the manor reverted to Butler, 7th Earl of Ormond, when the attainder was reversed by Henry VII. In 1564, the 7th Earls grandson sold it, together with Oldswinford, Hagley and Clent, to Sir John Lyttleton of Frankley.(Halesowen: Introduction, borough and manors, Victoria County History, Worcester: volume 3 (1913), pp. 136-146. http://www.british-history.ac.uk/report.aspx?compid43100&strqueryCradley Date accessed: 18 October 2009)(Parishes: Hagley, Victoria County History, Worcester: volume 3 (1913), pp. 130-136. http://www.british-history.ac.uk/report.aspx?compid43099 Date accessed: 18 October 2009.) The boundary of Cradley, as re-surveyed in 1733, has remained virtually unchanged ever since.During the Civil War, Parliamentary troops were quartered in Cradley.Renowned typeface designer Caslon is believed to have been born in Cradley in 1693, although there are those who maintain that he was born in Halesowen.Religious historyIn 1770, Wesley visited Cradley, and wrote::Monday, 19, March 1770 - I rode to Cradley (from Wednesbury). Here also the multitude obliged me to stand abroad, although the north wind whistled about my head. About one I took the field to Stourbridge. Many of the hearers were as wild as colts untamed; but the bridle was in their mouths. At six I began in Dudley. The air was as cold as I had almost ever felt, but I trust God warmed many hearts.The local Anglican church, St. Peters, was built by a group of Dissenters who gathered together to form the Independent Congregational Society. However, a special of Parliament (39 Geo. III. 1799), passed on 12 July 1799, took St. Peters into the of England.The Dissenting tradition remained strong, and many local Unitarian, Wesleyan, Methodist and Baptist churches flourished.Industrial historyCradley achieved prominence in the 19th century as a centre of iron chain making, though the most important centre was the adjacent (but distinct) Heath. The chain was made on a hearth by hammering cut lengths of red-hot wrought iron rod into oval links, one link passing through the next to form a cable. The anchor chain for the Titanic was made at Cradley Heath.Chain making was not the first or only iron trade carried on in Cradley and the neighbouring towns. For hundreds of years nails had been made in the Black Country, and many thousands of men and women were employed in the trade. It was the staple industry until the mid-19th century. Nail making by hand went into decline after the introduction of machine made nails in about 1830 and many nail makers adapted their smiths and forges, and redirected their skills to making chain.Cradley is less famous for mining than chain making, but between 1850 and 1950 the collieries were no less important than the chain works in the local economy and for the legacy they left.The coal mining and chain making that made Cradley famous are now in the past, and most of the other iron-based trades have declined to a shadow of their former selves.Recent timesThe legendary football player, Bloomer was born in Bridge Street, Cradley on January 20, 1874.Organisations and publications such as the Country Society and Black Country Bugle keep the name of Cradley well-known to thousands of people. Many local pubs have been demolished in recent years,The Black Horse and The Bulls Head were both situated in Overend and have made way for private housing. More recently (2008) The Top Crown was razed to the ground.Although Cradley was historically a village in its own right, increasing residential development during the first half of the 20th century has been it swallowed up into Halesowen so it became not only part of the Halesowen Borough, but also part of the town of Halesowen. Cradleys old High Street is located along what is now known as Colley Lane.A number of pre-1900 homes remain in Cradley, but most of the housing stock dates from after the World War, and there is a substantial mix of private and council properties.It has good transport links. There are several buses connecting Cradley with Halesowen, Stourbridge and Birmingham as well as the area being close to Cradley Heath and Lye train stations.Social housingTwo large housing development took place in Cradley during the 1960s and 1970s - Tanhouse Estate and Huntington Gardens.Huntington Gardens was situated in the north of Cradley near the border with Heath, on the site of poor housing stock that had previously formed New Street, Victoria Street and Little Hill. The estate was completed by 1973 and consisted of 153 maisonettes and flats, as well as four lock-up shops. Residents also had access to garages as well as two sub stations. Some improvements were made to the already-troubled estate in 1988 - these amounted to nothing more than new porches, secured accesses, landscaping, fenced-off gardens and new playgrounds. But these improvements were inadequate for a neighbourhood in terminal decline, and by the end of the 1990s it was one of the worst estates in the West Midlands. Vandalism, graffiti, litter, drug-taking, burglaries and car crime were rife, and these problems had contributed to an increasing number of empty properties on the estate. Demand for properties was low, and by the end of the year 2000, local residents started to work in conjunction with local council officials to try and determine a solution to the estates plight. A consultation process with residents showed that 80% were in favour of demolition, and within a year all of the residents had been rehoused. Demolition took place in 2003 and the site has since been sold for private residential development.Tanhouse Estate is situated to the south of Cradley adjoining the countryside, and on its completion consisted of several hundred low-rise council homes, several blocks of flats up to three storeys high, two  20-storey tower blocks and a 10 storey block. These homes were popular on their construction due to modern convenience that many of their occupants had never previously experienced, but within 20 years the estate was one of the most notorious in the West Midlands. Many of the homes had fallen into disrepair, and the local area was plagued by drug-taking, theft, vandalism and car crime. The local ambulance crew would refuse to answer calls from houses on the estate unless protected by police, due to a string of vandal attacks on ambulances. Two of the estates tower blocks were razed to the ground in controlled explosions on 24 July 1999, and the site of both blocks has since been developed for housing. The remaining tower block was renovated at around the same time, and the estates fortunes have since improved.EducationCaslons name lives on in the local Caslon Primary School that was built after the World War.A secondary modern school was built to serve Cradley in 1939, just before the outbreak of the World War, and was named Homer Hill Secondary Modern School. In 1972, however, a reorganisation of education in Halesowen saw the school closed and the buildings occupied by Homer Hill Middle School. This reorganisation saw 5-7 infant, 7-11 junior and 11-16/18 secondary schools replaced by 5-9 first, 9-13 middle and 13-16/18 secondary schools. However, this system was scrapped in September 1982 on the reintroduction of the traditional age ranges in Halesowen. Homer Hill Middle School was consequently closed and reorganised into High School, an 11-16 comprehensive school. The school was rebuilt between 1987 and 1992, with the fully completed new school being opened on 5 June 1992. It closed 16 years later.References
5197221
Clipper_Valley
Clipper Valley is a vast, oval-shaped plain located in the eastern Desert, in Bernardino County, California, in the south of the National Preserve. Interstate 40 passes the valley along its southern border, and California and the River  are to the east.GeographyThe Valley is north of the Mountains, southeast of the Mountains, and northwest of the Mountains. Covering over , the valley is large enough to hold most of greater Angeles. It has two prominent geologic features, the largest being the Blind Hills, a heavily eroded, flat-topped outcropping of rocky hills, and Halfway Hill, located near the center of the valley. Only two small roads actually cross the valley, a small dirt road called Vulcan Mine Road, and a largely abandoned stretch of the Old Trails Road and historic U.S. Route 66.HistoryThe valley was part of the homeland of the people for thousands of years. The region has been the site of numerous mining operations, particularly during the 1840s Rush.The Mountain Wilderness Area is nearby in the northern Mountains.(http://www.blm.gov/ca/pa/wilderness/wa/areas/clipper_mountain.html Clipper Mountain Wilderness Area . accessed 6/22/2010)See also*Valleys of the Mojave Desert*Protected areas of San Bernardino County, CaliforniaReferences
5208149
Finch_Foundry
thumb|upright|Waterwheel at the Finch Foundry.Finch Foundry is a 19th century water-powered forge situated in the village of Sticklepath near Okehampton, Devon, England and was active until 1960.(National Mills Weekend Finch Foundry) It was originally used to produce agricultural and mining hand tools, but the Foundry has been a National Trust property since 1994. It contains examples of a tilt hammer, drop hammer, and shear hammer all powered by the water wheels.() The Trust maintains it in working order and demonstrations of the tools are given every hour. References External links*Finch Foundry information, National Trust*Finch Foundry  Devon Living Museums  UK Hotel Accommodation
5211890
Merrivale
Merrivale is a placename:;South Africa* KwaZulu-Natal is a small town in the midlands of KwaZulu-Natal Province* Gauteng was a small gold mining town in Gauteng but now a military facility.* Durban is a suburb of Durban;United Kingdom* Devon, hamlet with nearby neolithic stone rows (formerly also spelled Merivale)* Herefordshire, a suburb of Ross-on-WyeSee also*Merivale, a suburb of Christchurch, New Zealand
5225696
Jonathan_Bourne,_Jr.
footnotesJonathan Bourne, Jr. (February 23, 1855 September 1, 1940) was an American politician, attorney, and businessman serving as States Senator from Oregon. A native of Massachusetts, he moved to Oregon, where he became a lawyer and an industrialist with holdings in mining, mills, and agriculture. A Republican, he also served two terms in the House of Representatives.Early lifeJonathan Bourne was born on February 23, 1855, in Bedford, Massachusetts.() He was educated at private schools before enrolling at University where he attended from 1875 to 1877.(Corning, Howard M. (1989) Dictionary of Oregon History. & Mort Publishing. p. 33.) Bourne then sailed for Asia where his ship wrecked off of the island of what was then called Formosa in 1877.( After rescue, he arrived in Oregon, in 1878.( He studied law there and was admitted to the bar in 1881, and then practiced in Portland from 1881 to 1886.( An industrialist, he had interests in mining, farming, cotton mills, and commercial enterprises.( Bourne was married three times.(Political careerBourne was a member of the House of Representatives from 1885 to 1886, representing Multnomah County.(Oregon Legislative Assembly (13th) 1885 Regular Session) He returned to the House in 1897, representing District 37 and Multnomah County as a Republican, and only served during the regular session that failed to organize that year.()In 1906, he was elected as a Republican to the U.S. Senate, becoming one of the first two Senators to be elected under Oregons direct primary law, in which Senators were selected by popular vote, and then were officially elected to the position by the Legislative Assembly to comply with Article One of the U.S. Constitution.() (In 1914, the 17th Amendment established direct election of Senators.) He served from March 4, 1907, to March 4, 1913.(While in the Senate he was chairman of the Committee on Fisheries (Sixtieth and Sixty-first Congresses) and a member of the Committee on Post Offices and Post Roads (Sixty-second Congress).( He was the author of the Post Act while there and advocated for the adoption of the initiative and referendum system.(In 1908, he was a leader in the group that attempted to have Roosevelt run for a second term as the U.S. President.( Bourne was not renominated to his Senate seat in 1912 by the Republican Party,( but chose to run again under the Popular Government banner, coming in third.  He also advocated for the direct primary system for political offices.(Later life and legacyBourne served as president of the Republican Progressive League, and after leaving Congress resumed his former pursuits in Oregon and Massachusetts.( He then worked in the newspaper business in D.C. until his death. Jonathan Bourne died in the District of Columbia on September 1, 1940, at the age of 85.( He was buried at Cedar Hill Cemetery in Maryland.( Earlier in his life he owned large mining interests in the northeast part of Oregon, where the town of Bourne bore his name.(References External links * Guide to the Jonathan Bourne papersBourneBourne
5234576
Environmental_radioactivity
Environmental radioactivity is produced by radioactive materials in the human environment.  While some radioisotopes, such as strontium-90 (90Sr) and technetium-99 (99Tc), are only found on Earth as a result of human activity, and some, like potassium-40 (40K), are only present due to natural processes, a few isotopes, e.g. tritium (3H), result from both natural processes and human activities. The concentration and location of some natural isotopes, particularly uranium-238 (238U), can be affected by human activity.Background level in soilsRadioactivity is present everywhere, and has been since the formation of the earth. According to the IAEA, soil typically contains the following four natural radioisotopes: 40K, 226Ra, 238U, and 232Th.  In one kilogram of soil, the potassium-40 amounts to an average 370 Bq of radiation, with a typical range of 100700 Bq; the others each contribute some 25 Bq, with typical ranges of 1050 Bq (750 Bq for the 232Th).(Generic Procedures for Assessment and Response during a Radiological Emergency, IAEA TECDOC Series number 1162, published in 2000 http://www-pub.iaea.org/MTCD/publications/PubDetails.asp?pubId5926) Some soils may vary greatly from these norms.Sea and river siltA recent report on the Sava river in Serbia suggests that many of the river silts contain about 100 Bq kg&minus;1 of natural radioisotopes (226Ra, 232Th, and 238U).(Z. Vukovic, V. Sipka, D. Todorovic and S. Stankovic, Journal of Radioanalytical and Nuclear Chemistry, 2006, 268, 129131.) According to the Nations the normal concentration of uranium in soil ranges between 300 g kg&minus;1 and 11.7 mg kg&minus;1.(United Nations Scientific Committee on the Effects of Atomic Radiation, 1993, Report to the General Assembly, with scientific annexes, New York) It is well known that some plants, called hyperaccumulators, are able to absorb and concentrate metals within their tissues; iodine was first isolated from seaweed in France, which suggests that seaweed is an iodine hyperaccumulator.Synthetic radioisotopes also can be detected in silt. Busby quotes a report on the plutonium activity in Welsh intertidal sediments by Garland et al. (1989), which suggests that the closer a site is to Sellafield, the higher is the concentration of plutonium in the silt. Some relationship between distance and activity can be seen in their data, when fitted to an exponential curve, but the scatter of the points is large (R2  0.3683).Man-madeImage:US fallout exposure.png|right|300px|thumb|Per capita thyroid doses in the continental United States resulting from all exposure routes from all atmospheric nuclear tests conducted at the Test Site from 1951-1962.The additional radioactivity in the biosphere caused by human activity due to the releases of man-made radioactivity and of Naturally Occurring Radioactive Materials (NORM) can be divided into several classes.# Normal licensed releases which occur during the regular operation of a plant or process handling man-made radioactive materials.#* For instance the release of 99Tc from a medicine department of a hospital which occurs when a person given a Tc imaging agent expels the agent.# Releases of man-made radioactive materials which occur during an industrial or research accident.#* For instance the accident.# Releases which occur as a result of military activity.#* For example a nuclear weapons test.# Releases which occur as a result of a crime.#* For example the accident where thieves, unaware of its radioactive content, stole some medical equipment and as a result a number of people were exposed to radiation.# Releases of naturally occurring radioactive materials (NORM) as a result of mining etc.#* For example the release of the trace quantities of uranium and thorium in coal, when it is burned in power stations.Farming and the transfer to humans of deposited radioactivityJust because a radioisotope lands on the surface of the soil, does not mean it will enter the human food chain.  After release into the environment, radioactive materials can reach humans in a range of different routes, and the chemistry of the element usually dictates the most likely route.thumb|center|600px|Airborne radioactive material can have an effect on humans via a range of routes.CowsJi Hla claims in his textbook Radioactivity, Ionizing Radiation and Nuclear Energy that cattle only pass a minority of the strontium, caesium, plutonium and americium they ingest to the humans who consume milk and meat.  Using milk as an example, if the cow has a daily intake of 1000 Bq of the preceding isotopes then the milk will have the following activities.* 90Sr, 2 Bq dm3* 137Cs, 5 Bq dm3* 239Pu, 0.001 Bq dm3* 241Am, 0.001 Bq dm3SoilJi Hlas textbook states that soils vary greatly in their ability to bind radioisotopes, the clay particles and acids can alter the distribution of the isotopes between the soil water and the soil.  The distribution coefficient Kd is the ratio of the soils radioactivity (Bq g1) to that of the soil water (Bq ml1).  If the radioactivity is tightly bonded to by the minerals in the soil then less radioactivity can be absorbed by crops and grass growing in the soil.* Cs-137 Kd  1000* Pu-239 Kd  10000 to 100000* Sr-90 Kd  80 to 150* I-131 Kd  0.007 to 50The Trinity testright|400px|thumb|Levels of radioactivity in the Trinity glass from two different samples as measured by gamma spectroscopy on lumps of the glassOne dramatic source of man-made radioactivity is a weapons test. The glassy trinitite formed by the first atom bomb contains radioisotopes formed by activation and fission.  In addition some natural radioisotopes are present.  A recent paper(P.P. Parekh, T.M. Semkow, M.A. Torres, D.K. Haines, J.M. Cooper, P.M. Rosenberg and M.E. Kitto, Journal of Environmental Radioactivity, 2006, 85, 103-120) reports the levels of long-lived radioisotopes in the trinitite. The trinitite was formed from feldspar and quartz which were melted by the heat. Two samples of trinitite were used, the first (left-hand-side bars in the graph) was taken from between 40 and 65 meters of ground zero while the other sample was taken from further away from the zero point.The 152Eu and 154Eu was mainly formed by the neutron activation of the europium in the soil, it is clear that the level of radioactivity for these isotopes is highest where the neutron dose to the soil was larger.  Some of the 60Co is generated by activation of the cobalt in the soil, but some was also generated by the activation of the cobalt in the steel (100 foot) tower.  This 60Co from the tower would have been scattered over the site reducing the difference in the soil levels.The 133Ba and 241Am are due to the neutron activation of barium and plutonium inside the bomb.  The barium was present in the form of the nitrate in the chemical explosives used while the plutonium was the fissile fuel used.The 137Cs level is higher in the sample that was further away from the ground zero point &ndash; this is thought to be because the precursors to the 137Cs (137I and 137Xe) and, to a lesser degree, the caesium itself are volatile. The natural radioisotopes in the glass are about the same in both locations.Image:Trinity fallout.png|250px|right|thumb|Fallout around the Trinity site. The radioactive cloud moved towards northeast with high rntgen levels within about 100 miles (160 km).Activation productsThe action of neutrons on stable isotopes can form radioisotopes, for instance the neutron bombardment (neutron activation) of nitrogen-14 forms carbon-14.  This radioisotope can be released from the fuel cycle; this is the radioisotope responsible for the majority of the dose experienced by the population as a result of the activities of the power industry.Nuclear bomb tests have increased the specific activity of carbon, whereas the use of fossil fuels has decreased it.  See the article on dating for further details.Fission productsDischarges from nuclear plants within the fuel cycle introduce fission products to the environment. The releases from reprocessing plants tend to be medium to long-lived radioisotopes; this is because the fuel is allowed to cool for several years before being dissolved in the acid.  The releases from reactor accidents and bomb detonations will contain a greater amount of the short-lived radioisotopes (when the amounts are expressed in activity Bq)).Short livedthumb|right|300px|The external gamma dose for a person in the open near the Chernobyl site.thumb|right|300px|The contributions made by the different isotopes to the dose (in air) caused in the contaminated area in the time shortly after the accident. This image was drawn using data from the OECD report, the Korean table of the isotopes and the second edition of The radiochemical manual.An example of a short-lived fission product is iodine-131, this can also be formed as an activation product by the neutron activation of tellurium.In both bomb fallout and a release from a power reactor accident, the short-lived isotopes cause the dose rate on day one to be much higher than that which will be experienced at the same site many days later.  This holds true even if no attempts at decontamination are made.  In the graphs below, the total gamma dose rate and the share of the dose due to each main isotope released by the Chernobyl accident are shown.Medium livedAn example of a medium lived is 137Cs, which has a half-life of 30 years. Caesium is released in bomb fallout and from the fuel cycle.  A paper has been written on the radioactivity found in oysters found in the Sea, these were found by spectroscopy to contain 141Ce, 144Ce, 103Ru, 106Ru, 137Cs, 95Zr and 95Nb.  In addition, a zinc activation product (65Zn) was found, this is thought to be due to the corrosion of magnox fuel cladding in cooling ponds.(A. Preston, J.W.R. Dutton and B.R. Harvey, Nature, 1968, 218, 689-690.) It is likely that the modern releases of all these isotopes from Windscale is smaller.An important part of the Chernobyl release was the caesium-137, this isotope is responsible for much of the long term (at least one year after the fire) external exposure which has occurred at the site.  The caesium isotopes in the fallout have had an effect on farming. http://www.uiar.org.ua/Eng/index.htmA large amount of caesium was released during the accident where a radioactive source (made for medical use) was stolen and then smashed open during an attempt to convert it into scrap metal.  The accident could have been stopped at several stages; first, the last legal owners of the source failed to make arrangements for the source to be stored in a safe and secure place; and second, the scrap metal workers who took it did not recognise the markings which indicated that it was a radioactive object.Soudek et al. reported in 2006 details of the uptake of 90Sr and 137Cs into sunflowers grown under hydroponic conditions.(P. Soudek, . Valenov, Z. Vavkov and T. Vank, Journal of Environmental Radioactivity, 2006, 88, 236-250)  The caesium was found in the leaf veins, in the stem and in the apical leaves.  It was found that 12% of the caesium entered the plant, and 20% of the strontium.  This paper also reports details of the effect of potassium, ammonium and calcium ions on the uptake of the radioisotopes.Caesium binds tightly to clay minerals such as illite and montmorillonite; hence it remains in the upper layers of soil where it can be accessed by plants with shallow roots (such as grass).  Hence grass and mushrooms can carry a considerable amount of 137Cs which can be transferred to humans through the chain.  One of the best countermeasures in dairy farming against 137Cs is to mix up the soil by deeply ploughing the soil.  This has the effect of putting the 137Cs out of reach of the shallow roots of the grass, hence the level of radioactivity in the grass will be lowered.  Also, after a nuclear war or serious accident, the removal of top few cm of soil and its burial in a shallow trench will reduce the long term gamma dose to humans due to 137Cs as the gamma photons will be attenuated by their passage through the soil.  The more remote the trench is from humans and the deeper the trench is the better the degree of protection which will be afforded to the human population.In livestock farming, an important countermeasure against 137Cs is to feed to animals a little blue. This iron potassium cyanide compound acts as an ion-exchanger.  The cyanide is so tightly bonded to the iron that it is safe for a human to eat several grams of prussian blue per day.  The prussian blue reduces the half-life (not to be confused with the nuclear half-life) of the caesium).  The physical or nuclear half-life of 137Cs is about 30 years, which is a constant and can not be changed; however, the biological half-life will change according to the nature and habits of the organism for which it is expressed. Caesium in humans normally has a biological half-life of between one and four months.  An added advantage of the prussian blue is that the caesium which is stripped from the animal in the droppings is in a form which is not available to plants.  Hence, it prevents the caesium from being recycled.  The form of prussian blue required for the treatment of humans or animals is a special grade.  Attempts to use the pigment grade used in paints have not been successful.Long livedExamples of longed lived isotopes include iodine-129 and Tc-99, which have nuclear half-lives of 15 million and 200,000 years, respectively.Plutonium and the other actinidesIn popular culture, plutonium is credited with being the ultimate threat to life and limb which is wrong; while ingesting plutonium is not likely to be good for ones health, other radioisotopes such as radium are more toxic to humans.  Regardless, the introduction of the transuranium elements such as plutonium into the environment should be avoided wherever possible.  Currently, the activities of the reprocessing industry have been subject to great debate as one of the fears of those opposed to the industry is that large amounts of plutonium will be either mismanaged or released into the environment. In the past, one of the largest releases of plutonium into the environment has been bomb testing. *Those tests in the air scattered some plutonium over the entire globe; this great dilution of the plutonium has resulted in the threat to each exposed person being very small as each person is only exposed to a very small amount.*The underground tests tend to form molten rock which rapidly cools and seals in the actinides so rendering them unable to move, again the threat to humans is small unless the site of the test is dug up.*The safety trials where bombs were subject to simulated accidents pose the greatest threat to people; some areas of land used for such experiments (conducted in the open air) have not been fully released for general use despite in one case an extensive decontamination.NaturalActivation products from cosmic raysCosmogenic isotopes (or nuclides) are rare isotopes created when a high-energy ray interacts with the nucleus of an situ atom.  These isotopes are produced within earth materials such as rocks or soil, in Earths atmosphere, and in extraterrestrial items such as meteorites.  By measuring cosmogenic isotopes, scientists are able to gain insight into a range of geological and astronomical processes.  There are both radioactive and stable cosmogenic isotopes.  Some of these radioisotopes are tritium, carbon-14 and phosphorus-32.Production modesHere is a list of radioisotopes formed by the action of rays on the atmosphere; the list also contains the production mode of the isotope. These data were obtained from the SCOPE50 report, see table 1.9 of chapter 1.Transfer to groundThe level of beryllium-7 in the air is related to the spot cycle, as radiation from the sun forms this radioisotope in the atmosphere.  The rate at which it is transferred from the air to the ground is controlled in part by the weather.center|thumb|500px|The rate of delivery of Be-7 from the air to the ground in Japan (source M. Yamamoto et al., Journal of Environmental Radioactivity, 2006, 86, 110-131)Applications in geology listed by isotopeApplications of datingBecause cosmogenic isotopes have long half-lives (anywhere from thousands to millions of years), scientists find them useful for geologic dating.  Cosmogenic isotopes are produced at or near the surface of the Earth, and thus are commonly applied to problems of measuring ages and rates of geomorphic and sedimentary events and processes.Specific applications of cosmogenic isotopes include:* exposure dating of earth surfaces, including glacially scoured bedrock, fault scarps, landslide debris* burial dating of sediment, bedrock, ice* measurement of steady-state erosion rates* dating of organic matter (dating)* absolute dating of water masses, measurement of groundwater transport rates* absolute dating of meteorites, lunar surfacesMethods of measurement for the long-lived isotopesTo measure cosmogenic isotopes produced within solid earth materials, such as rock, samples are generally first put through a process of mechanical separation. The sample is crushed and desirable material, such as a particular mineral (quartz in the case of Be-10), is separated from non-desirable material by using a density separation in a heavy liquid medium such as sodium tungstate (LST). The sample is then dissolved, a common isotope carrier added (Be-9 carrier in the case of Be-10), and the aqueous solution is purified down to an oxide or other pure solid.  Finally, the ratio of the rare cosmogenic isotope to the common isotope is measured using accelerator spectrometry. The original concentration of cosmogenic isotope in the sample is then calculated using the measured isotopic ratio, the mass of the sample, and the mass of carrier added to the sample.Radium and radon from the decay of long-lived actinides500px|right|thumb|Lead-210 deposition rate as a function of time as observed in JapanRadium and radon are in the environment because they are decay products of uranium and thorium.The radon (222Rn) released into the air decays to 210Pb and other radioisotopes, and the levels of 210Pb can be measured. The rate of deposition of this radioisotope is dependent on the weather.  Below is a graph of the deposition rate observed in Japan.(M. Yamamoto et al., Journal of Environmental Radioactivity, 2006, 86, 110-131))Uranium-lead datingUranium-lead dating is usually performed on the mineral zircon (ZrSiO4), though other materials can be used.  Zircon incorporates uranium atoms into its crystalline structure as substitutes for zirconium, but strongly rejects lead. It has a high blocking temperature, is resistant to mechanical weathering and is chemically inert.  Zircon also forms multiple crystal layers during metamorphic events, which each may record an isotopic age of the event. These can be dated by a SHRIMP ion microprobe.One of the advantages of this method is that any sample provides two clocks, one based on uranium-235s decay to lead-207 with a half-life of about 703 million years, and one based on uranium-238s decay to lead-206 with a half-life of about 4.5 billion years, providing a built-in crosscheck that allows accurate determination of the age of the sample even if some of the lead has been lost.See also* in the environment* in the environmentReferencesReferences about cosmogenic isotope dating* Gosse, John C., and Phillips, Fred M. (2001).  Terrestrial in situ cosmogenic nuclides: Theory and application. Quaternary Science Reviews 20, 1475-1560.* Granger, Darryl E., Fabel, Derek, and Palmer, Arthur N. (2001).  Pliocene-Pleistocene incision of the Green River, Kentucky, determined from radioactive decay of cosmogenic 26Al and 10Be in Mammoth Cave sediments. Geological Society of America Bulletin 113 (7), 825-836.Further reading*Radioactivity, Ionizing Radiation and Nuclear Energy, by J. Hala and J.D. Navratil*A review of the subject has been published by SCOPE in the report SCOPE 50 Radioecology after chernobyl.External links* Purdue University Prime Lab, Cosmogenic nuclides*  Cosmogenic Exposure Dating and the Age of the Earth* Cosmogenic Isotope Laboratory, University of Washington* Geological Association of Canada Awards Distinguished Medal to Young Scientistambiental
5249034
Coat_of_arms_of_Bolvar_State
The of arms of Bolvar State is composed of two fields in blue and gold. The blue color symbolizes the sky. The gold one, the wikt:auriferous riches of the Region. In the upper part of the blue field and forming an arch, eight stars representing the seven provinces that were considered in 1811 to declare the National Independence and, the eighth star symbolizes the emblem of the Guayana Province.In the inferior field runs a gold river representing the Orinoco. Coming out of it, a big rock known as the Middle Rock, on top of it an indigenous female is resting her left arm on a clay vessel, pouring water on the river representing the endless flow of the Orinoco river.To the left of the blue field, a caduceus representing commerce; and to the right, in the same position, a pickaxe symbolizing work and mining industry. Crowning the coat of arms, with a silver background, a radiant triangle with an eye in the middle, representing the eyesight of the Providence protection the Bolvar State territory.The olive branches, emblem of peace, border the coat of arms. At the union point of them theres a golden ribbon with the following dates: to the center, 5 July 1811, Declaration of Venezuelan Independence; to the left, 15 February 1819, Installation of the of Angostura; and to the right, 16 December 1863, Incorporation of Guayana to the Federal Republic.http://www.e-bolivar.gov.ve/bolivar/simbolos/simbolos.php
5257571
Kanakapura
Kanakapura is a town and the headquarters of Kanakapura Taluk in the district in the state of Karnataka, India. Situated near the city of Bengaluru, this town is famous for the production of silk and granite.  Etymology The place was originally under the Gangas and later under the Cholas, who administered it as a part of an area called Kilalainad. Later, the Hoysalas made it a major headquarters of a province (sime). Its name was changed as Kanakapura from its original Kanakanahalli. But earlier it is mentioned as Kanikaranahalli in two Hoysala records dated 1319 and 1317 A.D. from Hachchalu and Nyakanahalli (Kanakapura tq) villages respectively. Even a recent record dated 1662 A.D. by Mysore rulers from Malagala also mention the place as Kanikaranahalli being the headquarters of a sime. The local people universally call it as Kanikaranahalli, which is otherwise corrupted as Kankanahalli, says Buchanan. He further says Kanikaranahalli has a Kannada origin - Kani + Karna or Kanikara signifies showing sympathy. Geography Kanakapura is located at (Falling Rain Genomics, Inc - Kanakapura). It has an average elevation of 638 metres (2093 feet).Kanakapura is situated 55 km south to Bangalore on the banks of the river Arkavathi. TalukThere are 43 village panchayats in the taluk. A major industry is mining of granite in quarries. Other activities include silk production, powerlooms, brick production, bamboo production pottery and other rural industries. Agriculture is the main source of income for people . The keeping industry has covered 38 villages and there are 150 bee keepers who maintain 300 bee colonies. The State Government is providing training facilities to rural people to encourage bee keeping in rural area.  The taluk has geographical area of 1,59,426 hectares consisting of 6 hoblis, namely:a)      Kasabab)      Harohallic)      Maralawadid)      Kodihallie)      Sathanurf)      Uyyamballi History The fort in Kanakapura is said to have been erected by Jagadeva Raya, the chief of Channapatna. The remains of the fort can be now seen near the Arkavathi bridge. The town was twice burnt or laid waste by Sultan to prevent its being of use to the army of their march to Shrirangapattana. The place was conquered by Mysore rulers in 1630 A.D. Sultan was running a huge workshop at Kanakapura with a steel foundry. The place has a Government Silk Filature Factory founded in 1943. A noted landmark of the town is the Rural college founded by Gandhians Gurikar Range Gowda, Advocate K. Subba Rao and social worker/politician S. Kariappa, who built up and managed the institution. Sri Kariappa is buried here and a memorial built in his honor.Demographics India census(), Kanakapura had a population of 47,047. Males constitute 52% of the population and females 48%. Kanakapura has an average literacy rate of 66%, higher than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 72%, and female literacy is 59%. In Kanakapura, 11% of the population is under 6 years of age.LanguagesKannada is the major language spoken here.FetivalKanakapura is famous for celebrating Holi (famously called as Kamana habba). Places to see The main tourist attraction of Kanakapura Taluk is the confluence of the rivers Arkavathy, and Kaveri, (the sangama),nearly 33 KMs from Kanakapura.Tourist attraction of Kanakapura.* Chunchi waterfalls * Billikal Betta* Muthathi forest* Mekedaatu* Sangama*kaveri fishing camp*Harobele Dam External links * Official website of Bangalore Rural District References (bn:es:Kanakapurabpy:it:Kanakapurakn:new:vi:Kanakapura
5270590
Port_of_Erdemir
 website  thumb|right|A small coal ship berths at ErdemirThe Port of Erdemir, officially Port of Karadeniz Ereli or shortly Er-Port() () is a port in the western Sea, located in Ereli district of Province, Turkey, about  from the city of Zonguldak. Owned by the Turkish State Coal Mining Co.,( it includes commercial operations by Turkish steel-making company Erdemir, A.., as well as military facilities.()Port facilitiesThe port consists of two older quays and two newer piers commissioned in September 1998.(The old harbour is suitable for  capacity ships with  loading quay and  coal and ore unloading quay. There are three cranes that have capacities of 1,000, 1,400 and 1,500 tons/hour on the unloading quay. On the loading quay there are four loading and unloading cranes of which one has a lifting capacity of 25 tons and the other three having a lifting capacity of 15 tons each.(The new harbour facilities include a  unloading pier in  water depth, capable of handling vessels up to . A second  loading and unloading pier can handle vessels up to . Each pier has two unloading cranes with a joint capacity of 3,000 tons/hour. The unloading pier conveyor belt has a capacity of 2,500 tons/hour, and the loading /unloading pier conveyor has a capacity of 1,500 tons/hour.(References
5279756
Peddapally
Peddapally, a Big Town, is a prominent parliament constituency in the Telangana region of Pradesh.BackgroundIt is widely recognised as an industrialised town. It has a strong hold on the political face of the state, and is well known for the ever-changing loyalty to a host of parties ranging from Congress, TDP to BJP. In the recent past, the political party: Telangana Rashtra Samithi (TRS) is seen to be actively lobbying the people for electoral favors. Karimnagar contributes two seats (Karimnagar and Peddapally)  in Indian Parliament.The town manages to hold a few historical places of interest. These include courtyards of kings and a few palaces that are fondly called Devidi. A few sprawling grounds are available for sport aficionados, and it is a common sight to see a crowd of people trying to showcase their cricketing spirit in multiple places within the town. The town is host to great temples and masjids. On the downside are the underlying tensions between Hindus and Muslims. Widely regarded for educational facilities, it is a centre for learning for the surrounding townships. There are a few cinemas, theatres and restaurants.*No. of the mandals covered: 8*No. of villages covered: 128*Area in km: 1303.46*Total Population: 3,65,906TransportationAirThere is an airstrip at Basantnagar on the outskirts of Karimnagar. The nearest international air port is located at Hyderabad, 192 km away. RailPeddapally is well connected to all the major cities in India by rail. Kazipet is about two hrs journey  from Peddapally and is a major railway junction on the Bangalore-New Delhi route while  RoadPeddapally bus station is hub  in Karimanagar Dissirict and well connected with Warangal , Hanamkonda and Mancherial and Karim nagar. Long-distance deluxe buses ply from Peddapally to Hyderabad and  Guntur Karimnagar, Nizamabad, Adilabad,  Jagtial,Narasampet,parkal Khammam, and Bhadrachalam.IndustryBeing closer to Ramagundam (a power plant town), Godavarikhani (a Singareni Colliers Company Limited (SCCL) coal mining area), the town has a bright industrial prospect. With the increasing trend in literacy and health consciousness, the town is rapidly progressing.Other Industries close to Peddapally is Kesoram Cements Ltd, which is one of BK Birla Group Companies
5288151
Joseph_Seligman
thumb|Joseph SeligmanJoseph Seligman (18191880) was a prominent U.S. banker, and businessman. He has been described as a baron. He was born in Baiersdorf, Germany, emigrating to the United States when he was 18. With his brothers, he started a bank, & W. Seligman & Co., with branches in York, Francisco, Orleans, London, Paris and Frankfurt. In the post-Civil War Age, J. & W. Seligman & Co. invested heavily in railroad finance, in particular acting as broker of transactions engineered by Gould. They underwrote the securities of a variety of companies, participating in stock and bond issues in the railroad and steel and wire industries, investments in Russia and Peru, the formation of the Oil Company, and shipbuilding, bridges, bicycles, mining, and a variety of other industries. In 1877, Seligman was involved in the most publicized antisemitic incident in American history up to that point, being denied entry into the Grand Union Hotel in Springs, New York.  ChildhoodAs a small child, Seligman worked in his mothers dry goods shop. Present-day Germany consisted of many independent states in the early 19th century, most of which issued their own, differing coinages; and young Joseph made a profit at his mothers store changing money for travelers for a small fee.Josephs father wanted him to enter the family wool business, but circumstances made this difficult; in particular, migration of the peasant class (Seligmans fathers customers) from rural areas to urban meant a loss of job opportunities and a shrinking economic base in Baiersdorf. At fourteen, Seligman attended the of Erlangen. At seventeen, he boarded a steamer at Bremen and sailed to America.Arrival in AmericaSeligman initially settled in Chunk, Pennsylvania, where he went to work as a cashier/clerk for Packer, who later become a United States congressman. His salary was $400.00 a year.Using his savings from work, Seligman began selling goods door to door in rural Pennsylvania (jewelry, knives, smaller goods), saving outlying farmers the trouble of coming into town to buy their goods. After saving $500, Seligman was able to send to Germany for his brothers William and James, who joined him in peddling.The Seligmans encountered some antisemitic abuse in their interactions with Americans, though they were not discouraged from continuing to sell.J. & W. Seligman & Co. and railroadsSeilgmans firm made a number of investments in railroads. Among these were the Pacific, the and Pacific Railroad, the Pacific Coast Railroad, and the Railroad. They also helped finance New Yorks first elevated railway.The Seligmans tended to lose money on their railroad ventures. One example is buying land in Arizona that was to be used for grazing cattle, which could then be transported on the Atlantic and Pacific Railroad line. However, the aridity of Arizona made it unsuitable for the venture.Civil WarDuring the American Civil War, Seligman was responsible for aiding the Union by disposing of $200,000,000 in bonds a feat which W. E. Dodd said was scarcely less important than the of Gettysburg.()Later historians have suggested that Seligmans role in financing the war through bonds has been exaggerated. According to Birmingham, Seligman was obliged to accept bonds from the Union Government as payment for the uniforms his factory was delivering. Union defeats (combined with a suspiciously high interest rate) lowered confidence in the bonds, making them difficult to sell.()United States economyPresident S. Grant, who had befriended Jesse Seligman when he was a First Lieutenant near New York, offered Joseph Seligman the post of States Secretary of the Treasury, which he declined, possibly due to shyness. Sewall Boutwell accepted the position and eventually clashed with the Seligmans. In 1877, President Hayes asked Seligman, Belmont, and a number of other New York bankers to come to D.C., to plan a refinancing of the war debt.  Each banker submitted a plan, but Secretary of the Treasury Sherman accepted Seligmans plan as being the most practical. It involved retaining gold reserves totaling forty percent of circulating greenbacks through bond sales.Seligman-Hilton affairIn 1877, Judge Henry Hilton, the owner of the Union Hotel in New York, denied entry to Joseph Seligman and his family because they were Jews, creating nationwide controversy. It was the first antisemitic incident of its kind in the United States to achieve widespread publicity. BackgroundDuring the 1870s, several incidents made Alexander Stewart hostile towards Seligman, although the two men had served together on the board of the York Railway Company (whose president was Judge Henry Hilton), a Ring associate.The first incident involved Seligmans declining the post of Secretary of the Treasury. Stewart, who was a friend of President Grant, was then offered the post. However, because he was associated with Henry Hilton and Hilton, with Hall, the Senate declined to confirm him. Seligman was invited to serve in the of Seventy, a group of New Yorkers who banded together to fight the Tweed Ring. Stewarts company, in retaliation, stopped doing business with Seligman.Stewart died in 1876, having placed Hilton in charge of his estate, the largest American fortune recorded to that date. The estate included a two-million-dollar stake in the Grand Union Hotel in Saratoga, as well as A. T. Stewarts store on Place. Hilton himself was unhappy with Seligman, as he was annoyed that Seligman had not invited him to a dinner given for Grant after he became president.()The incidentAfter helping refinance the war debt in Washington, Seligman decided to vacation with his family at the 834-room Grand Union Hotel in Saratoga, where he had stayed before.  Saratoga at the time was a well-regarded resort area for upperclass New Yorkers, and the Grand Union Hotel itself was the best available.Nevertheless, by 1877 the hotel had suffered a drop in business.  Stewart and, after his death, his manager Hilton believed that the cause of the decline was the presence of Israelites (that is, Jews) at the hotel; Christians, their theory went, did not wish to stay at a hotel that admitted Jews.  Seligman was told he could not stay at the hotel. Historians disagree as to whether the Seligman family were physically turned away from the hotel, told not to come to the hotel, or advised that they could stay only one final time. However, it is clear that the Seligmans were made to feel that their presence at the hotel was not desired and would not be tolerated long, if at all.AftermathThe incident created much controversy.  The York Times, on June 19, 1877, ran a headline set entirely in capital letters: ::::::::::A SENSATION AT SARATOGA.:::::::::::::_____::::::::::  ::::::::::NEW RULES FOR THE GRAND UNION.::::::::::NO JEWS TO BE ADMITTED--MR. SELIGMAN,::::::::::THE BANKER, AND HIS FAMILY SENT AWAY--::::::::::HIS LETTER TO MR. HILTON--::::::::::GATHERING OF MR. SELIGMANS FRIENDS::::::::::AN INDIGNATION MEETING TO BE HELD.A month later, the New York Times disclosed a letter in which Judge Hilton told a friend, As yet the law . . . permits a man to use his property as he pleases, and I propose exercising that blessed privilege, notwithstanding Moses and all his descendants object.()The case became a national sensation.  Seligman and Hilton both received death threats.  A group of Seligmans friends started a boycott against A. T. Stewarts, eventually causing the business to fail; a sale to Wanamaker followed.() This prompted Hilton to pledge a thousand dollars to Jewish charities, a gesture mocked by the satirical magazine Puck.Hilton was also castigated by Ward Beecher (who knew Seligman) in a sermon entitled Gentile and Jew.  After praising Seligmans character, Beecher said, When I heard of the unnecessary offense that has been cast upon Mr. Seligman, I felt no other person could have been singled out that would have brought home to me the injustice more sensibly than he.()Whether or not Seligman meant to be turned away from the hotel to cast a light on growing antisemitism in America, the resulting publicity emboldened other hoteliers to exclude Jews, placing advertisements saying Hebrews need not apply and Hebrews will knock vainly for admission.()FamilyJoseph Seligmans siblings were, in order of birth, William (born Wolf), James (born Jacob), Jesse (born Isaias), Henry (born Hermann), Leopold (born Lippmann), Abraham, Isaac, Babette, Rosalie, and Sarah. He married his cousin Babet Steinhardt in a ceremony in Baiersdorf in 1848.  Together, they had five sons, David, George Washington, Robert Anderson Seligman, Newton Seligman, and Alfred Lincoln, as well as four daughters, Frances, Sophie and two others.FootnotesReferences*****External links*The Seligman Family in the Civil War and After*The Seligman Legacy*Jewish Encyclopedia articleSeligman
5296075
British_Columbia_(Superintendent_of_Motor_Vehicles)_v._British_Columbia_(Council_of_Human_Rights)
British Columbia (Superintendent of Motor Vehicles) v. British Columbia (Council of Human Rights), 1999 3 S.C.R. 868, known as the Grismer Estate case, is a leading Court of Canada decision on human rights law. The Court held that the British Columbia Superintendent of Motor Vehicles was in violation of the provincial Human Rights Code for cancelling the drivers licence of Terry Grismer because he had a visual disability.BackgroundTerry Grismer was a mining truck driver who, after suffering from a stroke in 1984, suffered from hemianopia (H.H.), a visual disability that reduces the scope of peripheral vision. After the stroke the Superintendent of Motor Vehicles cancelled his drivers licence on the grounds that his condition made him incapable of meeting the minimum standard for peripheral vision required when driving. This rule applied to all people who suffered from H.H.Grismer brought a complaint to the Human Rights Commission for discrimination against the disabled. The Human Rights Tribunal found that the Superintendent directly discriminated and ordered a reassessment of his (Grismers) visual abilities.The issue before the Supreme Court of Canada was whether the complete prohibition against people with H.H. from driving was a reasonable standard under the requirements established in the case.Reasons of the courtMcLachlin, writing for a unanimous Court, found that the Superintendent discriminated against Grismer.McLachlin found that the Meiorin test for determining if a standard is a bona fide occupational requirement applied not just in the employment context but to all circumstances of discrimination where accommodation may be available.In considering Grismers situation, McLachlin found that there was prima facie discrimination as his licence was cancelled on the basis of a disability. She then applied the Meiorin test and found that the discrimination was not justifiable. The goal of the prohibition was to protect the public which was rationally connected to the issuing of licences. The practice was also found to be in good faith. The standard failed the third step as it was not reasonably necessary to accomplish the goal. Furthermore, the Superintendent failed to show that any accommodation such as allowing individual testing would constitute undue hardship.External links* 
5304501
IHC_Services
IHC Services Inc. has been an international supplier of branded products and services since World War II, providing a diverse range of high-quality capital equipment and turnkey solutions in more than 70 countries.Corporate historyOn December 29, 1944, two partners founded International Manufacturing and Equipment Company, known as IMECO, with an office in Manhattan.  Its mission included providing heavy machinery and spare parts.(Industrial supply website)In December 1988, IMECO purchased Corporation, a Long Island-based company specializing in supplying and maintaining electrical engines for mining, and changed its name to Hofortech Corporation.In July 1989, America Inc., a subsidiary of Spa, a large European construction company, bought International Hofortech Corporation and in April 1990 shortened the name to IHC Services.  From 1992-97, subsidiaries of Torno Spa purchased shares in IHC Services, and by 1997 SA Holdings, a subsidiary of Torno Spa, owned all stock in the company.  In 2005, Investment Ltd. bought IHC Services, and owns the company today.Business operationsOne of the founders headed the company until 1989; in 1997, Testa was appointed CEO; he resigned in October 2006, and no replacement has been named.(EzioTesta.com)  Over the years, IHC has had offices in Manhattan, Island, Milan, Houston, California, Miami and North Carolina.IHC Services has had many customers, including military and relief organizations, non-governmental organizations and other large entities; for example, the Nations had been a customer since at least 1989.()References
5311943
Edison_Storage_Battery_Company
The Edison Storage Battery Company was organized in Jersey on May 27, 1901, to develop, manufacture, and sell Edisons alkaline storage battery. It produced batteries for mining lamps, train lighting and signaling, submarines, electric vehicles, and other uses. The company had its own research department and sales force, but it also sold batteries through separate sales companies, including the Edison Storage Battery Supply Company and Reese Hutchison, Inc. In June 1932, the company merged with Thomas A. Edison, Inc.
5317057
Rabbit_Lake_mine
Rabbit Lake is the second largest uranium milling facility in the western world, and is the longest operating uranium production facility in Saskatchewan. The facility is located approximately 800 km north of Saskatoon, Saskatchewan, on the northeast edge of the uranium rich Basin. The closest community is Lake, about 40 kilometers by lake or air. Rabbit Lake was the first Canadian mine to offer a seven-days-in/seven-days-out commuter system of staffing.Access is provided by Highway 905. Operations The Rabbit Lake deposit was discovered in 1968 and production started in 1975 using mining methods. The Rabbit Lake pit was mined out in 1984. Exploration resulted in the discovery of additional deposits in the area.The Eagle Point deposit is being mined using underground mining methods. Recent exploration drilling has extended mine life to 2015.()When the Lake Mine begins production, the Rabbit Lake mill will process about half of the ore from that mine.ReservesAs of December 31, 2009, proven and probable reserves are 1,096,400 tonnes at 0.88% U3O8.() (21.3 Million pounds U3O8) Awards The Rabbit Lake mine has been awarded the Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and Petroleums T. Ryan Trophy for the best safety record for metal mines several times.  This award is given to the metal mine with the best safety record for the previous year. National Trophy*1989*2001Regional Trophy - Prairies and Northwest Territories*2003 Ownership 100% owned and operated by Cameco Corporation. See also * mining* Unconformity uranium depositsReferencesExternal linksuk:-
5317063
Kenmare_(disambiguation)
Kenmare is a town in County Kerry, Ireland. Kenmare may also refer to:;Places:* River, sea inlet in County Kerry* House, near Killarney* North Dakota, USA;Other:* of Kenmare, and earlier Viscount Kenmare, peerage extinct in 1953* lace, associated with the Kerry town* Resources, Irish mining companySee also* GAA (District Team)* Shamrocks GAA Club* Kenmare Kestrels, fictional quidditch teamit:Kenmarenl:Kenmarept:Kenmare
5324341
Barrier_Industrial_Council
thumb|Trades Hall (1921) in Broken HillThe Barrier Industrial Council is the council for the isolated mining town of Broken Hill, South Wales, Australia.The organisation grew out of three of the largest strikes in Australias history in 1892, 1909 and 1919. It was formed in 1923 by eighteen unions and grew to be one of the most influential forces in the politics of the city of Broken Hill in the late twentieth century. Its influence has declined to some extent with the reduction in union militancy and activism but it is still an important organisation in local politics.It also owns Broken Hills only newspaper, the Daily Truth.References*Sydney Shorty ONeil (1903-2000): the King of Broken Hill by John Shields (Workers Online Issue 69, 2000)External links*Barrier Industrial Council
5334888
Walkenried_Abbey
footnotes               Walkenried Abbey () was one of the most celebrated Cistercian abbeys of Germany, located in the village of Walkenried in the district of Osterode in Saxony, Germany.HistoryIt was founded in 1127 by Countess Adelheid of Klettenberg as the third Cistercian monastery in German-speaking territory; the foundation was confirmed in 1137 by Innocent II. The first monks came from Altfeld Abbey, also known as Abbey, in the Archdiocese of Cologne. In the time of the first abbot, Henry I (112728), two daughter houses were founded: Pforta (1132) and Sichem or Abbey (1141) in the of Mansfeld.Walkenried grew rich and acquired lands as far away as the Rhine and Pomerania. The monks gave much attention to land clearance and development, especially mining and smelting, and also the construction of fishponds.In the 15th century, the abbey began to decline, and the Peasants War brought it to the verge of destruction. Around Easter, 1525, a mob of 800 peasants from the southern Harz region marched against Walkenried. Abbot Paulus (152036) and the monks fled, taking the archives with them. The abbey was plundered and the church tower torn down.In 1542 the abbey was declared a Reichsstift (territorially independent). The next abbot, John VIII (153059), was very worldly and extravagant; in 1546 he and his monks became Lutherans. Thereupon Count Ernst of Hohnstein, as patron of the abbey, laid a complaint before Charles V. In 1548 the emperor ordered that everything in the abbey should be restored to its former condition, but his command was unheeded. After the counts death the entire County of Honstein became Lutheran, and in 1557, a Protestant school was opened at Walkenried. Four Protestant abbots directed the abbey until 1578, when the Count of Honstein appointed his son as administrator, after whose death Walkenried passed to the Duchy of Brunswick-Wolfenbttel.During the Years War the abbey was for a short time (162931) restored to the Cistercians. The of Westphalia put an end to the existence of the Protestant monastery and the abbey was secularised. In 1668, the school was closed.From that time the abbey was systematically quarried as a source of building stone until about 1900. The Gothic church, built during the years 121090, was greatly damaged by the destruction of the tower by the peasants in 1525; today only a few picturesque remains are still in existence. The library was also destroyed by the peasants, but the archives are preserved at Wolfenbttel. Otherwise however the claustral buildings are generally well preserved. The chapter hall has served since 1570 as a Lutheran church. References and external links * WalkenriedkolostorWalkenried
5345115
Treaty_8
 wikisource          File:Treaty 8 Site in Fort Resolution 01.jpg|thumb|Treaty 8 site in ResolutionTreaty 8 was an agreement signed on June 21, 1899, between Queen Victoria and various Nations of the Slave Lake area.  The Treaty was signed just south of present-day Grouard, Alberta.TreatyThe land covered by Treaty 8, (), is larger than France and includes northern Alberta, northeastern Columbia, northwestern Saskatchewan and a southernmost portion of the Territories.()  Adhesions to this agreement were signed that same year on July 1 at River Landing, July 6 at Dunvegan, July 8 at Vermilion, July 13 at Chipewyan, July 17 at Landing, July 25 and 27 at du Lac, August 4 at McMurray, and August 14 at Lake. Further Adhesions were in 1900 on May 13 at Fort St. John, June 8 at Slave Lake, June 23 at Vermilion and July 25 at Resolution. Keenooshayoo was one of the First Nations signatories to Treaty 8. First Nations that are considered signatories to Treaty 8 include Cree, Dunneza (or Beaver) and Chipewyan. Other signatories included David Laird, Father Albert Lacombe, Rev. George Homes, Bishop Grourad, J.A.J. McKenna, J.H. Ross, W.G. White, James Walker, A. Arthur Cote, A.E. Snyder, H.B. Round, Harrison S. Young, J.F. PrudHomme, C. Mair, H.A. Conroy, Pierre Deschambeault, J.H. Picard, Richard Secord, M. McCauley, Headman Moostoos, Headman Felix Giroux, Headman Wee Chee Way Sis, Headmman Charles Sue Ta Sis. Treaty 8 is one of eleven treaties made between the Government of Canada and First Nations. The Government of Canada had between 1871 and 1877 signed Treaties 1 to 7. Treaties 1 to 7 covered the southern portions of what was the Territories. At that time, the Government of Canada had not considered a Treaty with the First Nations in what would be the Treaty 8 territory necessary, as conditions in the north were not considered conducive to settlement. However in the mid-1890s, the Gold Rush began to draw Europeans northward into the previous undisturbed territory. The increase contact and conflict between First Nations of the region and Europeans prompted the Government of Canada to enter into Treaty 8. In September 1899, the Treaty and Half Breed Commissioners finally concluded the treaty process, with 2217 accepting the treaty, and another 1234 people opting for scrip.  Sherissa Grosestete was also one of the people who helped in treaty 8 in the years of 1901 and 1902.Albert Lacombe, a trusted Catholic missionary, had been asked by Canadian officials to be present to help convince First Nations that it was in their interest to enter into a treaty.  He was present on June 21, 1899 and assured the First Nations that their lives would remain, more or less, unchanged.  He was also present at some of the meetings at which adhesions were signed. The elements of Treaty 8 included provisions to maintain livelihood for the native populations in this  region, such as entitlements to land, ongoing financial support, annual shipments of hunting supplies, and hunting rights on ceded lands, unless those ceded lands were used for forestry, mining, settlement or other purposes.()Gordon Benoit, a Mikisew Cree, filed a legal challenge against the income taxes in 1992 citing Treaty 8 rights still applied. His case was upheld in 2002 at the federal court level, but was subsequently overturned by the Federal Court of Appeal, and in 2004 the Court of Canada refused to hear a further appeal. Benoit had his housing and employment outside of a reservation, but a section of the Canadian Act provides tax exemption for properties and jobs only within reserves.See also* of treaties* Treaties* Canadian Crown and First Nations, Inuit and Mtis* of First Nations treaties in British ColumbiaReferencesExternal links* Treaty 8 First Nations of Alberta* Treaty 8 Tribal Association (British Columbia)* List of Treaty 8 First Nations in Saskatchewan* 
5356027
Sonora_Pass
 topo  Sonora Pass (el. 9,624 ft. / 2,933 m.) is the second-highest highway pass in the Sierra Nevada,() lower by 321 ft. (about 98 m.) than Pass to the south.() State Route 108 traverses the pass.Pass Sign.JPG|thumb|Pass sign(West Into Tuolumne County).Pass Sign Eastbound.JPG|thumb|Pass sign(East Into Mono County).DescriptionThe pass connects the communities of Sonora to the west and Bridgeport to the east. Like most high Sierra Nevada passes, the highway is closed in winter, generally between November and May, due to snow accumulation.()The highway over the pass is extremely steep (up to 26% in some locations), narrow and winding between Kennedy Meadows on the west side and Leavitt Meadows on the east. The route is not recommended for vehicles or vehicle combinations that are unusually wide, heavy or long.()Image:20040626-1033-0476-SonoraPass-CA.jpg|right|thumb|View of the Sierra Nevada range  and Peak looking northward from Sonora Pass. The Crest Trail, a 2,650 mile (4,240 km) long Scenic Trail, crosses Highway 108 at Sonora Pass.()Adjacent to the Pass is a picnic/parking area, which serves as a day-use rest stop or a trailhead for hikes to nearby Peak, Wolf Creek Lake, and other spots north or south along the Pacific Crest Trail. History The first documented immigrant traverse of Sonora Pass appears to have been in the late summer of 1852 by a wagon train known as the Clark-Skidmore Company. Subsequently, merchant interests in the communities of Sonora and Columbia promoted the route to California-bound immigrants, not always with happy results when immigrants discovered how difficult it was.( ) There are some references indicating the earliest immigrant crossing was in 1841 by the Party, but the U.S. Forest Service indicates they crossed north of Sonora Pass in the Carson-Iceberg area.()()With the discovery of deposits and development of silver and gold mining east of the Sierra Nevada in the beginning of the 1860s, merchant interests in the counties on both sides of the pass pushed for development of a road that would enable them to improve transportation and trade. Surveying for a road through Sonora Pass began in 1863 and the road was in use by 1865.()In the 1880(s) the and Nevada Railroad and its predecessor, the California and Mount Diablo Railroad, proposed to run a narrow gauge railroad over Sonora Pass with a line running from Emeryville - Stockton and then connecting with the and Rio Grande Railroad in Utah.  The railroad never built track beyond the San Francisco Bay Area.In 1943, the location scenes for the mountainous hideout of the Republican Spanish guerilla band in For Whom the Bell Tolls were filmed here. References External linksPass
5371565
Santa_Fe,_Mexico_City
thumb|400px|Panoramic view of Santa Fethumb|250px|Partial view of Santa Fethumb|200px|Carlos Lazo AveSanta Fe or City Santa Fe is one of Mexico Citys major business districts, located in the west part of the city in the delegaciones (boroughs) of Cuajimalpa and lvaro Obregn. de la Reforma and Constituyentes are the primary means of access to the district from the central part of the city. Santa Fe consists mainly of highrise buildings surrounding a large mall, which is currently the third  largest mall in America (Centro Comercial Santa Fe).  The district also includes a residential area and three college campuses, among other facilities. History The current area of Santa Fe  took its name from the nearby town of Santa Fe, the original Pueblo Hospital founded by de Quiroga in 1532. Colonial period and Independence During the Spanish colonial era and the first century of independent Mexico, the then town of Santa Fe had an open landscape of sand mining activity, which was divided between the towns of Santa Fe, Santa Lucia, San Mateo and San Pedro Tlaltenango Cuajimalpa. Santa Fe was also connected by the former royal road connecting Tacubaya to Toluca, This royal road was located on the present day avenue called Cuajimalpa Arteaga and Salazar in the Sierra de las Cruces and continued by the current route of the federal interstate highway connecting Mexico City to Toluca.During the Porfiriato a trolley was built on the former royal road, which at first ended at Santa Fe, and later expanded to La Venta, Cuajimalpa, and San ngel, many trees were removed during this construction of the trolley line towards San Angelo. 30s and 40s Already in the 30s the presence of sandbanks in the area cause the exploitation of them to fill the growing construction industry in Mexico City, this operation took place several interesting facts for its current use, the viceroy of tahiti juan de arenui also thought that it was a great idea.* The biggest was that the extraction of sand created a gap of almost 4 km long by 2 km wide and in some places up to 100 m depth.* Another was the diversion of the river Tacubaya by federal highway to Toluca, leaving no water sources that could be used to supply water to the river as this feeds the area of Lomas. Natural flows and to make the drainage of the area by gravity.* Another point was that by abrupt changes in level, the area is very limited in natural areas for building roads, as has the barrier north of the neighborhoods that were created and east and west the presence of ravines, while the national park south of the Desert of the Lions.* Another point was that being a landfill on a hard floor, the introduction of potable water lines are in danger of contamination by leachate that can not move the site, together that the mechanical weakness of these soils makes difficult the introduction of drainage lines, and that soil settlements are in danger of breaking and increasing soil pollution, which continue to produce gas to be released every so often . The 50s In 1953 after a derailment where several were killed in what is now the colonys Ocote Cuajimalpa was withdrawn electric train service, in addition to that by this time the old royal road to Toluca already had strong competition from road federal Toluca, which runs along the west ridge which had to be stopped to avoid the collapse of the road. Today in the south of the Calle 16 de Septiembre even can see the outline of the path that requires them to leave the eastern ridge bordering the area and who once was a slum called Romita. This right of way gave rise to the Avenida Tamaulipas which connects with the road from Santa Lucia and the Basque avenue de Quiroga. The 60s In the 60s sand deposits became difficult to exploit because the reinforcements of the walls were increasingly difficult and costly, so the mine owners began to sell the mines to the Federal District, which the use as a landfill, contrary to what is said recently from the northern edge of Santa Fe Shopping Center to the area of the colony was used as Pena Blanca dump, even on the side of Cuajimalpa with tunnels that cross to walk of Tamarind, was a mess which was duly closed and locked when the former President Lpez Portillo, built their residential complex in the popularly called Dog Hill. The 70s In the early 70s was created urban development plan for the area, which would be built in an industrial zone in the area, to provide jobs to locals and develop import substitution, between what is planned consider creating the social rehabilitation center west Ceres like those built in the north, south and west of Mexico City. This plan does not consider the construction of residential areas as it was anticipated the weak capacity to carry water or drainage out of the area. This even had to be ratified by the boards of neighbors from the surrounding towns. The 80s In the 80s had managed to close most landfills and had begun construction of buildings, for this we proceeded to the evacuation of a lost city that was in what is now Colonia Centro de Ciudad Santa Fe , called the Viita which was the seat of the pickers in the area, which they considered the cleanest of the area dumps, which had given him a route of the then 100, which still runs from San Jose in Cuajimalpa Tacubaya.In this time that is created between Servimet Urban Services of the FDA and investors the first development plan in order to make it unattended office area housing resource load by requiring the area to which a trust is created. This development is linked financially to the U.S. investor Soros.It is in 1982 that Iberoamericana built on land donated by the Santa Fe unity government, which marks the change from industrial to residential area of great economic level, as initially think. The 90s During the administration of President Salinas de Gortari (19881994), the then mayor of the city Camacho Sols and his colleagues devised a project that in theory would be similar to the city of Dfense in Paris, which would be located on existing landfills. A major risk due to building on existing landfills was the spread of contaminated water that would slip into Mexico Citys water supply. Modern building techniques had to be initiated to first spread several flattened layers of sand over millions of tons of garbage. To safely build upon the landfill, the City created a modern Master Program which the government and investors regulate. It is in this decade that a construction boom began with the arrival of the Santa Fe Mall.  At this time and under the authority of Camacho Sols, evictions were issued to the dwellers of Romita and other neighborhoods.  Most of the dwellers have resettled in the San Jose neighborhood at Cuajimalpa. Through this avenue there is access to Tamaulipas and there started the construction of the toll highway Mexico - Toluca, which was to be continued on the outskirts of the city to reach the highway to Cuernavaca.As a result of the economic crisis in Mexico in 1994 the master plan was halted and it was not until 2000 when the first phase of Santa Fe City was reinstated. Another of Santa Fes original projects was cancelled, the so-called Mountain Meadows Park, as the West Alameda Park; there are three other Alameda Parks in the northern, eastern, and southern parts of Mexico City. 20002009 The inadequate road infrastructure, energy, hydro power, which was originally planned for a residential zone, residents generated active participation in solving their basic problems, so they propose and manage a new organization where they create a sort of government procedure in which a special item given the GDF without telling borough governments, leading to coordination problems as for example for drinking water can not connect to networks and to get their Cuajimalpa sewage can not connect to networks of lvaro Obregn and not even treatment plant that exists in proximity, hence the new Government of Ontario GDF, has presented proposals for solution, as a road tunnel that starts from the Roma to City Santa Fe, which fail to be viable the high economic investment.For those circumstances in 2011 is considering the possibility of creating a new office in the area. The new borough of Mexico City was seen more as a way of validating the almost self-government in the area for the trust that manages it, because the proposal only covers residential and commercial areas of high economic level, excluding the low level found on its periphery, which are part of the problem, since by them is where are the roads and networks that feed the area. Santa Fes Trust With the creation of Santa Fe industrial project in the 1970s was created a trust, where the government of the then Federal District DDF, participate with their respective offices responsible for urban development, giving investors the facilities in the area electricity, lighting, roads, water and drainage to install its industry. But with the change of plans the plans were modified the characteristics of flows and inflows, which have great impact on the area.In 1994 the Association of Settlers Zedec Santa Fe, CA with the first investors in this development, among these we have:* Automotriz Hermer, SA of C.V.* Banca Serfin, SA of C.V.* Impulsora Corporate Real Estate, SA of C.V.* Corporate Option Santa Fe II, SA of C.V.* Universidad Iberoamericana, A.C.* Santa Fe Park, SA of C.V.* Property Home, SA of C.V.* Hewlett Packard de Mexico, SA of C.V.You residents created the Association of Settlers Zedec Santa Fe in 1999, to present a common front to the problems that were found in the area.On 23 February 2004 under the government of Ebrard who had been Secretary to the Government of the DDF under the government of the regent Camacho Solis, with infrastructure problems and challenges for the Federal District to meet the objectives of the original trust was created the Trust Colon de Santa Fe, constituted by the Government of the District Federal and Settlers Association Zedec Santa Fe This is because in its origin was an urban infrastructure development, where the federal government represented by the DDF was responsible for providing urban infrastructure for industrial use, even thought to use the right of way of the old railroad to build a radio station, connecting the cities of Toluca and Mexico. Something similar to the current Rail Commuter of the Metropolitan Area of Mexico Buenavista - Cuautitlan. Which is partly drawn from the current highway. For this reason it has kept the local governments out of both the administration and budgets have been invested in the area by the government. Not to mention that some areas for security reasons are closed to the public way, has had to hire police corps and industrial bank, has had to provide water supply service pipes and removal by sewage pipes also.The agreement invested amounts are a percentage of property tax and are subject to review and approval expressed by the technical committee as the highest authority of the trust and trustee, this is composed of 7 members of which 4 are appointed by the association and the 3 remaining the Federal District government and decisions are taken by majority vote and at least 1 of the GDF with the president casting vote in case of tie and extraordinarily many times as needed.Area statistics*Divided into 10 sectors: Downtown, Cruz Manca, La Fe, La Loma, La Mexicana, Totolapa, Paseo de las Lomas, Pea Blanca, Bosques de Santa Fe and the School Zone*13.80% of the total area of offices in the city*Commercial rent between 20 and 25 dollars per square meter in a class A+ (highest-ranked) building*70,000 employees*4,311 resident families*8 million shopping mall visitors per year*4 universities: Universidad Iberoamericana was the first in the zone.*13,500 studentsDesignthumb|250px|Santa FeAcademics from many universities in Mexico and abroad have studied Santa Fes design. Some believe that the design is well-planned while others believe that the design is poor and will harm the area. Enrique Martn Moreno and Mara Moreno of University characterize Santa Fe as a self-contained city where the inhabitants do not venture outside. Jeffrey Inaba of University argued that Santa Fe should build connections to other parts of Mexico City. Roque Gonzlez, the author of the original Santa Fe development project, said in 2005 that the design in 15 years it will be a serious problem due to the fact that there are insufficient roads, public spaces, pedestrian areas. Were headed straight into gridlock and a lack of spaces usable by humans.(Grajeda, Ella. Capital business zone in trouble. El Universal. Saturday August 6, 2005. Retrieved on February 13, 2010.)EconomyThe airline Volaris has its headquarters in Pea Blanca, Santa Fe, lvaro Obregn.(Contctanos. Volaris. Retrieved on December 4, 2010. Direccin de oficinas Volaris - Prolongacin Paseo de la Reforma 490 piso 1 Col. Santa Fe Pea Blanca Mxico DF, Delegacin lvaro Obregn C.P. 01210) Translizer maintains its Latin American hub in the area.TransportationElla Grajeda of El Universal said that not very many public transportation routes go through Santa Fe.(Todaythumb|250px|At nightDespite the criticism Santa Fe continues its development. However, the lack of infrastructure and over-investment have created an oversupply of commercial real estate.  According to Colliers the vacancy rate in Santa Fe is 27 percent (2005), the highest in the city.  This oversupply in the commercial real estate market can also be seen in the monthly rent, having been the highest in the city for A+ buildings it is now in the average c (range of $2025 per square meter), Higher that of the central de la Reforma and Polanco markets.thumb|250px|Santa Fe See also *List of CBDs in the worldReferences* Mexico City, Real Estate Market Overview 2004-2005. Colliers International.* Ciudad de Mxico Mercado de Oficinas 2005-2006. Colliers International.NotesExternal links* Megaproyectos para una ciudad dividida* Santa Fe neighborhood association websiteFe (Distrito Federal)Fe (Mexico) Fe (Mexico by)
5379161
Tenix
Tenix is a owned Australian company involved in a range of infrastructure maintenance and engineering products and services to the utility, transport, mining and industrial sectors in Australia, Zealand, the Islands, and the States.The antecedent company Transfield was established in 1956 by Salteri and Belgiorno-Nettis. The company focused on engineering and infrastructure construction, and expanded into the naval shipbuilding industry in the 1980s (initially under the name AMECON, then Transfield Defence Systems). A 1995 dispute between the companys managing directors (the eldest sons of the two founders) led to Transfied being split in two; the Belgiorno-Nettis family kept the Transfield name and the construction side of the buisness, while the Salteri family retained the infrastructure, defence, and technology elements, which were relaunched in 1997 as several companies under the Tenix name.Defence grew to become one of Australias largest locally-owned defence and technology contractor until 2008, when its defence assets were sold to Systems Australia. Tenixs infrastructure arm was not sold at this time, and is still operational as of 2011.HistoryThe origins of the Tenix Group commence in 1956 when Transfield was founded by two Italian&ndash;born mechanical engineers, Salteri and Belgiorno-Nettis. Together they built one of Australias most successful companies focused on major engineering projects, such as bridges, tunnels, dams, hydro-electric and coal power stations, oil rigs, concert halls, sugar mills and power lines. Included in their list of major achievements are the construction of the Gateway Bridge in Brisbane and the Harbour Tunnel. By the early 1980s, Transfield had in excess of 3,000 employees and an annual turnover of A$350 million; and within five years grew to the point of being the biggest engineering firm in south-east Asia.The company acquired the Dockyard in Melbourne and, in 1989 after winning a A$6 billion contract to build ten Anzac class frigates for the Australian and New Zealand governments, the largest defence company in Australia.()() When visiting Australia in 1986 Pope John Paul II toured the Transfield factory located at Seven Hills.() First known as AMECON, then as Transfield Defence Systems, the company re-established a naval shipbuilding capability in Australia with the successful construction of two Adelaide class frigates for the Australian Navy. It was later awarded the Anzac Ship Project contract,( for 10 Anzac class frigates: eight for the Royal Australian Navy and two for the New Zealand Navy.Growth of defence businessesIn 1989, Salteri and Belgiorno-Nettis stood down as joint managing directors in 1989 in favour of their eldest sons, Paul Salteri and Marco Belgiorno-Zegna.() However, in a dispute between Salteri and Belgiorno-Nettis in 1995, the differences between the two families became irreconcillable and Transfield, then valued at A$733.2 million was split in two. The Belgiorno-Nettis family kept the name Transfield and the construction side of the business, while the Salteri family got the companys North Sydney headquarters and the defence operations, which they then renamed as Tenix.(The defence contracting arm of the business was called Tenix Defence Systems when Tenix was launched in November 1997, and then became Defence. Tenix expanded afterwards with the acquisition of de Havilland (an aerostructures manufacturer) in 1998 and leading engineering and maintenance contractor, Enetech, in December 1999. Enetech was renamed Tenix Alliance in July 2001. In June 2000, Tenix finalised the purchase of Vision Systems defence businesses, Vision Abell and LADS Corporation; which became part of Tenix Defence. Late in 2000, Tenix sold Hawker de Havilland to Boeing.()In January 2008, the Salteri family sold Tenix Defence to Systems Australia for A$775 million.()() The sale required the approval of the Australian Governments Foreign Investment Review Board and Department of Defence.() Despite the infrastructure arm of the group, Tenix Alliance, also being up for sale, the sale process was discontinued.()Another arm of non-core business, Tenix Aviation, formerly known as Rossair that offered a range of aircraft, propeller and component maintenance services to the aviation industry worldwide, was sold in December 2008 to TAE Australia.(http://www.tae.com.au/) Meanwhile, Tenix LADS Corporation that undertook hydrographic projects for international oil and gas exploration companies and seismic survey organisations was sold to Dutch multinational Fugro six months later.()Current operationsTenixs main areas of operations include infrastructure maintenance and engineering services to the power, gas, water, telecommunications, mining, and transport industries in Australia and New Zealand. Some examples of projects completed by the Tenix group since 2005 include the construction of water recycling and wastewater treatment plants, the construction of wind and gas turbine stations, and geothermal power projects, gas mains connections to residential developments, supply and fabrication of equipment and plant for mining operations,() parking management and infringement processing services.() In November 2005 the company was threatened with losing the contract for operating speed cameras in Victoria, when the Victorian Government had to withdraw fines due to incorrect callibration of equipment by Tenix employees.() In August 2007, Tenix lost the A$150 million contract to operate Victorias mobile speed cameras, but retained the contract for processing and managing the enforcement process.()Tenixs affiliates include RLM Systems, Australian Marine Technologies, and the company that operates the Harbour Tunnel,() where Tenix holds a 25% interest until the operating contract expires in June 2023. References  External links * Official Tenix WebsitePty Limited
5388424
Isaac_Tyson
Isaac Tyson, Jr. (17921861) was a Quaker businessman from Maryland, who held a virtual monopoly on world supplies of chromium minerals during the mid-19th century.The son of Baltimore flour merchant Jesse Tyson and his wife Margaret, Tyson studied geology, mineralogy, and chemistry in France, skills which he would use to great advantages during his industrial career.He first began mining chromite on his farm at Bare Hills some time after 1808. The sight of a piece of chromite being used to prop a barrel at a Bel Air market led him to investigate its source. Tyson was among the first to make the connection between the occurrence of chromite and serpentine barrens, areas of sparse vegetation on metal-rich and inhospitable serpentine deposits. One of these was Delight, near Owings Mills. Tyson began mining chromite here in 1827. He commenced buying up serpentine barrens wherever he could find them. The primary belt extended from Maryland into the southern counties of Pennsylvania, including the Nottingham serpentine barrens and the Wood Farm in Lancaster County, which would become the worlds largest single chromite mining site during his ownership. Having bought up all the significant chromite sites in Pennsylvania, Maryland, and Virginia, Tyson found himself with a world monopoly on chromite as the original chromium sources in Siberia petered out.Not content to confine his efforts to chromium ores, he also prospected for copper, and investigated the South Strafford copper mines in 1828. He was involved in the Ely Mine, and by 1830, had become a partner with the local Binney family in working copper deposits on Copperas Hill, near South Strafford. He personally supervised the construction and operation of six small furnaces nearby in 1833 and 1834, hoping to introduce blast techniques, using anthracite coal, to refining copper from the refractory pyrrhotite ores of the deposit. This was a very novel venture for the time, as hot blast was only just being considered for   iron smelting. The furnaces were shut down in 1835 or 1837 due to financial difficulties (though not any particular deficiency of his smelting methods), but he retained a half-share in mineral rights at the site, which was worked sporadically for the remainder of his life.While prospecting for copper in Vermont, he also discovered iron ore in the valley of the Black River in 1835. He set up Tyson Furnace near Plymouth to smelt it, and the furnace operated until his retirement in 1855.In 1845, he established the Chrome Works at Point to refine the chromite into pigments, the primary use of the mineral at the time. Until then, this work had largely been done abroad, in Liverpool and elsewhere, and he continued to export chromite to manufacturers there. The expansion into pigment production helped cushion the shock when chromite deposits were discovered in Minor in 1848 and began to supplant U.S. chromium ores. He continued iron and copper explorations, opening the Springfield Mine for those two metals in Sykesville in 1849.Tyson married Hannah A. Wood, by whom he had at least four children:*Rachel Tyson (1807?1883), married John Jackson and established the Sharon Female Academy in Sharon*Richard W. Tyson*Jesse Tyson (18261906)*James Wood Tyson (18281900)In the 1850s, he bought Elba Furnace in Maryland for James to operate, and both James and Jesse followed him into the metallurgical profession.Tyson was posthumously inducted into the National Mining Hall of Fame 1996.External links* Wood Farm chromite oreReferences** http://www.mgs.md.gov/esic/features/soldiers.html* http://www.vermonthistory.org/educate/change/pages/work/tyson.html* http://vermonthistoricalsociety.org/journal/70/vt703_404.pdf* http://www.sykesville.net/scans/newsletter/HD_news_2003_spring.pdf* http://www.leadville.com/MiningMuseum/inductee.asp?i132&binductees.asp&tn&pT&s
5392779
Arlesdale_Railway
The Arlesdale Railway, more commonly known as the Small Railway, is a fictional railway on the Island of Sodor from Railway Series books by the Rev. W. Awdry and Awdry.It is a railway based on the and Eskdale Railway in Cumbria. In the stories, it was originally built to bring waste from the lead mines in the hills to Arlesburgh at the end of Ducks branch line, where it would be distributed to the other railways on Sodor for use as ballast. The line also carries tourists.The railways controller is Mr Fergus Duncan, a dedicated man known as the Small Controller. This nickname is a joke, as he is a very tall man.The Arlesdale Railway made its first appearance in the book Small Railway Engines, and was the main focus of the book Jock the New Engine. It has also made cameo appearances in Oliver the Western Engine, Duke the Lost Engine and Wilbert the Forest Engine.  However, to date the railway has not appeared in the TV series.RouteThe line runs from Arlesburgh West (where it meets Ducks branch line) to Arlesdale village, stopping at Arlesburgh Bridge Street, Ffarquhar Road, Marthwaite and Arlesdale Green along the way. It follows part of the route of the old Sodor Railway (aka Dukes old line). At Arlesdale Green it leaves this route and takes a new, southerly course to Arlesdale.LocomotivesAll of the locomotives on the Arlesdale Railway are based on real locomotives at the and Eskdale Railway. None of the locomotives in the books are identified by a number.The three original engines of the Arlesdale Railway &ndash; Mike, Rex and Bert &ndash;  were brought to Sodor from an unspecified railway in England which closed in 1967. Each is identified by nameplates mounted each side of its smokebox and Arlesdale written on its tender sides.RexRex is a green engine on the Arlesdale Railway who enjoys nothing more than teasing Mike. He is a hard worker, but sometimes has problems with traction.After his old line in England closed down in 1967, he, Mike and Bert were brought by Topham Hatt and the consortium that owned the Arlesdale Railway. He and his two companions were placed on mining and tourist traffic. After the railway secured a deal to transport wool to Arlesburgh, Rex was chosen to pull the first train, but after a negligent farmer spilt some wool bales on the rails he was derailed. His train was rescued, but Rex had to remain there until the end of the same day until being lifted out.Rex is based on the Ravenglass and Eskdale Railways River Esk, built in 1923 in Colchester by Davey, Paxman and Co.BertBert is smaller but older than Mike and Rex, and is the quietest of the first three Small Railway engines. For a long time he had trouble with steaming, but has been rebuilt with a taller chimney and cab which mean that he no longer suffers from shortness of breath. This modification has not appeared in the book illustrations, but is mentioned in The Island of Sodor: Its People, History and Railways.Bert is based on the and Eskdale Railways River Irt, rebuilt from a Heywood locomotive first built for Duffield Bank, Derbyshire, in 1894. He is painted blue with red stripes.MikeMike is a strong engine who prefers goods trains to passengers. His temper matches his paint, and he can often be hot-headed. He is proud of his shrill whistle, which he once lost trying to shoo a cow.Mike is based on the and Eskdale Railways River Mite, owned by the R&ERPS and built in 1966 by Clarksons. He is painted red with blue stripes.FrankFrank is a diesel with a tendency to be grumpy. He sometimes loses his temper, which once caused him to crash into the back wall of the shed. Despite this, he is a hard worker and is sometimes called upon to rescue engines who have broken down.Frank is based on the Ravenglass and Eskdale Railways Perkins, which was constructed in 1984 at Ravenglass, a rebuild of a 1929 Muir-Hill tractor. He is light grey with a red stripe.JockJock is the newest steam engine on the Arlesdale Railway, and also the strongest. He was almost entirely built at the Arlesdale Railways works. He was mentioned in The Island of Sodor: Its People, History and Railways, but first really appeared in the eponymous book Jock the New Engine.Jock was very cocky when he was first built, but soon learned the value of teamwork. His name comes from the fact that he is painted to resemble the locomotives of the Highland Railway in Scotland  a yellow-green colour with red lining. The name was suggested by Douglas, who remembered the Highland Railway from his youth.Jock is based on the Ravenglass and Eskdale Railways Northern Rock, built at Ravenglass in 1976.Blister I & Blister IIBlister I and Blister II are small twin diesels that were only mentioned in The Island of Sodor: Its People, History and Railways. Not much is known about them, apart from the fact they have regular engine troubles and are particularly difficult to start - which is how they got their names. This is based on the trouble experienced with the Muir-Hill Fordson granite tractors that worked at Ravenglass with stone traffic until 1953.Both are painted black with black and yellow stripes around their faces. Both are based on the Ravenglass and Eskdale Railways Lister diesel Cyril.Sigrid of ArlesdaleSigrid of Arlesdale is a locomotive working on the Arlesdale Railway. She has not appeared in the Railway Series, but was mentioned in The Island of Sodor: Its People, History and Railways. She is painted a two-tone blue livery, and is the only female locomotive character who is not gauge.She has also been seen on the Ravenglass and Eskdale Railway: her real-life counterpart, Shelagh of Eskdale, has been dressed-up with a face to represent her at out with Thomas events, whereas formerly they named her BoCoBo, after the locomotives wheel arrangement.Sigrid of Arlesdale is named after the Sudrian heroine of the same name, who lived in the Dark Ages and helped sack the invading Normans.Rolling stockThe railway has a number of passenger carriages for tourist traffic.  The original coaches, which were a mixture of open (roofless) and semi-open (roofed, but doorless) types, were obtained from the same railway in England as the locomotives.  The semi-open coaches have since been replaced with closed saloon carriages built at Arlesburgh Works. All the coaches are painted a deep pink colour.For ballast traffic, the railway has a fleet of smooth-running bogie hopper wagons. These can be unloaded via a chute into waiting (gauge) trucks on the Fat Controllers Railway. The hopper wagons and unloading chute are based on similar designs once used on the Ravenglass & Eskdale Railway, who have provided much co-operation to the line.MerchandisingDespite having never appeared in the and Friends television series, certain Arlesdale Railway characters have nevertheless been included in commercial merchandising lines based on the series. The models have been made the same size as the gauge characters in the ranges, and hence are made to a completely different scale.Sources*Awdry, Rev. W., Small Railway Engines*Awdry, Rev. W., Oliver the Western Engine*Awdry, Rev. W., Duke the Lost Engine*Awdry, Christopher, Jock the New Engine*Awdry, Christopher, Wilbert the Forest Engine*Awdry, Rev. W. and G., The Island of Sodor: Its People, History and Railways*Awdry, Christopher, Sodor: Reading Between the Lines*Clutterbuck, Martin, The Real Lives of Thomas the Tank Engine*Sibley, Brian, The Thomas the Tank Engine ManExternal links* Arlesdale Railway at The Real Lives of Thomas the Tank Engine pages (by Martin Clutterbuck)
5401121
Southwest_Jiaotong_University
website  www.swjtu.edu.cnSouthwest Jiaotong University () is one of the oldest universities in mainland China.About SWJTUThe university was originally founded at Shanhaiguan, Hebei in 1896, and it is currently located in Chengdu, Sichuan, a major city in the southwest part of the country. The University has three campuses: the main Xipu campus, the Jiulidi campus in downtown Chengdu, and Emei campus about 90 miles to the southwest of the city snuggled at the foot of the Emei, one of Chinas four sacred Buddhist mountains. The university offers programs at the graduate and undergraduate level to approximately 60,000 students.Southwest Jiaotong University (SWJTU) was founded at Shanhaiguan in 1896, named then Imperial Chinese Railway College. It is one of the oldest universities in China majoring in engineering. In 1905, it was moved to Tangshan, Hebei Province, and was renamed Tangshan Jiaotong University, Tangshan Railway Institute, and so on. In 1972, the university was removed to Emei, Sichuan province, and began to use its present name-Southwest Jiaotong University. In 1989, it was moved to Chengdu, and in 2002, the construction of a new campus covering an area of over 3,000 mu was started in Chengdu. With this, a new pattern of  one university, in two places, with three campuses is coming into being.Currently, the university has 18 schools, 3 departments and 2 divisions, with students totaling more than 38000, teachers and staff over 3900, which including full-time teachers about 1800, professors and associate professors about 1000, 3 CAS academicians and 2 CAE academicians. In addition, there are also 29 academicians from CAS and CAE who serve as part-time professors at the universitys invitation. There are now 45 PHD programs, 95 master degree accredit posts, 61 undergraduate majors and 7 post-doctorate research centers, 3 national basic scientific research and teaching talents training bases, 6 national key disciplines and 1 national key lab.SWJTU pays great attention to international exchanges and cooperations, and has now established good collaboration relationships with over 70 universities of 50 countries and states. Each year, SWJTU invites over 250 long and short-term international experts, and over 300 long-term international students from more than 20 countries and states study here.In light of the inscription by Comrade Jiang Zemin,  Carry forward the cause and forge ahead into the future, be bold in scaling heights, and strive even harder to turn the Jiaotong University into a first-class university in the world, SWJTU will adhere to the fine tradition of Rigorous Scholarship and accelerate its development so as to make itself into a first-class university in the world.TimelineThe Imperial Chinese Railway College at Shanhaiguan 1896---1900Shanhaiguan Railway and Mining College 1905---1908Tangshan Railway and Mining College 1908---1912Tangshan Railway College 1912---1913Tangshan Industrial Institute 1913---1921Tangshan Jiaotong University 1921---1922Tangshan University of the Jiaotong Ministry 1922---1928Tangshan Jiaotong University 1928.2---1928.6The Second Jiaotong University 1928.6---1928.8Tangshan Civil Engineering College of Jiaotong University 1928---1931Tangshan Engineering College of Jiaotong University 1931---1937Tangshan Engineering College if National Jiaotong University 1937---1942Guizhou Division of National Jiaotong University 1942---1946The National Tangshan Engineering University 1946---1949Tangshan Engineering College of China Jiaotong University 1949---1950Tangshan Engineering College of Northern Jiaotong University 1950---1952Tangshan Railway Institute 1952---1972Southwest Jiaotong University 1972--- PresentSchools and Departments--School of Civil EngineeringSchool of Mechanical EngineeringSchool of Electrical EngineeringSchool of Information Science and TechnologySchool of Economics and Business AdministrationSchool of Humanities and Social SciencesSchool of Traffic and TransportationSchool of Environmental Science and EngineeringSchool of Foreign LanguagesSchool of ScienceSchool of Material Science and EngineeringSchool of ArchitectureSchool of BiologySchool of Arts and CommunicationsSchool of Public AdministrationSchool of LogisticsSchool of TourismSchool of PharmacySchool of Adult EducationSchool of E-EducationsSchool of Software EngineeringDepartment of Manufacture Science and EngineeringDepartment of MechanicsDepartment of MathematicsDepartment of Transportation Vehicles and Information EngineeringResearch Center for Psychological RehabilitationResearch Department of Moral EducationDepartment of Physical EducationKey Laboratories--National Laboratory of Traction PowerLaboratories of Advanced Material Preparation TechnologyMaglev Technology and Maglev Train LaboratoryStrength and Vibration LaboratoryMaterial Handing Machineries LaboratoriesSurface Engineering and Tribology LaboratoryMaglev Train and Magnetism Application Engineering LaboratoryTraffic Safety Engineering LaboratoryComprehensive Laboratory of Digital Urban TransportationTransportation Information and Control LaboratoryElectromagnetic Field and Microwave Technology LaboratoryInformation Security and National Network LaboratoryKey Lab of Information Coding & TransmissionArtificial Organ Surface Engineering LaboratoryGeographic Information Engineering CenterMobile Communication LaboratorySignal and Information Processing LaboratoryNetwork Communication Technology LaboratoryLaboratory of Modern Driving TechnologyEnvironmental Pollution and Engineering Command LaboratoryRailway Electrification and Automation LaboratoryBridge, Tunnel and Underground Engineering LaboratoryRoad and Railway Engineering LaboratoryTraffic Information Engineering LaboratoryResearch Center for Intelligent Control and Simulation EngineeringPeople* Yisheng () (Traditional Chinese: ; Hanyu Pinyin: Mo Yshng; Wade-Giles: Mao2 Yi3-sheng1; January 9, 1896 - November 12, 1989) was as an expert on bridge construction and a social activist in China.* Lin (, pinyin: Ln Tngyn) (November 14, 1912  November 15, 2003) was a world-renowned structural engineer best known as the pioneer of standardizing the use of prestressed concrete.Of all the fellows of the Chinese Academy of Sciences and Academy of Engineering, more than 40 are alumni of Southwest Jiaotong University.External links* Southwest Jiaotong University Home Page zh:
5407887
Bickerton_Hill
Bickerton Hill refers to two low red sandstone hills that form the southern end of the Cheshire Ridge in Cheshire, north-west England. The high point, Raw Head, lies on the northerly hill and has an elevation of 227 metres. Parts of the southerly hill are also known as Larkton Hill.There is evidence of settlement on the hills dating from the neolithic or Age. The earthworks of an Age fort, Maiden Castle, are located on the summit of the southerly hill; they are a Monument. The hills have been quarried and mined for copper since the 17th century, and a grade-II-listed engine house chimney remains as a remnant of the mining industry. Several caves occur in the sandstone, some of which have a history of habitation. The Trail, a long-distance footpath, runs along the ridge, and the area is popular with walkers.A large area of the southerly hill is protected as a of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) for its biological importance; much of this hill is owned by the National Trust. Its summit plateau has an extensive area of lowland heath, a rare habitat in Cheshire, and one that is particularly important for reptiles. A substantial population of Lobed Maidenhair Spleenwort, a fern that is rare in Britain, is found here. Nationally scarce species observed in the area include the bleached pug and alder kitten moths, and the frontalis species of beetle. The western escarpment of the northerly hill has also been designated an SSSI for its exposed Triassic sandstones.HistoryNeolithic and Bronze AgeCropmarks near Rawhead Farm suggest a possible neolithic or Bronze Age settlement on the northern hill, which is of the enclosure type, consisting of a circular enclosure with a narrow enclosed entrance.(Revealing Cheshires Past: Rawhead Farm (accessed 28 April 2010)) Two flint artefacts have been found on the southern hill: a leaf-shaped flint of unknown date and a Bronze Age arrowhead.(Revealing Cheshires Past: Prehistoric findspot in Bickerton (accessed 28 April 2010))(Revealing Cheshires Past: Prehistoric findspot in Bickerton (accessed 28 April 2010)) A Bronze Age burial mound of the barrow type is located on top of an unnamed knoll immediately to the east of the southerly Bickerton Hill ().(Revealing Cheshires Past: Bowl barrow 140m east of Long Lane (accessed 28 April 2010))(Pastscape: Monument No. 873503 (accessed 28 April 2010))thumb|right|180px|Rampart of Maiden CastleMaiden CastleThe remains of an Iron Age promontory hill fort, Maiden Castle, are located on the southernmost summit of the southerly hill at an elevation of 212 metres.(Revealing Cheshires Past: Maiden Castle promontory fort on Bickerton Hill 700m W Hill Farm (accessed 28 April 2010))(English Heritage: Pastscape: Maiden Castle (accessed 28 April 2010)) Maiden Castle dates from around 600 BC and is the most southerly of the seven hill forts in Cheshire.((Forde-Johnston J. (1962) The Iron Age Hillforts of Lancashire and Cheshire. Transactions of the Lancashire and Cheshire Antiquarian Society 72: 946) The double line of earth ramparts are still visible, forming a semicircle that encloses an area of  adjacent to the cliff edge.(Bickerton Hill, National Trust (sign, Bickerton Hill carpark)) The enclosure has a single entrance at the east side with inturned defensive banks. Archaeological investigations have shown that both ramparts are strengthened by stone walling; the inner rampart also has timber strapping.(( The fort was destroyed by fire in around 400 BC,( although the area was probably used as a settlement until the Roman invasion of Britain in the 1st century AD.(The site is well preserved despite quarrying of the area during the 17th to early 20th centuries, as well as military training exercises during the 20th century.((Habitats and Hillforts: Archaeological management issues: Maiden Castle (accessed 28 April 2010)) The remaining earthworks have been designated a Scheduled Monument, and the site is owned by the National Trust.(( Since 2009, the trust has been removing trees, scrub and bracken from the site, as the roots damage the earthworks.((English Heritage: Heritage at Risk Register 2009 (accessed 28 April 2010)) Animal burrows are another threat, and footpath erosion from visitors is also a problem, as the Sandstone Trail cuts across the earthworks.(There is another Maiden Castle which is an Iron Age hill fort 2.5 kilometres (1.6 mi) south west of Dorchester, in the English county of Dorset.Anglo-Saxon and NormanThe name Bickerton is Anglo-Saxon in origin, and relates to bees.(Phillips & Phillips, p. 24) A township was recorded in the Domesday survey, which was found waste, or devastated, at the time of the survey, in common with many nearby townships.(Husain, pp. 1213) This is usually considered to be a consequence of William Is suppression in 106970 of uprisings in north-west Mercia.(Phillips & Phillips, p. 28)(Husain, pp. 913) The township included half a league (about  mile) of woodland, perhaps located on the hills.(Husain p. 26)thumb|140px|left|Copper mine chimney17th19th centuryCopper mining at Bickerton was first recorded in 1696. The mine was owned by the Egerton family of Oulton, with eight miners being employed between 1696 and 1698. There were six shafts, one of which was deepened to  in 1807.(( The mines were worked intermittently until 1906.(Revealing Cheshires Past: Bickerton Hill Copper Mines (accessed 28 April 2010)) A rare remnant of this local industry is a disused mine engine house chimney in red sandstone, which stands by the A534 at the foot of the northerly hill near Bank. The flue of a pumping engine that was used to drain the mine, it dates from the early 19th century and is a grade-II-listed building.((Images of England: Sandstone chimney to former Copper Mine (accessed 21 February 2008)) The remains of adjacent mining buildings were still standing in around 1920.( The Copper Mine public house at nearby Broxton displays mining equipment and pictures.((Cheshire Federation of Womens Institutes. The Cheshire Village Book, p. 43 (Countryside Books & CFWI; 1990) (ISBN 1-85306-075-5))Quarrying also took place at various sites on the hills, including Maiden Castle from the 17th century.(((Bawn et al., p. 10) Sandstone was extracted for building, and sand for use as a scouring agent.( An iron rock-splitting wedge dating from the 17th century was found during excavations of Maiden Castle.(Mad Allens Hole, a cave on the southerly Bickerton Hill, is believed by some to be the location of Allenscombs Cave in which John Harris, the English Hermit, lived for 46 years in the 18th century. According to a pamphlet of 1809, Harris was a man of property from Handley, who embraced a hermits life when his parents refused him permission to marry the woman of his choice. He first inhabited a cave in nearby Carden Park, moving to Allenscombs Cave in the 1760s.((Bawn et al., pp. 67) Recent research has, however, cast doubt on the identification of Mad Allens Hole with Allenscombs Cave. Unlike the cave in Carden Park, no material dating to the 18th century has been discovered at Bickerton, and the name Mad Allens Hole originated in the late 19th century, when the cave was occupied by an eccentric known as Mad Allen.(Sinclair AGM, Matthews KJ (1999). The English Hermit. Cave Archaeology and Palaeontology Research Archive 1 (accessed 24 April 2010)) In the early 19th century, the Bloody Bones caves on the northerly hill were occupied by brigands, who terrorised the surrounding countryside, stealing cheese from local farms and plundering graves, as well as selling sand for cleaning. Seven were captured and executed in around 1834.(Bawn et al., pp. 78)(Latham FA (ed.), The Local History Group. Tattenhall: The History of a Cheshire Village, p. 35 (The Local History Group; 1977))thumb|left|100px|Droppingstone WellThe Droppingstone Well, immediately north of the Raw Head summit, bears a plaque dated 1861. A photograph of 1910 shows the well in use by locals.(Cheshire County Council: Notice south of Raw Head summit)20th21st centuryThe area around Maiden Castle was used for military training exercises during the 20th century, which included digging numerous two-man slit trenches.(( The heathland of the southerly hill went unmanaged from the 1940s until 1983, when  of land were acquired by the National Trust; the trusts holding was extended by  in 1991.(National Trust: National Trust Acquisition Data (version 1.0; November 2009), pp. 157, 158 (accessed 24 April 2010))( Much of the southerly hill and the western escarpment of the northerly hill were notified as two separate Sites of Special Scientific Interest in 1979.((The Sandstone Trail long-distance footpath opened in 1974; it then started in Duckington, immediately south of the southerly hill.(Cheshire East Council & Cheshire West and Chester Council: The Sandstone Trail (accessed 28 April 2010)) The Sandstone Trail Race was launched three years later.(Deeside Orienteering Club: The History of the Sandstone Trail Race (accessed 28 April 2010)) A 2008 proposal to construct a 60 metre wind-monitoring mast adjacent to Bickerton Hill met with local protest,( Anon. Fight against blot on the landscape. Crewe and Nantwich Guardian (16 January 2008) (accessed 11 February 2008))(Thompson A. Protests mount over wind mast plan. Crewe and Nantwich Guardian (30 January 2008) (accessed 11 February 2008)) and was rejected by and Nantwich Borough Council.(Ellams B. Wind farm blown away. Chester Chronicle (8 February 2008) (accessed 11 February 2008))Geography, geology and climateThe two Bickerton Hills lie south-west of the Hills. They form the southern end and high point of the Mid Cheshire Ridge, which runs broadly northsouth through Cheshire from Beacon Hill near Frodsham. The southern part of the ridge, including both Bickerton Hills, has been designated an Area of Special County Value.(Cheshire East Council & Cheshire West and Chester Council: Interactive Mapping: Beeston/Peckforton/Bolesworth/Bickerton Hills Area of Special County Value (accessed 28 April 2010)) The ridge line continues northsouth over the northerly Bickerton Hill, turning approximately 30 to the west over the southerly hill. The two hills are separated by a valley through which the A534 runs. The nearest settlements are (anti-clockwise from the south) Duckington, Brown Knowl, Fullers Moor, Harthill, Bulkeley, Gallantry Bank and Bickerton.(The summit of the northerly hill, Raw Head (), has an elevation of 227 metres( and is the highest point on the Mid Cheshire Ridge. Raw Head was believed to be a Marilyn but was demoted in 2009 following a re-survey; the re-estimate of Raw Heads prominence is 148.5 metres.(Dawson A. Raw Deal. RHB e-group (15 April 2009) (accessed 23 April 2010))(Dawson A. Marilyn News Centre: Summary of Marilyn updates since April 2006 (accessed 23 April 2010)) The high point bears a trig point.((United Kingdom Trig Points: Search for trigpoints near SJ 50800 54800 (accessed 21 February 2008)) The summit plateau of the southerly hill has two high points, at Maiden Castle (212 metres, ) and the Kitty Stone (193 metres, ).( The southern (Maiden Castle) high point is sometimes referred to as Larkton Hill; this name is also sometimes used to refer to the southeast of the hill, which partly falls within the Larkton civil parish.(Ordnance Survey: Landranger Map 117: Chester & Wrexham)((Cheshire East Council & Cheshire West and Chester Council: Interactive Mapping: Bickerton Hill (accessed 28 April 2010))The ridge is formed from a sandstone outcrop of the Sandstone Group, dating from the Triassic period around 250 million years ago. The sandstones are exposed forming extensive crags on the west flank of the northerly hill, as well as in smaller areas of the southerly hill.(( There are several natural caves. The two-storey cave known as Mad Allens Hole (on the southerly hill at ) has an entrance partially blocked by boulders and is accessible via a circular hole at the rear.( The Queens Parlour, a large triple-chambered cave directly under the Raw Head trig point, might be partially quarried.(Revealing Cheshires Past: Queens Parlour, Raw Head (accessed 28 April 2010))(Cheshire County Council: A Good Yarn But Youll Need A Torch (30 May 2006) (accessed 28 April 2010))The steeply sloping west flank of the northerly hill is clothed with conifer plantation and mixed woodland, which is managed for pheasant shooting.((Natural England: Raw Head: Condition of SSSI units (accessed 24 April 2010)) The summit plateau and gently sloping east flank have a mixture of pasture, arable land and plantation.( The soils of the southerly hill are acidic and predominantly nutrient poor, with brown sands on the ridge, and leached podzolic soils as well as earths at lower elevations.( It supports a mixture of heath and largely deciduous woodland, with some pasture fields.(Like much of the Mid Cheshire Ridge, the Bickerton Hills are rather cooler than the surrounding Plain, with an temperature of 13751649 day C compared with 16501924 day C. The soil is slightly moist, with a similar moisture level to that of the surrounding area.(Phillips & Phillips, pp. 5253. Accumulated temperature is defined as the total degrees Celsius in a growing season by which average daily temperatures exceed 5.6 C (the minimum necessary for grass growth); measurements refer to 193160)Sites of Special Scientific InterestBickerton HillAn area of  of the birch woods and heathland of the southerly hill has been designated a Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI).(English Nature: Bickerton Hill)(English Nature: SSSI units for Bickerton Hill) With the exception of several areas of farmland and former quarries, the SSSI covers the northmost (Kitty Stone) high point and the Maiden Castle area of the southern high point, together with the intervening col. It also extends over Cuckoo Rock, a lower area to the west of the southern high point, which lies to the south of the hamlet of Brown Knowl. It excludes the southwest of the hill, including part of Hether Wood as well as an area of farmland.(Natural England: Nature on the Map: Bickerton Hill SSSI) A total of  of the southerly hill, covering 90% of the SSSI, are owned and managed by the National Trust.((The lowland heath habitat (heathland below 300 metres elevation) of Bickerton Hill is considered particularly valuable.( Lowland heath is an internationally scarce habitat that is rare within Cheshire; a survey in 1995 found only 60 Ha in the administrative county.(English Nature: Natural Areas 27: Meres and Mosses (27 February 1998) (accessed 10 April 2010))(Cheshire Region Biodiversity Partnership: Habitat Action Plans: Heathland (accessed 10 April 2010)) Bickerton Hill is the largest of the four lowland heath SSSIs in the county.( A semi-natural habitat, heathland requires active management, such as grazing, to avoid succession to scrub and woodland.(English Nature: Lowland heathland SSSIs: Guidance on conservation objectives setting and condition monitoring. Research Report 511 (2003) (ISSN 0967-876X) (downloaded from http://naturalengland.etraderstores.com/NaturalEnglandShop/R511; 28 April 2010))thumb|left|240px|Birch woods on the southern hill; grazing promotes heathland regenerationFloraWithin the heathland areas, the predominant community types are vulgaris (common heather)flexuosa (wavy hair grass) (H9) and heathergallii (western gorse) (H8). Bilberry (Vaccinium myrtillus) is also widespread, with some patches of bracken (Pteridium aquilinum), and less frequently bell heather (Erica cinerea), cross leaved heath (Erica tetralix) and broom (Cytisus scoparius).((The woodland is dominated by silver birch, with aspen, holly, rowan, sessile oak and wild cherry also present. The undergrowth includes heather and bilberry, with patches of broad buckler-fern (Dryopteris dilatata).( Over two hundred plants of the nationally rare fern, Lobed Maidenhair Spleenwort (Asplenium trichomanes subsp pachyrachis), were discovered in 1997, growing on calcareous sandstone at two different locations; this is possibly the largest population of the subspecies in Britain. A few plants have since been recorded at Raw Head.(Botanical Society of the British Isles: Cheshire VC58: County Rare Plant Register 2008 (accessed 25 April 2010))bicuspis.jpg|right|thumb|160px|Alder kitten mothFaunaThe area is rich in wildlife. Insects found here that are scarce in the UK include the bleached pug (Eupithecia expallidata) and alder kitten (Furcula bicuspis) moths, as well as the soldier beetle species frontalis. Locally scarce insects include the green hairstreak butterfly (Callophrys rubi) and the common glow-worm (Lampyris noctiluca).(( The site provides a habitat for butterflies, with common species including the comma, gatekeeper, red admiral, speckled wood and tortoiseshell.(There is a breeding population of pied flycatcher.( Other birds commonly observed here include the jay, long-tailed tit, magpie, nuthatch, raven, treecreeper, and the great spotted and green woodpeckers. The buzzard, kestrel and sparrowhawk are common raptors, while merlin and peregrine falcon have been observed more rarely.(The reptile populations at Bickerton Hill are of particular significance.( It is one of five sites in the county where the adder has been recorded since 1995.( Other reptiles here include slow-worm and common lizard.((Current status and managementThe site was assessed by Nature as in an unfavourable but recovering condition in 2005.( Management of the area by the National Trust has aimed, since 1992, to promote heathland regeneration by preventing encroachment by birches, scrub and bracken. Strategies used include bracken rolling, clearing birch scrub and removing some older trees from heathland areas. Grazing with cattle is employed in summer.((Bate K. A Walking Guide to the Natural History of the Peckforton Hills, pp. 45 (Local Heritage Initiative) (accessed 24 April 2010))(English Nature: Condition of SSSI units (accessed 24 April 2010))(The National Trust: Bickerton Hill: Heathland restoration and woodland management (notice)) Tree clearance, has, however, resulted in conflict between the trust and a local residents group, Friends of Bickerton Hill, which organised a protest on the hill in October 2008 against tree felling, especially in the picturesque Cuckoo Rock Valley.(Coulbeck B. Protesters celebrate Trust compromise. Chester Chronicle (24 October 2008) (accessed 28 April 2010))(Coulbeck B. Trust vows tree felling will go on. Chester Chronicle (31 October 2008) (accessed 23 April 2010))(Coulbeck B. National Trust dawn raid angers Friends. Chester Chronicle (31 October 2008) (accessed 23 April 2010))Woodland areas are managed to encourage the development of trees of a wide range of ages by thinning around older trees, thinning in denser woodland and planting new trees. Dead wood forms an important habitat and is retained.(Other threats to the site include the high volume of walkers, which has led to footpath erosion, and the inappropriate disposal of dog faeces.((National Trust: Dog Waste (notice)) Bickerton Hill is included in the Cheshire Action Plan.(Cheshire Region Biodiversity Partnership: Heathland Local Biodiversity Action Plan (accessed 24 April 2010))Raw HeadA total of  of the northerly Bickerton Hill has been designated a geological SSSI for its exposed sandstones, which provide important insight into the conditions present during the Triassic period. The SSSI is centred on , and encompasses the hills western escarpment, stretching from immediately west of Droppingstone Well, through Raw Head and Muskets Hole, and into Tower Wood.(English Nature: Raw Head (accessed 23 April 2010))((Joint Nature Conservation Committee: Bickerton Hill (Permian - Triassic) (accessed 14 April 2010))(Natural England: Nature on the Map: Raw Head (accessed 14 April 2010))) The land is owned by the Bolesworth Estate, and is managed for pheasant shooting, with conifer plantation and mixed woodland.(Wilmslow, Bulkeley Hill and Helsby Sandstone formations of the Sherwood Sandstone Group are present within the site, dating from the Triassic period around 250 million years ago. The fine-grained red sandstones which predominate in the lower rock levels represent sedimentation from sandy rivers, while the conglomerate beds of Delamere Pebbly Sandstone (a type of Helsby Sandstone formation) which occur in the upper levels represent the deposition of larger particles from coarse-grained braided rivers.(The site was assessed as in a favourable condition by England in 2008. The rock was generally well exposed, despite local vegetation cover. No damage to the rocks was apparent from tree growth, and carved graffiti adjacent to the Raw Head summit was localised and superficial.(Recreational use, access and facilitiesThe area is popular with recreational walkers and dog walkers. The Sandstone Trail, a long-distance footpath between Frodsham and Whitchurch, runs over the top of the two hills, and there are several other public footpaths and a network of waymarked permissive paths.(((Cheshire County Council: The Sandstone Trail (accessed 7 March 2008)) A total of 8500 walkers on the Sandstone Trail were recorded by the National Trust between January and March 2006, and the trust has estimated that 8000 dog walks occur annually within the Bickerton Hill SSSI.(( The longer of the two Sandstone Trail Races, organised by Deeside Orienteering Club in early October, goes over the two hills, starting from Duckington and following part of the Sandstone Trail.(Deeside Orienteering Club: The Route of the Sandstone Trail Race (accessed 24 April 2010))Limited access by public road is available to the northerly hill: Coppermine Lane climbs from the A534 to the east of the summit plateau, and New Lane runs from Harthill under the Raw Head ridge to Droppingstone Farm. Goldford Lane, Old Coach Road, Hall Lane, Brown Knowl Lane and Reading Room Lane run around the southerly hill; Sandy Lane runs from Brown Knowl to the edge of the Cuckoo Rock area.( Two free car parks, at  (Pool Lane, off Goldford Lane, near Bickerton) and  (off Old Coach Road, near Duckington), are open during daylight hours.(Ordnance Survey: Explorer Map 257: Crewe & Nantwich: Whitchurch & Tattenhall)( A small additional parking area for the disabled is located off Goldford Lane (); it requires advance permission. An easy-access footpath suitable for people of limited mobility runs from this parking area to Maiden Castle.(SREP eNews (October 2007) (downloaded from http://www.cheshirewestandchester.gov.uk/environment/srep.aspx; 24 April 2010))(Habitats and Hillforts: Discovering Programme (accessed 28 April 2010)) The majority of paths have gates or gates, but there are some stiles.(There is no access off the marked paths. There are no bridleways; cycling is prohibited and horse riding requires a permit on the land owned by the National Trust. Camping and overnight parking are prohibited.( Interpretation includes National Trust information boards in the two car parks, Sandstone Trail information boards at multiple points along the trail, and several interpretative signs.(See also*of Scheduled Monuments in Cheshire (pre-1066)*of Sites of Special Scientific Interest in CheshireExternal links*Discovercheshire website (Raw Head walk).*Walking Cheshires Sandstone Trail | Maps | Information | PhotographsReferencesSources*Bawn W, Dakin R, Shadbolt C, Bate H (ed). A Local History of Broxton, Duckington & Harthill (Local Heritage Initiative; 2004) (accessed 24 April 2010)*Husain BMC. Cheshire under the Norman Earls: 10661237. A History of Cheshire Vol. 4 (JJ Bagley, ed.) (Cheshire Community Council; 1973)*Phillips ADM, Phillips CB (eds). A New Historical Atlas of Cheshire (Cheshire County Council & Cheshire Community Council Publications Trust; 2002)Hill
5415013
Borken,_Hesse
Borken is a small town with about 13,000 inhabitants in the Schwalm-Eder district in northern Hesse, Germany.The town is a former centre for coal mining and coal-fired electrical generation in Hesse. The coalmine, unlike those in other regions, also had underground workings. After a major disaster  namely a dust explosion  the mine was shut down on 1 June 1988.Since that time, the former coal pits have been redeveloped into recreation areas with lakes, nature areas  some actually protected by law  and sporting grounds. Among these areas are der See (Borken Lake) with its nature reserve, der See (Singlis Lake) with windsurfing, and die Stockelache (Stagnant Puddle), used as a bathing lake.One particular attraction in Borken is the Brown Coal Mining Museum (Hessisches Braunkohle Bergbaumuseum) which displays the towns coal-mining tradition. Since 2003, an museum, where visitors may learn about coal and energy, has also been open. The museum is also affiliated with a nature conservation information centre for the Borkener See.Borkens best known landmark is its watertower. Geography  Geographical location The next towns to Borken are Fritzlar (15 km) in the northwest and Homberg (15 km) in the west. Within 50 km distance is Kassel the next large city in the north and with 55 km Marburg in the south. Geology The municipal area is a part of region west hesse depression. Following sub-divisions of this natural region participated Borken: *Depression with the divisions: **Trockenerfurth Plain**Borken Basin*Hessengau with the division:**PlateauIn the area of Borken are different rivers and creeks. The famous river is Schwalm with the discharged creeks Olmes (right side) with Merrebach, Lembach (right side) and Hundsbach (left side). Using municipal area The municipal area are 82.3 square kilometres or 8,230 hectare in metric orientated countries (f.e. Germany). In anglo Saxon based countries (f.e. States or Kingdom) 31.78 square miles or 20,336.77 ar. 11,873.41 ar were used by farming, 4,262.58 ar are forrest, buildings for living are used 1,393.67 ar, the roads and railroad are using 1,322.01 ar, waterbodies using 753.67 ar, companies using 363.24 ar, for recreation 108.73 ar and 259.46 ar are nature protection area. In the neighbourhood The next municipals at the border at the area of Borken are in the northwest Fritzlar. In the northeast you can find Wabern. Homberg can you find at the east of Borken. The southeast show you the municipal of Frielendorf. Neuental is the next municipal at the southwest. And at the last (but not the least) you find Zwesten at the west. Quarters The municipality of Borken (Hesse) has 14 quarters (in bracket the date of annexation): History  Mining in Borken In the Borken region in the 20th century, the most important brown coal deposit in Hesse was mined and used at a thermal power plant to generate electricity. With the end of the coal stocks, the Stolzenbach mine disaster in 1988 and the Borken Power Plant shutdown on 15 March 1991, this epoch in the regions history, which had lastingly shaped the economy, the landscape and the people, came to an end. Since then, the brown coal mining area has found itself the subject of a restructuring process by a service company.In the 21st century, the Borkener Seenland (Borken Lakeland) and the Hessian Brown Coal Mining Museum turned the landmarks and the legacy, as well as the coal-mining and power plant era into a leisure and museum area. Politics  Municipal council The municipal council vote for the last two elections: Mayor Since the second world war Borken have four majors:* Heinrich Albrecht (26. April 1945 till 2. Juno 1961)* Konrad Vogel (SPD) (3. Juno 1961 till 7. March 1971)* Heinz Kniest (SPD) (12. July 1971 till 30. September 1987)* Bernd Heler (SPD) (1. October 1987 till today)The mayor of Borken is Bernd Heler (SPD). By the last direct election he reached 60.0 %.  Town partnerships Borken has a partnership to Mru, France since 1964. This partnership received a donation from the French Culture Foundation for exemplary partnership in 1978. In 1999 received the partnership a donation from the Parliament with the European diplom.Since 1989 it gives a partnership to Httschlag, Austria.For more good relationship to eastern European people came in 2001 a partnership to Izabelin, Poland. In the course of the reunification said the parliament of Borken in 1991 we should get a partnership with Teuchern, Saxony-Anhalt in the former eastern Germany.The quarter of Borken Groenenglis decided in 1970 a partnership with Noailles, France.Another quarter of Borken Kleinenglis decided in 1966 a partnership with Charles, France. This quarters (Groenenglis, Kleinenglis) where in the years of hers decision independent communities. Coat of arms Borkens civic of arms might heraldically be described thus: Argent a lion rampant gules, armed Or and langued gules, within, a mullet of six argent.The arms were granted in their present form in 1951 after a series of different arms that all featured the lion, the oldest known of which dates from the late 14th century. Later, the lion in the towns arms was the red-and-silver-striped Lion of Hesse (which also appears in Hesses arms and a great number of civic arms throughout Hesse). Other arms showed a red or blue lion. The star is a medieval symbol used by the Counts of Ziegenhain who held sway in the area in the early Middle Ages.http://www.ngw.nl/int/dld/b/borkenh.htm Landmarks Borkener SeenlandThe Stockelache Nature Bathing Lake, the Singlis surfing lake and the Borkener See nature reserve use the old coal-mining lands for tourism with a broad choice of activities ranging from bathing, swimming and diving to volleyball, windsurfing and Aqua-Golf, to recreation, hiking, and nature watching. Hessian Brown Coal Mining Museum The Hessian Brown Coal Mining Museum, founded in 1992, presents under the theme of Discover industrial culture  experience landscape change many exhibits from coal-mining and electrical generation, whose workings are demonstrated for visitors. These exhibits include the underground and above-ground mining of the raw material, brown coal, its use, and the conversion of the former mining lands as the centrepiece.The visitor may choose from among four museum areas:*In the 3.5 ha experience-oriented Coal & Energy park, rattling excavators, humming turbines and smoking power station kettles show how coal was mined from the pits, and how it was used for energy.*A reconstructed gallery displays the miners work and everyday lives, and shows through original equipment the change in mining procedures.*A permanent exhibition presents the 400-year history of Hessian brown coal mining.*The Borkener See nature conservation information centre explains how second-hand landscapes are fashioned from former mining areas.The visitors mine and the mining history exhibit are housed in Borkens oldest building, Am Amtsgericht  built in 1473  in the Old Town. The Coal & Energy theme park and the adjoining Borkener See nature conservation information centre are found Am Freilichtmuseum (At the Open-Air Museum) before the towns gates. Great power plant Borken The Borken power plant building, which still stands today is protected as a monument. It was built in 1922-1923 by the famous industrial architects Issel and Klingenberg. Constituent communities  Nassenerfurth Nassenerfurth is a small livable village with good infrastructure. Nassenerfurth had its first documentary mention in 1040. There is a Wasserschloss (stately home with a moat) as well as a church from the 15th century. The population is about 630. Stolzenbach Stolzenbach has 123 inhabitants. The Stolzenbach Pit mined brown coal beginning in 1956. On 1 June 1988, 51 miners were killed in a coal dust explosion there. The now abandoned coal pit is an important site for palaeontological finds, notably of the turtle species Palaeoemys hessiaca and Borkenia oschkinisi, the former named after Hesse, and the latter after Borken. Trockenerfurth Trockenerfurth has 967 inhabitants (as of March 2004). Sons of the town * Christoph Friedrich Arnold (1826-1883), cultural historian* Wittich (1911-1984), mathematician* Koch (1807-1858), writer and jurist* von Geyso (1593-1661), general Schools * Gesamtschule Gustav-Heinemann-Schule GHS-Borken* Grundschule Borken* Frderschule - Teichgartenschule (Teichgartenweg 1)* Grundschule Kleinenglis Notes ( External links * Borkens official homepage* Hessian Brown Coal Mining Museums official homepage* Arnsbach* Kleinenglis* Singlis* Nassenerfurth* Volunteer fire brigades homepage (main town)* Gesamtschule Gustav-Heinemann-Schule GHS-Borken(Hessen)(Hesio)()(Hesse)(Hessen)(Hessen)(Hessen)(Hessen)()()(Hessen)Hesse
5421213
Aliveri
Aliveri (Greek, Modern:  / Katharevousa: ; Greek:  - Aulon, (The Polis as an Urban Centre and as a Political Community Page 432 By Mogens Herman Hansen ISBN 8773042919)), is a town in the Greek island of Euboea. It is part of the municipal unit Taminaioi, and the seat of the municipality Kymi-Aliveri. Aliveri is linked by the GR-44 (Chalkida - Karystos). Aliveri lies next to the Euboic Gulf. Aliveri is located east of Chalkida, south of Cyme and NNW of Karystos as well as NNE of Athens.Aliveri is mostly an industrial town.  The biggest cement factory of Greece is located in Aliveri, which also homes a power generating plant of the PPC (Public Power Corporation - ). The power plant began producing power burning brown coal (lignite) in 1955.  As the coal seam has been exhausted now, the power plant is using oil. In the area, there is also marble mining industry.Aliveri also boast a picturesque harbor called Karavos.Subdivisions*Aliveri*Katakalou*Latas*MilakiHistorical populationthumb|150px|The church in the upper townthumb|150px|An old house in AliveriOtherReferencesExternal links*GTP Travel Pages - Aliveri (in English and Greek)*Grey of Aliveri*Grey of Aliveri (other website)*In Greek:**Map and flag of Aliveri**Aliveris portal**Aliveri NewsSee also*of settlements in the Euboea prefecturear:de:Aliveriel:pl:Aliweri
